MGM  v.  GROKSTER 

S.  HRG.  109–1115 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

JULY  28,  2005 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

64–524 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2011 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on July 28, 2005 
...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Boxer  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Ensign  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Editorial,  dated  July  16,  2005,  from  Billboard  Magazine,  entitled  ‘‘After 
Grokster, Can Music Business Save Itself?’’  ...............................................

WITNESSES 

Attaway,  Fritz  E.,  Executive  Vice  President  and  Washington  General  Coun-
sel, Motion Picture Association of America  ........................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Bainwol, Mitch, Chairman and CEO, Recording Industry Association of Amer-
ica  ..........................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Baker, David N., Vice President, Law and Public Policy, EarthLink, Inc.  .........
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Eisgrau,  Adam  M.,  Executive  Director,  P2P  United,  Inc.,  on  behalf  of  the 
Electronic Frontier Foundation (EFF)  ................................................................
Joint  prepared  statement  of  Adam  M.  Eisgrau,  Executive  Director,  P2P 
United,  Inc.;  and  Fred  von  Lohmann,  Senior  IP  Attorney,  Electronic 
Frontier Foundation (EFF) 
..........................................................................
Heesen, Mark G., President, National Venture Capital Association  ...................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Kerber, Gregory G., Chairman and CEO, Wurld Media, Inc.  ..............................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Lafferty,  Marty,  CEO,  Distributed  Computing  Industry  Association  (DCIA), 
prepared statement  ..............................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Page 
1 
48 
43 
1 
41 
1 

2 

32 
33 

28 
29 
24 
26 

4 

5 
18 
19 
14 
16 

55 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

MGM  v.  GROKSTER 

THURSDAY,  JULY  28,  2005 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:34  p.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Ted  Stevens, 
Chairman of the Committee, presiding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The  CHAIRMAN.  This  afternoon,  we  want  to  examine  the  issues 
related to the MGM-Grokster decision and the appropriate balance 
between copyright protection and communication innovation. 

The Supreme Court decision cleared the way for peer-to-peer and 
other  communication  technologies  to  be  liable  for  contributory  or 
vicarious  copyright  infringement.  Going  forward,  we’ll  all  have  to 
balance  the  competing  interests  of  encouraging  innovative  services 
like peer-to-peer that spur new services, jobs, and economic growth 
against  protecting  content  providers  from  piracy  to  ensure  return 
on investment and continued innovation in the content space. 

Now,  I  know  it’s  a  very  controversial  subject  we’re  dealing  with 

this afternoon, and we have a series of witnesses here. 

First let me turn to our Co-Chairman, Senator Inouye. 
STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

Senator INOUYE. I thank you very much, Mr. Chairman, for hold-
ing this hearing on the Supreme Court’s recent decision. As we all 
know, it was unanimous. It’s unusual in Washington these days to 
get  a  unanimous  decision  on  anything,  especially  an  issue  as  im-
portant as copyright. 

In  my  view,  the  Supreme  Court  has  struck  the  proper  balance 
between  protecting  the  rights  of  copyright  holders  and  creating  an 
environment  for  technological  innovation,  and,  in  doing  so,  has 
made the American consumer the ultimate winner. With its ruling, 
the  Supreme  Court  has  sent  an  important  message  that  the  law 
does not allow companies to induce others to steal. 

Given  that  millions  of  Americans  have  downloaded  or  swapped 
files  using  peer-to-peer  technology,  the  Department  of  Justice  ob-
served  that  it  appears  many  people  have  come  to  view  piracy  over 
peer-to-peer  networks  as  different  and  less  objectionable  compared 
to stealing a physical copy of a CD or DVD from the store. By hold-
ing companies that promote copyright infringement by clear expres-

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

sion or other affirmative steps taken to foster infringement, the Su-
preme  Court  has  made  it  very  clear  that  stealing  is  unacceptable. 
The  recording  industry,  motion  picture,  and  computer  software 
industries  are  key  components  of  our  Nation’s  economy.  According 
to  a  recent  study  by  the  International  Intellectual  Property  Alli-
ance,  the  copyright  industries  are  strong  and  growing.  In  2002, 
these industries accounted for 6 percent of the gross domestic prod-
uct  and  employed  4  percent  of  the  workers  of  the  United  States. 
In addition, these industries recorded more than $89 billion in for-
eign sales and exports in 2002, which is well ahead of other major 
industry segments. 

Given  the  importance  of  these  industries  by  our  economy,  I  ap-
plaud the Supreme Court’s decision to hold persons accountable for 
actions that encourage unlawful behavior. 

And so, I thank you, Mr. Chairman, for holding this hearing. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator  Pryor,  do  you  have  a  statement?  Do  you  have  a  state-

ment, Senator? 

Senator PRYOR. I don’t, thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Just  so  the  record  will  disclose  the  extent  of  this  conflict,  I’m 
going  to  put  into  the  record  the  Billboard  editorial  of  July  16  by 
Fred Goldring. 

[The information previously referred to follows:] 

Billboard Magazine—July 16, 2005 

AFTER GROKSTER, CAN MUSIC BUSINESS SAVE ITSELF? 

By Fred Goldring 

Last  week,  the  Supreme  Court  handed  down  a  decision  in  the  MGM  vs.  Grokster 
case  that  the  news  wires  immediately  heralded  as  a  ‘‘sweeping  victory’’  for  our  in-
dustry. Then, of all people, former Recording Industry Assn. of America head Hilary 
Rosen  spoiled  the  party,  pointing  out  that  while  the  ruling  ‘‘maybe  [sic]  important 
psychologically,  it  just  won’t  really  matter  in  the  marketplace.’’  She  clarified  that 
‘‘knowing we were right legally really still isn’t the same thing as being right in the 
real world.’’ 

Then The New York Times piled on, insisting that ‘‘[h]owever valid the industry’s 
desire  to  protect  its  products,  trying  to  stop  file  sharing  has  become  a  Sisyphean 
exercise.’’  Rosen  got  the  last  word  in  that  story,  too,  calling  the  Grokster  decision 
‘‘meaningless.’’ 

Next,  a  Los  Angeles  Times  piece  suggested  that  the  recording  industry  might  try 
making  MP3  music  legitimately  available  rather  than  trying  to  sell  files  ‘‘that  re-
strict copying, deter sharing and limit portability.’’ People in our industry found this 
last  suggestion  ‘‘outrageous.’’  It  reminded  me  that  I  made  a  similarly  outrageous 
suggestion—nearly  2  years  ago—in  a  piece  I  wrote  for  these  pages,  ‘‘Abandon  the 
‘Shock and Awe’ Tactics: An Eight-Step Recovery Program for a Healthier Music In-
dustry.’’ 

At  the  time,  the  recording  industry  had  initiated  the  first  few  hundred  of  what 
would  become  a  monthly  round  of  John  Doe  lawsuits  filed  against  accused  music 
uploaders. I posited that the strategy of suing customers (thieves) and building ever- 
better locks for CDs and digital singles simply was not working, and that everything 
we had done thus far had in fact made the problem much worse. 

Sales  were  down.  File  swapping  was  up.  Alarmed  by  our  strategic  direction,  I 
wrote  as  someone  who  earns  his  living  working  with  musicians,  record  companies 
and publishing companies (and as a musician myself) that an industry intervention 
was  needed,  to  offer  ‘‘tough  love’’  as  one  would  to  ‘‘a  good  friend  or  family  member 
who is not thinking clearly, hell-bent on a collision course of self-destruction.’’ 

In  2003,  I  suggested  a  few  immediate  steps  that  would  put  us  on  the  path  to  re-

covery, specifically: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

more popular than the CD. 

• Admit you’re powerless. File sharing is not going away. Downloading is already 
• Give up on anti-piracy technologies—they don’t work. 
• Stop attacking your own customers. (Bad PR, worse business.) 
• Focus  less  on  finger-pointing  and  more  on  immediate,  practical,  fair  solutions. 
• Give the people what they want, even if it requires that laws be changed. 
• Support  initiatives  that  will  allow  unlimited  access  to  every  piece  of  music  in 
the  MP3  format  whenever  and  wherever  someone  wants  it,  with  no  conditions 
or restrictions, in an easy-to-use interface. People will pay for this. 

Glancing over my tough-love recommendations of 2 years ago, I have to point out 
the  obvious:  2005  sure  looks  a  helluva  lot  like  2003.  The  cynic  in  me  would  almost 
think  that  the  industry  had  read  my  suggestions  and  decided  to  do  the  exact  oppo-
site. 

So now, we are far worse off, even perhaps to the point of no return. And we are 
busy celebrating the ‘‘mother of all Pyrrhic victories’’ when file sharing is at an all- 
time high. 

This  is  not  just  the  latest  in  a  long  history  of  missed  opportunities  for  our  busi-

ness. It is truly a defining moment. 

It  is  no  accident  that  The  New  York  Times,  Los  Angeles  Times,  Newsweek  and 
Reuters  are  reporting  that  the  music  industry  emperor  is  not  wearing  any  clothes. 
Business is down another 8 percent this year, and we have pinned our hopes again 
on  the  deus  ex  machina.  The  industry  has  received  its  long-awaited  vindication  on 
paper by the U.S. Supreme Court, and yet the pundits—even Rosen (who ironically 
originally  led  this  charge)—insist  we  are  tilting  at  windmills.  We  are  finally  out  of 
practical options, because there is no higher authority to appeal to. 

Two years ago, I ended with this simple recommendation: ‘‘Stop your futile efforts 
to change the behavior of millions of music fans. Spend all your efforts on designing 
a  system  that  gets  everyone  paid  around  the  overwhelming  behavior  that  exists.’’ 
Today,  I’m  asking  the  hard  questions:  Will  the  recording  industry  save  itself?  Or 
are we too far gone? Is there a realistic scenario for withdrawal, a retreat from the 
‘‘lawsuits  and  locksmiths’’  mentality  and  a  swift  about-face?  Can  we  swallow  our 
pride  and  prevail  over  hubris  long  enough  to  embrace  the  real  world  and  the  real 
market opportunity? Or is The Motley Fool correct in predicting a not-so-distant fu-
ture  when  ‘‘the  major  labels  won’t  be  the  same  batch  of  old-school  vinyl- 
pushers . . . the  real  power  brokers  in  the  music  industry  will  be  Google,  Yahoo! 
and Microsoft?’’ 

Wall  Street  analysts  and  the  mainstream  press  do  not  like  our  prospects,  and  so 
more  than  ever  I  fear  we  are  living  in  a  bubble  and  kidding  ourselves  about  this 
war and the definition of winning. 

Two  years  ago  I  advocated  change,  and  2  years  later  I  see  status  quo.  So  now  I 
can  only  envision  a  frustratingly  bleak  future  where  we  publicly  celebrate  shutting 
down  a  few  peer-to-peer  businesses  like  Grokster,  though  like  shuttering  Napster, 
doing  so  will  be  a  useless  exercise.  I  envision  us  marking  500  million  songs  sold  in 
the  course  of  a  couple  of  years  at  Apple  Computer’s  iTunes  Music  Store,  remaining 
blind  to  the  reality  that  (even  the  RIAA  admits)  nearly  3  billion  free  MP3s  are 
swapped  every  month.  I  envision  us  continuing  to  hold  out  hope  for  a  turning  of 
the  tide,  an  improvement  in  our  position  and  a  validation  of  our  strategy  that,  like 
a desert oasis shimmering on the horizon, is always just 2 years away. 

It  turns  out  I  was  right  in  2003.  Going  forward,  I  hope  I  am  wrong.  Because  we 

don’t have another 2 years. 

Fred Goldring is a founding partner of Goldring, Hertz & Lichtenstein, a Beverly 

Hills, California-based entertainment law firm. 

The CHAIRMAN. We have, as witnesses this afternoon, a series of 
people  that  we’ve  selected  to  try  and  bring  a  balance  in  terms  of 
the  comments  on  this  issue.  First  is  Adam  Eisgrau,  Executive  Di-
rector of P2P United. 

May I call on you, please, sir? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

STATEMENT  OF  ADAM  M.  EISGRAU,  EXECUTIVE  DIRECTOR, 
P2P  UNITED,  INC.;  ON  BEHALF  OF  THE  ELECTRONIC 
FRONTIER FOUNDATION (EFF) 
Mr. EISGRAU. You certainly may. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Good  afternoon,  Mr.  Chairman,  Co-Chairman  Inouye,  Senator 
Pryor. I thank you for the opportunity to appear here today on be-
half of P2P United and the Electronic Frontier Foundation. 

For the record, I am not, and do not, appear here today as coun-

sel for any individual or company. 

We appreciate the Committee’s prospective focus, Mr. Chairman, 
on the larger policy implications of the Supreme Court’s decision in 
MGM  v.  Grokster;  most  particularly,  how  to  continue  to  promote 
technology,  including  peer-to-peer  technology  and  technological  in-
novation.  I’m  pleased  to  underscore  that  the  value  and  legality  of 
P2P technology, itself, was expressly recognized by the court in its 
opinion.  Clearly,  however,  the  misuse  of  this  powerful  and  neutral 
communications  technology  continues  to  pose  significant  chal-
lenges.  Notwithstanding  a  massive  and  ongoing  campaign  of  law-
suits  against  consumers—11,000,  and  counting—the  unvarnished 
facts  are  that  new  open  peer-to-peer  software  programs  will,  and 
should  continue  to  be,  lawfully  produced  every  day  around  the 
globe.  And,  as  reported  last  month  in  Rolling  Stone,  ‘‘The  lawsuits 
have failed to stop, or even slow, illegal file sharing.’’ As a practical 
matter, the high court’s recent decision will not alter this landscape 
at all. 

Ms. Hillary Rosen, Mr. Bainwol’s predecessor at the RIAA wrote, 
the day before the Court’s recent ruling, and I quote her, ‘‘It is said 
that  the  Supreme  Court’s  decision  will  be  one  of  the  most  impor-
tant  copyright  cases  ever  on  the  books.  I  think  it  has  all  the  mak-
ings  of  being  famous,’’  she  said,  ‘‘for  another  reason.  It  just  won’t 
really  matter  in  the  marketplace.  So,  here  is  the  crux  of  the  prob-
lem,’’  as  Rosen  explained,  ‘‘P2P  services  have  traffic  at  a  rate  40 
to  50  times  the  traffic  of  legitimate  sites.  This  volume  needs  to  be 
embraced  and  managed  because  it  cannot  be  vanquished.  And  a 
tone,’’ Ms. Rosen continued, ‘‘must be set that allows future innova-
tion to stimulate negotiation and not just confrontation.’’ 

Editorializing  in  Billboard  Magazine  on  July  16—and  I  thank 
you for placing that in the record, Mr. Chairman—prominent music 
industry  attorney  Fred  Goldring  felt  compelled  to  reiterate  advice 
he  had  given  his  industry  in  2003,  ‘‘Stop  your  futile  efforts  to 
change  the  behavior  of  millions  of  music  fans.  Spend  all  your  ef-
forts  on  designing  a  system  that  gets  everyone  paid  around  the 
overwhelming behavior that exists.’’ 

We  fully  agree,  Mr.  Chairman,  with  both  Ms.  Rosen’s  and  Mr. 
Goldring’s bottom lines and urge the Committee, therefore, to take 
a  proactively  pragmatic  view  of  how  to  help  the  market  move  for-
ward. 

We  have  two  requests.  First,  bring  all  relevant  stakeholders  to-
gether  in  a  series  of  meetings  or  hearings  to  intelligently  and  civ-
illy discuss the possibility that a system of voluntary—and I do em-
phasize  ‘‘voluntary’’—collective  licensing  may  be  a  useful  mecha-
nism,  among  others,  to  help  meet  consumer  demand  for  online 
music  while  also  encouraging  innovation  and  maximizing  the  com-
pensation of music copyright owners, both big and small. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

A  similar  system  has,  in  fact,  already  worked  well  for  decades, 
Mr. Chairman. Songwriters originally viewed radio exactly the way 
the  music  industry  today  views  many  P2P  users,  as  pirates.  Ulti-
mately, however, they formed ASCAP, and, later, BMI and SESAC. 
Under this voluntary licensing system, radio stations pay a fee and, 
in  return,  get  to  play  whatever  music  they  like,  using  whatever 
equipment they feel works best. 

Today,  the  performing  rights  societies,  like  ASCAP,  BMI,  and 
SESAC,  pay  out  literally  hundreds  of  millions  of  dollars  annually 
to  their  artists,  and  virtually  all  eligible  rights-holders  opt  to  par-
ticipate.  Some  difficulties  over  time  notwithstanding,  there  is  no 
question that the system that has evolved for radio is far preferable 
to  the  songwriter’s  original  strategy  of  trying  to  sue  radio  into  ex-
tinction. 

But  there  is  a  catch,  Mr.  Chairman.  The  entertainment  indus-
tries, I’m sorry to say, have unilaterally declared any kind of collec-
tive  licensing  for  P2P,  even  voluntary  systems,  to  be  an  absolute 
nonstarter,  and  have  refused  multiple  invitations  to  discuss  the 
concept  systematically  in  any  forum.  Without  passing  or  changing 
any laws, therefore, this committee has the power to do consumers, 
and  potentially  the  economy,  a  great  service  by  simply  convening 
such  talks  under  its  auspices  and  making  clear  that  it  expects 
invitees to participate in good faith. 

Second,  for  reasons  detailed  in  our  written  testimony,  we  also 
ask  that  this  committee  initiate  an  inter-committee  process  meant 
to  produce  targeted  statutory  reform  that  will  insulate  technology 
innovators  from  potentially  astronomical  and  crippling  statutory 
damages  under  secondary  liability  doctrines  made  murkier  by  the 
court’s recent ruling in Grokster. Originally designed to deter large- 
scale direct copyright infringers and other true commercial pirates, 
statutory  damages  of  up  to  $150,000  per  work  infringed  can  now 
be  imposed  on  individual  inventors,  technology  companies,  or  even 
venture  investors  without  proof  of  economic  harm.  This  can,  and 
we  believe  should,  be  changed  without  depriving  copyright  owners 
of  powerful  injunctive  remedies  and,  potentially,  very  large  actual 
damages awards in secondary liability cases, or, for that matter, of 
continued  access  to  statutory  damages  in  cases  of  real  commercial 
piracy. 

We  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  be  here,  Mr.  Chairman.  We 
thank  you  for  placing  the  material  in  the  record.  And  I  look  for-
ward  both  to  the  Committee’s  questions  and  its  ongoing  direct  in-
volvement in these issues. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Eisgrau follows:] 

JOINT PREPARED STATEMENT OF ADAM M.  EISGRAU,  EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR,  P2P 
UNITED,  INC.;  AND FRED VON LOHMANN,  SENIOR IP  ATTORNEY,  ELECTRONIC 
FRONTIER FOUNDATION (EFF) 
Good  afternoon,  Chairman  Stevens,  Co-Chairman  Inouye  and  members  of  the 
Committee.  Thank  you,  and  your  staffs,  for  the  opportunity  to  participate  in  these 
proceedings. 

My name is Adam Eisgrau. I am a Vice President of Flanagan Consulting (estab-
lished  by  former  Congressman  Michael  Flanagan),  and  I  appear  before  you  today 
both  as  Executive  Director  of  P2P  United  and  on  behalf  of  the  Electronic  Frontier 
Foundation (EFF), which co-authored this testimony. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

P2P  United  was  founded  2  years  ago  this  month  as  a  resource  for  legislators, 
other  policymakers  and  the  media  in  need  of  accurate  information  regarding  peer- 
to-peer  software  (P2P)  and  its  tremendous  potential.  Our  members  include  the  de-
velopers  of  the  Grokster  and  Morpheus  software  programs  at  issue  in  the  Supreme 
Court’s  recent  decision  which  has  brought  us  together  today.  Much  more  about  our 
group  and  its  work  is  available  online  at  www.p2punited.org.  The  Electronic  Fron-
tier Foundation, as detailed online at www.eff.org, was established 15 years ago this 
month to defend the public’s right to think, speak, and share ideas using all manner 
of new technologies, particularly the Internet and World Wide Web. 

In  the  four  weeks  since  the  Supreme  Court’s  ruling  in  MGM  v.  Grokster,  many 
pundits, analysts and advocates have concluded that the Court’s unanimous opinion 
obviated  any  necessity  for  Congressional  action  to  address  the  issues  before  the 
Court.  P2P  United  and  the  Electronic  Frontier  Foundation  respectfully  disagree  for 
reasons articulated by the Court itself. As a unanimous Court observed at the very 
outset  of  its  legal  analysis  in  MGM  v.  Grokster:  ‘‘[t]he  more  artistic  expression  is 
favored,  the  more  technological  innovation  may  be  discouraged;  the  administration 
of  copyright  law  is  an  exercise  in  managing  the  tradeoff.’’  MGM  v.  Grokster,  545 
U.S. 125 S. Ct. 2764, 2770 (2005). 

The  task  of  striking  the  right  balance,  however,  is  constitutionally  delegated  to 
Congress. Congress now has an important opportunity—indeed an ongoing responsi-
bility—to  examine  the  balance  between  copyright  law  and  innovation  with  an  eye 
toward  affirmatively  protecting  and  promoting  the  kind  of  technological  innovation 
in  communications  that  has  been  responsible  for  advancing  our  society  and  our 
economy so dramatically in the Internet Age. 

Accordingly, as this committee monitors the import and impact of the Court’s rul-
ing—which we applaud it for doing today and hope that it will continue to do regu-
larly  for  some  time  to  come—our  organizations  urge  the  Committee’s  members  to 
adopt a de facto policy of ‘‘proactive pragmatism’’ in the public interest. Specifically, 
P2P United and EFF urge the Committee to affirmatively embrace two overarching 
public policy goals: 

1)  proactively  protect  communications  technology  innovators  from  the  likely 
chilling  effects  of  potentially  crippling  liability  in  the  uncertain  legal  environ-
ment created by the Supreme Court’s holding; and 
2)  pragmatically  promote  new  marketplace  solutions  that  move  us  toward  a 
world  where  Internet  users  can  obtain  licenses  that  give  them  lawful  access  to 
the  broadest  variety  of  copyrighted  material  using  the  most  efficient  and  con-
venient technologies available. 

‘‘collective 

for  music  to 

licensing’’  system 

In particular, we propose that the Committee convene and task all relevant stake-
holders  with  exploring—merely  publicly  discussing  in  good  faith—the  potential  of  a 
fairly  compensate  all 
voluntary 
rightsholders  for  currently  unlawful  and  unpaid  downloads.  Significantly,  such  a 
system would profit not only the four (soon to be three) megalithic overseas corpora-
tions  that  control  much  of  the  world’s  commercial  music,  but  also  for  the  first  time 
would empower and compensate the thousands and thousands of individual musical 
performers  and  writers  now  unaffiliated—and  statistically  unlikely  at  any  point  to 
become  affiliated—with  what  Joni  Mitchell  aptly  called  the  ‘‘star  maker  machinery 
of the popular song.’’ 1 
I.  Given  the  Uncertainties  Left  by  the  Supreme  Court’s  Decision  in  MGM 
v.  Grokster,  Disproportionate  Statutory  Liability 
for  Secondary 
Copyright  Infringement  Will  Chill  Innovation  if  Not  Congressionally 
Reformed 

(A) Clarity about Confusion: The Consequence of the Court’s Ruling 

In  MGM  v.  Grokster,  the  question  asked  by  the  parties  and  dozens  of  amici  was 
direct  and  critically  important:  ‘‘When  will  a  technology  vendor  be  held  secondarily 
liable  for  the  direct  copyright  infringements  committed  by  third  parties  using  its 
products?’’  Asked  specifically  to  clarify  the  reach  of  copyright  law’s  existing  sec-
ondary  liability  doctrines  of  ‘‘contributory’’  and  ‘‘vicarious’’  liability,2 the  Court  in-
stead announced a new doctrine called ‘‘inducement,’’ holding that ‘‘one who distrib-
utes  a  device  with  the  object  of  promoting  its  use  to  infringe  copyright,  as  shown 
by clear expression or other affirmative steps taken to foster infringement, is liable 
for  the  resulting  acts  of  infringement  by  third  parties.’’  MGM  v.  Grokster,  545  U.S. 
125 S. Ct. 2764, 2771 (2005). 

While the new doctrine of inducement presents its own uncertainties for prospec-
tive  litigants  and  lower  courts  to  grapple  with  in  the  years  to  come,3 P2P  United 
and  EFF  believe  that  the  more  significant  prospective  difficulty  for  technology 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

innovators and investors now lies in the continued uncertainty surrounding the tra-
ditional  copyright  doctrines  of  contributory  infringement,  on  which  the  Court  was 
deeply split,4 and vicarious liability, on which it was essentially silent.5 

For  many  years,  technologists  and  their  financial  backers  relied  on  what  seemed 
to  be  a  relatively  ‘‘bright  line’’  test  for  secondary  copyright  liability  announced  in 
the Supreme Court’s landmark ‘‘Betamax’’ ruling in 1984.6 Unfortunately, the spate 
of  litigation  launched  against  P2P  companies  since  1999  has  muddied  the  waters, 
with  the  rulings  in  the  Napster,  Aimster,  and  initial  Grokster  cases  charting  dif-
ferent courses though each of three branches of secondary liability. 

The  Supreme  Court’s  opinion  now  leaves  technology  companies,  their  attorneys 
and  their  backers  to  pick  their  way  through  a  dangerous  minefield  of  legal  uncer-
tainties  profoundly  antagonistic  to  economic  progress  and  deeply  hostile  to  contin-
ued innovation. Even if they assiduously avoid so much as the appearance of ‘‘induc-
ing’’ copyright infringement, America’s innovators must still guess as to whether or 
when  they  might  be  held  liable  for  distributing  a  multipurpose  electronic  device  or 
software program. 

Moreover,  not  only  can  they  still  be  sued  under  either  or  both  of  the  doctrines 
of  contributory  infringement  and  vicarious  liability,  but  history  tells  us  that  they 
probably  will  be  sued.  That’s  exactly  what  happened  as  the  first  VCR  and  the  first 
digital  audio  tape  recorder  came  to  market.  More  recently,  ReplayTV  was  sued  in 
2001  for  their  improved  digital  video  recorder  because,  according  to  the  then-CEO 
of  the  Turner  Broadcasting  System,  commercial  skipping  by  consumers  constituted 
‘‘theft.’’ 7 

Even as the Committee meets today, entertainment industry executives are mak-
ing  threatening  statements  about  the  latest  electronic  marvel.  Called  the  Slingbox, 
the  device  and  its  associated  software  will  enable  you  to  watch  your  TV  program-
ming  from  wherever  you  are  by  turning  virtually  any  Internet-connected  computer 
into your personal TV.8 
(B) Remedy Remediation: A Measured and Targeted Solution 

P2P United and EFF do not propose that the Commerce Committee undertake to 
rewrite  the  doctrines  of  secondary  copyright  liability.  We  do  believe,  however,  that 
there is one sphere in particular in which Congress can and should act in a targeted 
fashion to reduce the chilling effect on innovators of ongoing uncertainty in this area 
of the law. 

Almost uniquely in American jurisprudence, our copyright laws permit a plaintiff 
in an action for infringement to opt out of actually proving the extent to which they 
were  harmed  by  copyright  infringement  in  favor  of  receiving  so-called  ‘‘statutory 
damages.’’  Under  Section  504(c)  of  U.S.  Code  Title  17,  anytime  up  to  the  moment 
that  judgment  is  handed  down,  the  plaintiff  may  invoke  its  rights  to  collect  (in  the 
court’s discretion) between $750 and $150,000 for every individual copyrighted work 
infringed. This legal regime makes good sense when brought to bear against a com-
mercial  pirate  making  and  selling  millions  of  counterfeit  music  CDs,  for  example. 
It  may  well  be  dangerously  counterproductive,  however,  if  applied  in  secondary  li-
ability  cases  to  a  technology  company  that  makes  electronic  products  used  by  mil-
lions of consumers over whom the companies have no control. 

This  danger  is  especially  sobering  when  made  concrete.  Apple  initially  promoted 
its  phenomenal  iPod  with  an  extensive  ad  campaign  exhorting  the  public  to  ‘‘Rip, 
Mix  &  Burn’’  and  1,000,000  iPods  were  sold  in  its  first  20  months  on  the  market 
even though it worked only with Apple’s own Macintosh computers! As of the begin-
ning  of  this  month,  Apple  had  reportedly  sold  over  21  million  iPods  since  the  first 
calendar  quarter  of  2002.9 Even  the  earliest  version  of  the  device  could  store  well 
over  1,000  songs  and  the  largest,  with  a  60gB  drive,  now  holds  upwards  of  15,000 
songs. 

At even the minimum $750 per infringing song, and a now paltry 1,000 songs per 
device sold to date, it is thus a mathematical fact that—under contributory infringe-
ment,  vicarious  liability,  or  ‘‘inducement’’  theories—Apple  still  could  be  sued  for 
statutory  damages  in  excess  of  $15  trillion  for  its  users’  allegedly  unlawful  copying 
of  music!  We  do  not  suggest  that  this  result  is  likely,  but  the  fact  that  it  is  even 
legally possible should be profoundly troubling, to say the least. 

Faced  with  potentially  crippling  statutory  liability,  what  will  the  next  generation 
of  garage  inventors,  like  Apple’s  own  founders,  or  their  possible  investors  choose  to 
do with their as-yet-uninvented breakthrough devices? What price will our economy 
pay  for  highly  rational  risk-aversion  on  the  part  of  young  geniuses,  their  expert 
counsel, and savvy investors? 

Most critically, is the somewhat extraordinary status quo with respect to available 
statutory damages really where the balance between protecting intellectual property 
and encouraging innovation and economic growth should be struck? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

EFF  and  P2P  United  believe  that  the  answer  to  this  last  inquiry  should  and  can 
be  a  resounding  ‘‘no.’’  We  respectfully  urge  you  and  Co-Chairman  Inouye  to  lead  a 
collaborative  committee  (and  inter-committee)  process  designed  to  produce  a  mean-
ingful  copyright  statutory  damages  clause  in  the  current  Congress.  Specifically,  we 
request and recommend that statutory damages be limited by law to cases of direct 
copyright  infringement  as  perpetrated  by  commercial  pirates,  and  thus  made  ex-
pressly  unavailable  in  cases  involving  secondary  liability  (including  those  brought 
under  the  Court’s  new  inducement  test).  We  respectfully  submit,  that  such  reform 
would  strike  the  appropriate  balance  that  today’s  hearing  was  expressly  designed 
to illuminate. 

On the one hand, it would still permit copyright owners to obtain both injunctive 
relief and actual damages, thus putting them in the same position as litigants under 
most other areas of common law. On the other, corporate and individual technology 
innovators and investors once again would be able to make reasonable business de-
cisions  about  manageable  levels  of  legal  risk,  rather  than  face  the  all-too-real  spec-
ter of corporate capital punishment in an unpredictable legal environment. The real 
beneficiaries of such a balance, of course, will be American consumers, the Nation’s 
economy and, ultimately, copyright owners whose fortunes also depend on new tech-
nologies  (their  many  attempts  to  kill  them  in  the  cradle  notwithstanding)  to  create 
new and market-making business opportunities. 
II. The Supreme Court’s Ruling in MGM v. Grokster Will Have Virtually No 
Practical Effect on the Digital Downloading of Music, but Congress Can 
and  Should  Take  Rational,  Non-Statutory  Steps  Now  to  Maximize  the 
Potential of Peer to Peer Technology for all Music Rightsholders 
(A) Lawsuits and Traditional Licensing are Poor Instruments of Public Policy 

In  the  past  2  years,  the  digital  music  marketplace  has  seen  significant  activity 
and  change.  However,  it  simply  cannot  be  credibly  argued  that  the  music  industry 
has  not  experienced—and  continues  to  face—an  enormous  failure  of  both  imagina-
tion and the market for licensed digital downloading. 

To be sure, the four companies that control 90 percent of the current music ‘‘cata-
log’’  have  licensed  a  relative  few  new  services  to  distribute  what  mostly  amounts 
to  presently  popular  music  online.  Apple’s  iTunes,  for  example,  recently  celebrated 
the  500,000th  a  la  carte  download  of  a  $0.99  song.  Moreover,  in  that  same  period, 
the  Recording  Industry  Association  of  America  has  brought  over  11,000  lawsuits 
against  individuals  accused  of  illegal  downloading  and,  if  present  trends  continue, 
will collect more than $36 million in settlement of those claims.10 

The  music  and  movie  industries  have  spent  millions  more  to  otherwise  educate 
the  public  that  such  downloading  is  wrong  and  has  serious  consequences,  both  for 
downloaders, and for artists and copyright holders, not compensated for their works. 
Not  incidentally,  P2P  United—as  an  organization  and  through  its  individual  mem-
bers’  websites—also  has  done  its  best  to  get  out  that  message  while  our  members 
also affirmatively promote the work of independent artists who have embraced P2P 
distribution  of  their  music.  Certainly  not  least  of  course,  the  entertainment  indus-
tries  have  now  obtained  a  unanimous  ruling  from  the  Supreme  Court  which  after 
further  litigation,  they  hope,  will  shutter  the  doors  of  P2P  United’s  members  and 
dissuade  other  software  developers  from  inventing  even  more  efficient  peer-to-peer 
programs. 

As the June issue of Rolling Stone magazine put it, however, ‘‘One thing is clear: 
The  lawsuits  have  failed  to  stop,  or  even  slow,  illegal  file-sharing.’’ 11 Indeed,  the 
unvarnished  fact  is  that  peer-to-peer  usage  is  much  more  widespread  than  it  was 
a  year  ago  and  well  more  than  double  what  it  was  this  time  in  2003.  According  to 
the most recent independent analysis by Big Champagne (essentially the Nielsen or 
Arbitron  ratings  of  the  Internet)—and  notwithstanding  massively  publicized  litiga-
tion  against  individuals  and  companies—P2P  usage  last  month  reached  nearly  9 
million  simultaneous  users  with  access  to  over  a  billion  song  files.  In  August  of 
2003,  a  month  prior  to  the  first  round  of  RIAA  consumer  lawsuits,  there  were  3.85 
million P2P users. 

By  contrast,  it  has  recently  been  estimated  that  the  total  number  of  songs  now 
available for download through the iTunes and Rhapsody subscription services total 
fewer than 2.75 million tracks. Even if only a far-too-conservative one in five music 
files available through peer-to-peer software each day are taken to be unique songs, 
at  least  60  times  more  music  files  are  available  each  day  through  P2P  technology 
than  are  presently  available  to  consumers  through  the  two  primary  licensed  chan-
nels. 

More lawsuits are not going to change that reality. Writing the day before the Su-
preme  Court’s  ruling  in  MGM  v.  Grokster,  Ms.  Hillary  Rosen,  former  head  of  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

RIAA, made a forceful case for new thinking and a new view of P2P software devel-
opers by her former colleagues in the music industry: 

‘‘It is said that the Supreme Court’s decision will be one of the most important 
copyright  cases  ever  on  the  books.  I  think  it  has  all  the  makings  of  being  fa-
mous for another reason. Because while the victory of whoever wins maybe im-
portant psychologically, it just won’t really matter in the marketplace. . . . 
‘‘So  why  won’t  this  case  matter  now  in  the  marketplace?  Because  by  now  SEV-
ERAL HUNDRED MILLION copies of this software that the entertainment in-
dustry  would  like  to  vanquish  have  been  downloaded  to  individual  computers 
around  the  world.  . . .  And  now,  a  majority  of  them  are  hosted  outside  the 
United  States.  There  is  no  court  ruling  whose  enforcement  can  keep  up  with 
this. Sure, it might affect some venture capitalist deciding where to put money 
for  a  product.  But  none  of  these  services  since  Napster  have  required  venture 
money. They grow organically, because they are serving a still unserved desire. 
Do people like free content, sure, but they also like content. All the stuff—when 
they  want  it—to  feel  like  free  even  if  it  might  not  be  free.  . . .  And  the  enter-
tainment industry is still far too often spending time comparing the profit mar-
gins  and  risk  of  new  ideas  to  an  earlier  time  when  the  world  was  less  dig-
ital. . . . 
‘‘So  here  is  the  crux  of  the  problem.  [P2P]  services  have  traffic  at  a  rate  40  to 
50 times the traffic of legitimate sites. Yet, the amount of time and money wast-
ed on besting the game by the entertainment and technology industries is huge. 
This  volume  needs  to  be  embraced  and  managed  because  it  cannot  be  van-
quished. And a tone must be set that allows future innovation to stimulate nego-
tiation and not just confrontation (emphasis added).’’ 12 

Ms.  Rosen  was  equally  emphatic  in  her  appeal  for  a  pragmatic  view  of  the  mar-

ketplace after the Court’s opinion was handed down the following day: 

‘‘ . . .  knowing  we  were  right  legally  really  still  isn’t  the  same  thing  as  being 
right  in  the  real  world.  We  had  that  euphoria  with  the  first  Napster  decision. 
I  hope  my  former  colleagues  remember  that.  The  result  was  lots  of  back  and 
forth  and  leverage  hunting  on  both  sides  and  continued  litigation  and  then  a 
great  service  shut  down  to  make  room  for  less  great  services.  And  more  legal 
victories  didn’t  bring  more  market  control  no  matter  how  many  times  it  was 
hoped it would. 
‘‘The euphoria of this decision does not and should not change the need for the 
entertainment  industry  to  push  forward  and  embrace  these  new  distribution 
systems.  . . .13 For  today,  I  hope  all  sides  will  take  a  deep  breath  and  realize 
that  this  Supreme  Court  decision  doesn’t  change  one  bit  their  responsibility  to 
move forward together on behalf of their consumer.’’ 14 

P2P United and EFF share Ms. Rosen’s clear (and clear-eyed) view that P2P tech-
nology  will  only  become  more  available  with  time,  that  demand  for  its  convenience 
and content will continue to increase, and that the current battles surrounding P2P 
file  sharing  thus  are  a  losing  proposition  for  all  parties  concerned,  including  con-
sumers.  We  believe  that  the  path  forward  lies  in  aligning  the  incentives  of  the  en-
tertainment industry with those of new Internet technologies in pursuit of a market-
place in which all musical artists and copyright holders are fairly compensated and 
such  compensation  is  maximized  because  consumer  demand  in  all  its  present  and 
future forms is truly met. 

With  this  goal  and  these  realities  in  mind,  P2P  United  and  EFF  urge  the  Com-
mittee  to  begin  considering  ways  in  which  Congress  might  clear  the  path  for  solu-
tions based on voluntary collective licensing. 
(B)  Voluntary  Collective  Licensing  for  Downloaded  Music  Merits  Serious,  Congres-

sionally-Convened Discussion by All Relevant Stakeholders 

What  we  propose  is  not  unusual,  unknown  in  the  marketplace  or  conceptually 

complex. Indeed, the concept is familiar and simple. 

First,  the  music  industry  (labels  and  music  publishers)  with  representatives  of 
artists and songwriters would form one or more voluntary collecting societies. These 
societies then would offer music consumers the opportunity to download music law-
fully in exchange for a modest regular payment, perhaps $5–$10 per month.15 

So  long  as  they  pay  into  the  collective,  consumers  would  be  free  to  keep  doing 
what they now do by the millions every day . . . and are clearly going to do anyway: 
download and share the music they love using whatever software they like on what-
ever computer platform they prefer. Under this system, however, they would be able 
to  do  so  without  fear  of  litigation.  Moreover,  the  money  collected  would  be  divided 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

among all rightsholders—whether signed to a major record label or not—based upon 
the professionally measured popularity of their music. 

The  more  people  who  share,  the  more  money  will  be  available  to  rightsholders. 
The  more  competition  in  competing  file-sharing  products,  the  more  rapid  techno-
logical innovation and improvement will be. The more freedom for music aficionados 
to share what they care about, the deeper the available catalog to the benefit of all 
parties’ in the system. 

If  this  system  of  voluntary  collective  licensing  seems  familiar,  that’s  because  it 
has been in use to excellent effect for decades. In the face of a seemingly intractable 
impasse  between  a  then-new  technology  and  copyright  owners,  ASCAP,  BMI  and 
SESAC were brought into existence by songwriters to bring broadcast radio in from 
the  copyright  cold  in  the  first  half  of  the  twentieth  century.  Songwriters  originally 
viewed  radio  exactly  the  way  the  music  industry  today  views  P2P  users—as  ‘‘pi-
rates.’’  After  trying  to  sue  radio  out  of  existence,  songwriters  ultimately  formed 
ASCAP  (and  later  BMI  and  SESAC).  Radio  stations  interested  in  broadcasting 
music  stepped  up,  paid  a  fee,  and  in  return  got  to  play  whatever  music  they  liked, 
using whatever equipment worked best. 

Today, the performing rights societies pay out hundreds of millions of dollars an-
nually  to  their  artists.  Although  these  societies  also  have  received  some  criticism, 
there  can  be  no  question  that  the  system  that  has  evolved  for  radio  is  preferable 
to  one  based  on  fruitlessly  trying  to  sue  radio  into  extinction  one  broadcaster  at  a 
time. 

Beginning  in  this  respected  committee,  P2P  United  and  EFF  believe  that  Con-
gress  can  and  should  encourage  detailed  and  serious  evaluation  of  the  potential  of 
voluntary collective licensing in at least two important ways: 

First,  the  Register  of  Copyrights,  Marybeth  Peters,  recently  proposed  reforms  to 
copyright  law  that  would  make  it  easier  for  existing  collecting  rights  societies  like 
ASCAP,  BMI  and  SESAC  to  grant  blanket  licenses  for  digital  downloads.16 We  be-
lieve  that  her  proposal  is  sound  and,  if  adopted,  would  have  the  added  benefit  of 
establishing  marketplace  prerequisites  for  testing  the  full-range  of  collective  licens-
ing possibilities. 

For example, as we read the Register’s proposal, it would create ‘‘music rights or-
ganizations’’  legally  empowered  to  grant  blanket  licenses  directly  to  music  con-
sumers on behalf of songwriters. Because this proposal requires adjustments to both 
copyright  and  antitrust  law  within  the  purview  of  the  Federal  Trade  Commission, 
it  would  appear  to  present  a  productive  opportunity  for  inter-committee  collabora-
tion on these matters. 

While adoption of the Register’s proposal would be an important first step, it only 
addresses the music publishing side of the music industry. Any comprehensive solu-
tion must also involve major and independent record labels. Presently, no collecting 
society  represents  the  major  labels  or  can  grant  a  blanket  license  directly  to  music 
consumers. Under current law, the highly concentrated nature of the industry, with 
just  four  companies  controlling  more  than  90  percent  of  the  market,  such  coordina-
tion  presents  antitrust  challenges.  Here,  too,  we  see  an  opportunity  for  this  com-
mittee  to  begin  collaboratively  exploring  options  that  might  remove  this  obstacle  to 
an  otherwise  viable  and  desirable  market-oriented  licensing  solution  for  the  bur-
geoning digital music sector of the economy. 

The  advantages  of  such  a  collective  licensing  approach  are  potentially  legion  and 

mutually reinforcing: 

file sharing—is legitimized and actively encouraged; 18 

compensable music downloads not likely to cease or slow; 

• Artists and rightsholders will get paid for what are now literally billions of non- 
• Government  intervention  in  the  market  will  be  minimal  (limited  to  encourage-
ment  and  oversight),  and  collecting  societies  will  set  their  own  prices  in  re-
sponse to market forces; 17 
• Broadband deployment will get a real boost as the so-called ‘‘killer app’’—music 
• Investment dollars will pour into the newly legitimized market for digital music 
file-sharing  software  and  services,  prompting  an  explosion  of  different  service 
offerings and devices; 19 
• Music fans finally will have completely legal access to the essentially unlimited 
selection  of  music  that  only  a  network  built  from  the  collections  of  other  fans 
can  provide.  With  the  threat  of  litigation  and  defensive  file  ‘‘spoofing’’  elimi-
nated,  these  networks  will  rapidly  improve  and  grow,  affording  millions  more 
consumers access to rare recordings long unavailable in the marketplace; 
• The  distribution  bottleneck  that  has  limited  the  opportunities  of  independent 
artists  and  placed  them  at  the  economic  mercy  of  the  major  record  labels  for 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

decades will be eliminated. Artists will be able to choose any road to online pop-
ularity—including,  but  no  longer  limited  to,  a  major  label  contract.  So  long  as 
their songs are being shared among fans, they will be paid; 20 and 
• Payment  will  come  only  from  those  who  are  interested  in  downloading  music, 

and only so long as they are interested in downloading. 

Conclusion 

As  sensible  as  we  hope  the  idea  of  voluntary  collective  licensing  now  seems,  the 
RIAA  and  the  major  corporations  that  it  represents  have  dismissed  the  idea  and 
have  refused  to  engage  in  any  discussion  of  the  subject  with  appropriate  stake-
holders.  Accordingly,  we  respectfully  request  that  this  committee  either  hold  hear-
ings on this issue, or—at minimum—formally invite all relevant parties (public and 
private sector alike) to a series of roundtable discussions of collective licensing’s po-
tential  to  unleash  the  true  market  power  and  potential  of  peer-to-peer  technology 
and, with it, the genius of American technological innovation. 

P2P  United  and  the  Electronic  Frontier  Foundation  thank  you  again  for  the  op-
portunity  to  participate  in  these  proceedings,  Mr.  Chairman.  As  proposed,  we  hope 
for similar opportunities in the near future. 
ENDNOTES 

1 J.  Mitchell,  ‘‘Free  Man  in  Paris’’  released  on  ‘‘Court  &  Spark’’  (  1973;  Crazy 

Crow Music). 

2 Each theory of liability is independent of the other and requires proof of two ele-
ments. Contributory infringement may arise when a defendant knows about infring-
ing  activity  and  materially  contributes  to  it,  while  vicarious  liability  requires  proof 
that  a  defendant  profits  directly  from  the  infringement  and  has  a  right  and  ability 
to supervise the direct infringer. 

3 EFF and P2P United believe that the attached Consumer Electronics Association 
‘‘one-pager’’  on  the  MGM  v.  Grokster  decision  (recently  solicited  by  the  Congres-
sional  Internet  Caucus  Advisory  Committee)  states  these  concerns  very  well.  We 
here  submit  it  for  the  record  and  wish  to  underscore  CEA’s  conclusion  that:  ‘‘This 
new  legal  ambiguity  [as  to  what  constitutes  culpable  inducement]  will  not  enhance 
America’s  competitiveness.  Foreign  firms  will  continue  to  receive  funding  and  ship 
products  free  from  concern  about  overreaching  IP  litigation,  while  their  American 
counterparts  will  need  to  demonstrate  compliance  with  Grokster’s  ambiguous  legal 
test.’’ 

We  also  concur  with  the  recently  reported  remarks  of  Mr.  James  Burger,  outside 
counsel  to  Intel,  who  warned  against  the  potential  that  the  discovery-intensive  liti-
gation  required  by  the  Court’s  new  inducement  standard  could  give  rise  to  a  form 
of  ‘‘greenmail’’  directed  at  small  companies  by  large  plaintiffs  who  might  demand 
significant  settlement  fees  in  exchange  for  dropping  baseless,  but  potentially  ruin-
ous,  litigation.  N.  Graham  &  A.  Mazumdar,  ‘‘Parsing  Grokster . . . ,’’  BNA  Pat-
ent,Trademark & Copyright Journal, Vol. 7 No. 1728 at 327 (July 15, 2005). 

4 Concerning  contributory  liability  standards,  Justice  Breyer,  joined  by  Justices 
O’Connor and Stevens, adopted and endorsed the views expressed by EFF and many 
of  the  other  technology  sector  amici,  declaring  that  ‘‘Sony’s  rule  is  strongly  tech-
nology protecting . . . . Sony thereby recognizes that the copyright laws are not in-
tended to discourage or to control the emergence of new technologies, including (per-
haps especially) those that help disseminate information and ideas more broadly or 
more  efficiently.’’  MGM  v.  Grokster,  125  S.  Ct.  at  2791.  Justice  Ginsburg,  joined  by 
Chief  Justice  Rehnquist  and  Justice  Kennedy,  rejected  the  bright-line  interpreta-
tion.  Unmoved  by  the  argument  that  Sony  bars  a  finding  of  contributory  infringe-
ment  unless  a  technology  is  almost  exclusively  used  for  infringement,  Justice  Gins-
burg  declared,  ‘‘Sony,  as  I  read  it,  contains  no  clear,  near-exclusivity  test.’’  Id  at 
2784 n.1. 

5 Having disposed of the case on inducement grounds, the Court did not reach the 
vicarious liability theories briefed by the parties, merely restating that the doctrine 
‘‘allows imposition of liability when the defendant profits directly from the infringe-
ment  and  has  a  right  and  ability  to  supervise  the  direct  infringer.’’  MGM  v. 
Grokster,  125  S.  Ct.  at  2776  &  n.9.  By  contrast,  the  lower  courts  in  MGM  v. 
Grokster responded in some detail to the diametrically opposing views of the parties 
regarding vicarious liability. The entertainment industry had argued that the ability 
to  redesign  a  product  to  reduce  infringing  uses  ought  to  be  deemed  equivalent  to 
a  ‘‘right  and  ability  to  supervise’’  the  customers  who  use  the  technology.  The  P2P 
defendants replied that such a ‘‘could have designed it differently’’ test would effec-
tively  force  technology  companies  to  redesign  their  products  to  suit  the  demands  of 
copyright  owners.  On  this  point,  the  Solicitor  General’s  amicus  brief  before  the  Su-
preme Court sided with the defendant/respondents: ‘‘The ‘right and ability to super-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

vise’  element  of  vicarious  liability . . . has  never,  to  our  knowledge,  been  held  to 
be  satisfied  by  the  mere  fact  that  the  defendant  could  restructure  its  relations  or 
its product to obtain such an ability.’’ Brief for the United States as Amicus Curiae 
Supporting  Petitioners  at  20  n.3,  available  at:  www.eff.org/IP/P2P/MGMl 
vlGrokster/050124lUSlAmicuslBrl04–480.pdf. 

6 When two motion picture studios sued Sony in 1976 for selling the first Betamax 
VCR,  they  did  so  under  a  contributory  liability  theory.  In  that  case,  Sony  v.  Uni-
versal  City  Studios,  464  U.S.  417  (1984),  the  Supreme  Court  announced  the 
‘‘Betamax  doctrine,’’  holding  that  a  technology  vendor  could  not  be  held  liable  for 
distributing  a  technology  ‘‘capable  of  substantial  noninfringing  uses.’’  Because  the 
Betamax VCR was plainly capable of noninfringing uses, the Supreme Court did not 
hold  Sony  liable.  Since  the  Court’s  Sony  ruling,  the  technology  and  entertainment 
industries  characterized  the  scope  of  the  ‘‘Betamax  defense’’  very  differently.  Tech-
nologists  saw  a  bright-line  rule:  so  long  as  a  technology  is  merely  capable  of  non-
infringing  uses  in  commerce,  it  is  legal  to  distribute,  regardless  of  how  some  (or 
even most) customers might actually use it. Hollywood movie studios and the music 
industry,  in  contrast,  read  the  case  much  more  narrowly,  reasoning  that  Sony  was 
only  excused  from  liability  because  a  principal  use  of  the  Betamax  device  (as  they 
have interpreted the decision) was noninfringing. 

7 See  extended  interview  with  Mr.  Jamie  Kellner  entitled  ‘‘Content’s  King,’’ 
Cableworld  (April  29,  2002)  [‘‘JK:  It’s  theft.  Your  contract  with  the  network  when 
you get the show is you’re going to watch the spots. Otherwise you couldn’t get the 
show  on  an  ad-supported  basis.  Any  time  you  skip  a  commercial  or  [press]  the  [30- 
second  advance]  button  you’re  actually  stealing  the  programming.’’  The  full  text  of 
this  sobering  interview  is  available  online  at:  www.2600.com/news/050102-files/ 
jamie-kellner.txt. 

8 The ‘‘crime’’ Slingbox’s developers may have committed is permitting a consumer 
who has paid for programming at home to ‘‘sling’’ that same programming to a sin-
gle remote location or portable device so that it may be enjoyed while the consumer 
is away from home. See A. Wallenstein, ‘‘Slingbox Could Spark New Lawsuit,’’ Hol-
lywood  Reporter  (July  6,  2005),  also  at:  www.hollywoodreporter.com/thr/article 
ldisplay.jsp?vnulcontentlid=1000973572. 

9 See  generally  Apple’s  online  archive  of  such  data  at  www.apple.com/pr/library. 
10 As  of  early  last  month,  the  RIAA  reportedly  had  brought  11,456  lawsuits  and 
collected  an  average  of  $3,600  from  each  of  almost  2,500  defendants.  See  S. 
Knopper,  ‘‘RIAA  Will  Keep  On  Suing,’’  Rolling  Stone  (June  9,  2005)  at:  www.roll 
ingstone.com/news/story/l/id/7380412/?pageid=rs.Home&pageregion=single1&rn 
d=1122320285908&has-player=true&version=6.0.12.872. 

11 See S. Knopper, ‘‘RIAA Will Keep On Suing,’’ Rolling Stone (June 9, 2005), cited 

above at n.10. 

12 See  H.  Rosen,  ‘‘The  Supreme  Wisdom  of  Not  Relying  on  the  Court,’’  The  Huff-
ington  Post  (June  26,  2005)  at:  www.huffingtonpost.com/theblog/archive/hilary- 
rosen/the-supreme-wisdom-of-notl3221.html. 

13 The  absence  in  the  current  market  of  P2P  software  providers  licensed  to  pro-
mote  the  labels’  own  online  music  downloading  services,  or  to  make  licensed  music 
available  directly  to  the  public,  is  not  due  to  a  lack  of  effort  by  P2P  developers  to 
obtain such contracts. As early as 2001, the original Napster pleaded with the major 
labels  for  such  a  license,  reportedly  offering  a  billion  dollars  in  royalties.  More  re-
cently,  as  Chairman  Smith’s  Competition  Subcommittee  heard  in  direct  testimony 
in  June  of  last  year,  P2P  United  member  Streamcast  (the  makers  of  the  Morpheus 
software also at issue in the Supreme Court’s opinion) was poised to finalize a con-
tract  with  RealNetworks  to  promote  the  major  labels’  own  ‘‘Rhapsody’’  subscription 
service to millions of Morpheus’ P2P software users. With only a signature between 
Streamcast and such a license, the Streamcast business development executive who 
sought  the  deal  was  told  twice  in  a  voice  mail  recording  previously  provided  to  the 
Commerce  Committee  that  Streamcast  had  been  ‘‘blacklisted’’  by  ‘‘the  labels’’  and 
that  RealNetworks  thus  could  not  consummate  the  otherwise  fully  negotiated  deal. 
A  transcript  of  that  voice  mail  recording  is  again  submitted  for  the  record  and  the 
full Committee’s consideration. 

14 See  H.  Rosen,  ‘‘The  Wisdom  of  the  Court,  Part  II,’’  The  Huffington  Post  (June 
27,  2005)  online  at:  www.huffingtonpost.com/theblog/archive/hilary-rosen/the-wis-
dom-of-the-court-l3259.html. 

15 This hypothetical price is based upon Yahoo’s Y! Music Unlimited, which offers 
consumers  unlimited  access  to  more  than  1  million  songs  for  as  little  as  $4.99  per 
month. See http://music.yahoo.com/unlimited/. 

16 Statement  of  Marybeth  Peters,  Register  of  Copyrights,  hearing  on  ‘‘Music  Li-
censing  Reform’’  before  the  Subcommittee  on  Courts,  the  Internet,  and  Intellectual 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

Property,  Committee  on  the  Judiciary,  U.S.  House  of  Representatives,  109th  Con-
gress,  1st  Session,  June  21,  2005.  See  www.copyright.gov/docs/regstat062105.html. 
17 The  $5  per  month  figure  noted  above  is  a  suggestion,  not  a  proposed  mandate. 
Because collecting societies will make more money with a palatable price and a larg-
er  base  of  subscribers  than  with  a  higher  price  and  expensive  enforcement  efforts, 
the market may be relied upon to keep consumer pricing reasonable. 

18 Moreover,  such  a  system  will  further  drive  demand  for  broadband  communica-
tions  services  and,  with  greater  broadband  delivery  of  musical  content,  the  more 
revenue  major  corporate  copyright  industries  will  get  paid.  Under  such  cir-
cumstances,  the  entertainment  industries’  powerful  lobby  may  be  expected  to  begin 
affirmatively  working  for  an  expansive  and  innovation-driven  Internet,  instead  of 
against it. 

19 Rather  than  being  limited  to  a  handful  of  ‘‘authorized  services’’  like  Apple’s 
iTunes  and  Napster  2.0,  the  market  is  likely  to  give  rise  to  competing  file-sharing 
applications  and  ancillary  services.  Moreover,  so  long  as  individual  consumers  are 
licensed,  technology  companies  need  not  worry  about  negotiating  the  nearly  impos-
sible  maze  of  current  music  licensing  requirements  and  may  focus  instead  on  pro-
viding  the  public  with  the  most  attractive  products  and  services  in  a  competitive 
marketplace. 

20 Indeed,  the  ability  of  independent  artists  to  negotiate  as  they  may  choose  with 
one  or  more  record  labels  will  only  be  enhanced  by  their  ability  to  document  and 
quantify  their  revenue-generating  potential  and  overall  popularity  with  certified 
download  royalty  data.  For  the  fist  time  in  history,  under  a  voluntary  collective  li-
censing  regime,  independent  artists  may  well  be  able  to  truly  bargain  at  arm’s 
length with major music industry conglomerates. 

IMPACT OF THE SUPREME COURT GROKSTER DECISION BY THE CONSUMER 

ELECTRONICS ASSOCIATION 

About CEA: The Consumer Electronics Association (CEA) is the preeminent trade 
association  promoting  growth  in  the  consumer  technology  industry  through  tech-
nology policy, events, research, promotion and the fostering of business and strategic 
relationships.  CEA  represents  more  than  2,000  corporate  members  involved  in  the 
design,  development,  manufacturing,  distribution  and  integration  of  audio,  video, 
mobile  electronics,  wireless  and  landline  communications,  information  technology, 
home  networking,  multimedia  and  accessory  products,  as  well  as  related  services 
that  are  sold  through  consumer  channels.  Combined,  CEA’s  members  account  for 
more than $121 billion in annual sales. 

CEA  Position:  We  are  pleased  that  the  Supreme  Court  preserved  the  core  prin-
ciple  of  the  ‘‘Betamax’’  decision,  where  as  the  mere  distribution  of  a  product  that 
has substantial non-infringing uses does not expose a distributor to contributory in-
fringement.  In  other  words,  the  Court  said  that  infringing  business  models,  rather 
than the technology itself, should determine liability. 

However,  we  are  concerned  with  the  Court’s  establishment  of  an  inducement 
standard and how it will be interpreted by the lower courts. The ambiguity created 
by  this  standard  will  generate  an  uncertain  legal  environment  for  innovators  and 
investors,  since  the  Court  provided  minimal  guidance  as  to  what  acts  qualify  as 
‘‘bad behavior.’’ 

For  example,  does  the  marketing  phrase  ‘‘Rip,  Mix,  Burn’’  qualify  as  inducement 
to  infringe?  What  if  you  are  developing  a  product  with  knowledge  that  you  could 
make  your  technology  more  ‘‘infringement  proof ’’  merely  by  tripling  the  cost  of  de-
velopment? If you don’t do so, are you inducing? 

We  expect  that  corporate  counsels  and  investors  will  now  err  on  the  side  of  cau-
tion when deciding whether to introduce innovative new products and services. This 
is  especially  true  now  that  litigation  will  go  to  the  issue  of  intent,  making  it  very 
difficult  to  have  an  infringement  suit  dismissed  quickly  on  summary  judgment.  In-
stead, entrepreneurs will face expansive discovery rules examining the notes of engi-
neering meetings, marketing plans and e-mails of executives. 

This  new  legal  ambiguity  will  not  enhance  America’s  competitiveness.  Foreign 
firms  will  continue  to  receive  funding  and  ship  products  free  from  concern  about 
overreaching  IP  litigation,  while  their  American  counterparts  will  need  to  dem-
onstrate compliance with Grokster’s ambiguous legal test. 

We will not realize the overall impact of this decision until it is tested in the lower 
courts.  We  hope  that  the  9th  Circuit  interprets  this  decision  narrowly,  implicating 
only the specific marketing statements at issue in this case. 

CEA  will  continue  to  work  for  a  pro  innovation  environment,  while  cooperating 

with the content industry on developing legitimate business models. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

TRANSCRIPT OF VOICEMAIL MESSAGE FORWARDED TO MICHAEL WEISS,  CEO  OF 
STREAMCAST BY STREAMCAST VICE PRESIDENT OF BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT, 
ELIZABETH COWLEY LEFT BY REAL NETWORKS’  GENERAL MANAGER OF CONSUMER 
PRODUCTS, RYC BROWNRIGG (SEPTEMBER 8, 2003) 
‘‘Hey,  Elizabeth.  It’s  Ryc  [Rick]  Brownrigg.  Rhapsody  and  Listen  are  one  in  the 
same.  Rhapsody  is  the  service  that’s  offered  by  the  Listen  team,  which  is  now  our 
San Francisco team. 

Unfortunately,  the  licenses  for  the  ability  to  stream  to  Rhapsody  come  from  the 
labels,  as  you  are  aware.  And  the  labels  have  blacklisted  you  guys.  So  that  is  the 
problem we’ve got. Basically, what they’re saying is you’ve got to denounce P2P and/ 
or resolve the lawsuit—is what you have to do. 

And  so,  until  they  resolve  the  lawsuit  they’re  going  to  keep  you  on  the  blacklist, 
which  means  I’m  probably  not  going  to  get  much  latitude  to  do  anything  as  far  as 
Rhapsody  goes.  So,  I  mean,  I’m  still  willing  to  give  you  the  client  and  work  with 
you  on  the  client,  but  unfortunately,  I’m  not  going  to  be  able  to  do  anything  as  far 
as helping you with the service in any short order. 

So  if  you  want  to  give  me  a  call  [NUMBER  OMITTED],  we  can  chat  about  it 
more,  but  I  don’t  know  if  this  is  still  of  interest  to  you  to  work  with  us  being  as 
you have this limitation. Talk to you later. Bye.’’ 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Our  next  witness  is  Gregory  Kerber,  Chairman  and  CEO  of 
Wurld  Media,  Incorporated,  which  is  the  creator  of  a  peer-to-peer 
platform  currently  in  its  test  phase  and  has  signed  partnerships 
with  Sony,  BMG,  Music  Entertainment,  Universal  Music  Group, 
Warner Music Group, and EMI. 

We’re interested in your comments, Mr. Kerber. 
STATEMENT OF GREGORY G. KERBER, CHAIRMAN AND CEO, 

WURLD MEDIA, INC. 

Mr.  KERBER.  On  behalf  of  Wurld  Media,  I’d  like  to  thank  the 
Chairman  and  Co-Chairman  and  every  member  of  the  Committee 
of Commerce, Science, and Transportation for conducting this hear-
ing  and  the  effects  of  the  U.S.  Supreme  Court  decision  in  MGM  v. 
Grokster, as delivered by the Justice Souter on June 27, 2005. 

My  name  is  Greg  Kerber.  I’m  Chairman  and  CEO  of  Wurld 
Media,  an  advanced  technology  company  located  in  Saratoga 
Springs, New York, and that’s Upstate New York. 

Wurld  began  in  1999  as  a  small  technology  company  and  was 
funded  and  capitalized  by  family,  friends,  and  founders  who  be-
lieved  in  the  future  of  the  industry  and  believed  in  the  future  of 
this  new  economy,  called  ‘‘digital  media.’’  Wurld  has  developed  a 
platform for the secure sale and scalable distribution of copyrighted 
protected digital media. The company’s platform is called Peer Im-
pact, which he will be launching to the public on August 5th, next 
week—features  an  architecture  and  enables  music  copyright  hold-
ers,  computer  gaming  companies,  video  producers,  movie  studios, 
book publishers, and other digital media owners to securely propa-
gate their content across a peer impact network for legitimate sale 
to, and download from, any Peer Impact-connected computer on our 
network. 

The  advancement  in  peer-to-peer  technology  creates  an  endless 
capability  to  provide  every  kind  of  digital  media  to  consumers  in 
a  safe  environment  free  from  viruses,  unauthorized  content,  child 
pornography,  spyware,  and  identity  gatherers,  while  at  the  same 
time  providing  the  ability  to  have  parental  controls  and  ensuring 
that  all  the  rights-holders  in  the  value  chain  receive  payment  for 
their  creative  works.  This  is  just  the  tip  of  the  iceberg,  as  far  as 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

we  are  concerned.  These  advanced  technologies  are  now  beginning 
to  enable  the  virtualization  and  creation  of  the  supply  chain 
through new and emerging businesses. 

This  hearing  is  important,  because  it  is  exploring  the  effects  of 
the  decision  in  the  Grokster  case.  Without  going  into  any  kind  of 
legal  analysis  of  the  case,  because  I’m  not  an  attorney,  I  can  say 
that,  as  a  business  person  running  a  legitimate  peer-to-peer  busi-
ness, this decision clearly illustrates that our system of government 
is  working  to  achieve  the  correct  balance  between  protecting  the 
consumer, the creators of intellectual property, and that of advanc-
ing technology. 

Prior  to  the  decision,  the  primary  motivating  elements  in  any 
evolution  of  peer-to-peer  technology  was  the  avoidance  of  culpa-
bility, not for the sake of innovation or enhancing the consumer ex-
perience.  It  was  acceptable  and  lawful  to  allow  illegal  activity  to 
exist  and  to  thrive  within  a  network  if  the  system  was  simply  de-
signed to appear uncontrollable, something we called the Franken-
stein Monster Scheme. 

One  of  the  many  negative  outcomes  of  this  lawlessness  is  the 
rampant  content  of  child  pornography  that  proliferates  on  illegal 
peer-to-peer  networks.  The  United  States  General  Accounting  Of-
fice,  in  conjunction  with  many  others,  the  Customs  Cyber-
Smuggling  Center  detailed  study  of  peer-to-peer  networks  and  dis-
covered  that  when  using  innocuous  searches,  with  search  terms 
routinely used by children, 56 percent of the results returned were 
pornographic  in  nature.  This  decision  now  forces  these  bad  actors 
to  be  accountable.  There  are  no  longer—they  can  no  longer  ignore 
laws that have been put in place to protect the economy, the devel-
opment  of  intellectual  property,  and,  most  importantly,  the  future: 
our children. 

This  decision  allows  companies  like  ours  to  be  able  to  grow  and 
prosper and compete fairly in the marketplace based upon meeting 
consumers’  needs,  providing  a  safe  environment  and  not  having  to 
compete  with  business  models  that  are  based  upon  stealing  con-
tent. 

The  benefits  from  this  decision  include  what—that  we  will  be 
able  to  provide  employment  opportunities  to  citizens  of  Upstate 
New  York,  Southern  California,  and  right  here  in  Washington, 
D.C.,  as  we  rapidly  expand  our  staffing  to  keep  up  with  new  con-
tent partners and to continue the evolution of our network. 

Innovation  is  not  gone,  but,  rather,  it’s  just  beginning.  In  addi-
tion to providing jobs for U.S. citizens, we will be able to contribute 
to the Nation’s gross national product, pay taxes, and, as we launch 
our  services  in  other  areas  of  the  globe,  contribute  to  the  reversal 
of the balance of payments. 

The benefits from this decision include that of the consumer. The 
consumer  wins  as  we  will  be  able  to  provide  a  product  to  con-
sumers that creates convenience, choice, and family safety. 

Our peer-to-peer partnership include not only the copyright-hold-
er and the creator of the original works, but the consumer, as well, 
who  can  now  be  involved  in  the  economic  distribution  of  digital 
media.  The  consumer  will  find  a  limitless  choice  in  a  world  con-
nected  by  a  network  that  contains  all  the  content  they  want,  but 
not  having  to  be  concerned  about  their  personal  information  at 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

risk,  that  their  children  are  going  to  be  viewing  inappropriate  ma-
terial,  or  that  they’re  downloading  viruses  or  Trojan  horses  that 
will, at some point in the future, take over their operating system, 
or  that  they  are  doing  something  online  that  they  would  never 
dream of doing at a store, which is stealing works that others have 
created, without paying for them. 

The  benefits  from  this  decision  include  that  venture  capital  can 
once again feel safe in investing in advanced technologies in legiti-
mate peer-to-peer services without the fear of impending litigation. 
Anecdotally,  I  should  note  that  the  interest  in  our  company  from 
top-tier venture capital community immediately following this deci-
sion  has  been  pretty  overwhelming.  The  decision  finally  provides 
firm  basis  upon  which  the  pirates  and  bad  actors  can  be  distin-
guished  from  the  legitimate  businesses,  permitting  capital  flow 
once  again  into  those  advanced  Technology  companies  that  we  can 
be  proud  of  on  the  world  stage;  businesses  that  will  provide  em-
ployment  for  U.S.  citizens  instead  of  those  businesses  that  hide 
themselves in the dark corners of other countries to avoid the laws 
of  the  U.S.;  companies  that  will  now  be  able  to  convert  their  nas-
cent  industry  into  one  that  the  country  can  be  proud  of  and  can 
exist without relying on illegal, immoral activities. 

The  benefits  from  this  decision  include  that  legitimate  industry 
can solidly emerge and prosper. The industry is an advanced tech-
nology  industry  that  respects  the  intellectual  property  of  the  con-
tent  creator  by  properly  remunerating  those  who  make  contribu-
tions  throughout  the  value  chain.  It’s  unlimited  and  global  in  na-
ture,  and  now  provides  a  level  playing  field  in  which  innovation 
can flourish and a business can compete fairly. 

Let me summarize by saying this. The decision will positively af-
fect  the  future  development  of  advanced  technology  for  media  dis-
tribution  and  the  associated  hardware  and  software  industries. 
This  decision  puts  to  rest  that  they  serve  to  hold  the  consumer- 
friendly  new  advances  in  stasis.  Venture  capital  can  now  invest  in 
legitimate  businesses,  knowing  with  certainty  they  will  be  able  to 
compete fairly on the quality of their offerings. 

We look forward to continuing to provide a safe place for intellec-
tual property, so that the creation of original works can be inspired 
and retain its valued place in our society. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Kerber follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF GREGORY G. KERBER, CHAIRMAN AND CEO, 

WURLD MEDIA, INC. 

On  behalf  of  Wurld  Media,  Inc.,  I  thank  Chairman  Stevens  and  Co-Chairman 
Inouye—and every Member of the Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transpor-
tation—for  conducting  this  hearing  on  the  effects  of  the  U.S.  Supreme  Court  deci-
sion in MGM v. Grokster as delivered by Justice Souter on June 27, 2005. 

I  am  Greg  Kerber,  Chairman  and  CEO  of  Wurld  Media,  an  advanced  technology 
company  located  in  Saratoga  Springs,  New  York.  Wurld  began  in  1999  as  a  small 
technology  company,  capitalized  by  family  and  friends,  who  believe  in  the  future  of 
this  industry.  Wurld  Media  has  developed  a  platform  for  the  secure  sale  and  scal-
able distribution of copyright-protected digital media. The company’s platform, Peer 
ImpactTM,  features  an  architecture  that  enables  music  copyright  holders,  computer 
gaming  companies,  audio  book  publishers  and  other  digital  media  owners  to  se-
curely  propagate  their  content  across  the  Peer  Impact  network  for  legitimate  sale 
to,  and  download  from,  any  Peer  Impact  connected  computer.  This  advancement  in 
peer-to-peer  technology  creates  endless  capabilities  to  provide  every  kind  of  digital 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

media  to  consumers,  in  a  safe  environment,  free  from:  viruses,  unauthorized  con-
tent,  child  pornography,  spyware,  and  identity  gatherers,  while  at  the  same  time 
providing  the  ability  to  have  parental  controls  and  ensuring  that  all  rightsholders 
in  the  value  chain  receive  payment  for  their  creative  works.  This  is  just  the  tip  of 
the iceberg as far as we are concerned. These advanced technologies are now begin-
ning  to  enable  the  virtualization  of  the  supply  chain  through  new  and  emerging 
businesses. 

This hearing is important because it is exploring the effects of the decision in the 
Grokster  case.  Without  going  into  any  kind  of  legal  analysis  of  the  case,  as  I  am 
not  a  lawyer,  I  can  say  that  as  a  businessman,  running  a  legitimate  peer-to-peer 
business,  this  decision  clearly  illustrates  that  our  system  of  government  is  working 
to  achieve  the  correct  balance  between  protecting  the  creators  of  intellectual  prop-
erty and that of advanced technology. Prior to this decision, the primary motivating 
elements  in  any  evolution  of  peer-to-peer  technology  was  the  avoidance  of  culpa-
bility,  not  for  the  sake  of  innovation  or  enhancing  consumer  experience.  It  was  ac-
ceptable  and  lawful  to  allow  illegal  activity  to  exist  and  to  thrive  within  a  network 
if  the  system  was  simply  designed  to  appear  to  be  uncontrollable.  One  of  the  many 
negative  outcomes  of  this  lawlessness  is  the  rampant  child  pornography  that  pro-
liferates on the illegal peer-to-peer networks. The United States General Accounting 
Office,  in  conjunction  with,  among  others,  the  Customs  CyberSmuggling  Center, 
conducted a detailed study of peer-to-peer networks and discovered that when using 
innocuous searches, with search terms routinely used by children, 56 percent of the 
results  returned  were  pornographic  in  nature. 1 This  decision  now  forces  these  bad 
actors  to  be  accountable.  They  can  no  longer  ignore  laws  that  have  been  put  into 
place to protect the economy, the development of intellectual property, and, most im-
portantly,  our  children.  This  decision  allows  companies  like  ours  to  be  able  to  grow 
and  prosper  and  compete  fairly  in  the  marketplace  based  upon  meeting  consumer 
needs, providing a safe environment and not having to compete with business mod-
els that are based upon stealing content. 

The benefits from this decision include that we will be able to provide employment 
opportunities for the citizens of upstate New York and beyond as we rapidly expand 
our  staffing  to  keep  up  with  new  content  partners  and  to  continue  the  evolution  of 
our  network.  Innovation  is  not  gone,  but  rather,  just  beginning.  In  addition  to  pro-
viding jobs for U.S. citizens, we will be able to contribute to this Nation’s gross na-
tional product, pay taxes, and as we launch our services in other areas of the globe, 
contribute to the reversal of the balance of payments. 

The benefits from this decision include that the consumer wins as we will be able 
to provide a product to consumers that creates convenience, choice and family safe-
ty. Our peer-to-peer partnerships include not only the copyright holder and the cre-
ator  of  original  works,  but  the  consumer  as  well,  who  can  now  be  involved  in  the 
economics  of  distribution.  The  consumer  will  find  a  limitless  choice  in  a  world  con-
nected  by  a  network  that  contains  all  the  content  they  want  but  not  having  to  be 
concerned  that  their  personal  information  is  at  risk,  that  their  children  are  going 
to be viewing inappropriate material or that they are downloading viruses or Trojan 
horses  that  will,  at  some  time  in  the  future,  take  over  their  operating  system,  or 
that  they  are  doing  something  online  that  they  would  never  dream  of  doing  in  a 
store; stealing works that others have created without paying for them. 

The  benefits  from  this  decision  include  that  venture  capital  can  once  again  feel 
safe in investing in advanced technologies, in legitimate peer-to-peer services, with-
out  the  fear  of  impending  litigation.  Anecdotally,  I  should  note  that  the  interest  in 
our  company  from  the  venture  capital  community  immediately  following  the  deci-
sion has been overwhelming. This decision finally provides a firm basis upon which 
the pirates and bad actors can be distinguished from legitimate businesses, permit-
ting  capital  to  flow  once  again  into  those  advanced  technology  companies  that  we 
can be proud of on the world stage; businesses that will provide employment of U.S. 
citizens  instead  of  those  businesses  hiding  themselves  in  the  dark  corners  of  other 
countries  to  avoid  the  laws  of  the  U.S.;  companies  that  will  now  be  able  to  convert 
this  nascent  industry  into  one  that  this  country  can  be  proud  of  and  that  can  exist 
without relying on illegal and immoral activities. 

The  benefits  from  this  decision  include  that  a  legitimate  industry  can  solidly 
emerge and prosper. That industry is an advanced technology industry that respects 
the  intellectual  property  of  content  creators  by  properly  remunerating  those  who 
make  contributions  throughout  the  value  chain,  is  unlimited  and  global  in  nature, 
and now provides a level playing field upon which innovation can flourish and busi-
nesses can compete fairly. 

1 ‘‘File-Sharing Programs, Peer-to-Peer Networks Provide Ready Access to Child Pornography,’’ 

United States General Accounting Office, February 2003. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

Let me summarize by saying that this decision will positively affect the future de-
velopment  of  advanced  technology  for  media  distribution  and  the  associated  hard-
ware  and  software  industries.  This  decision  puts  to  rest  questions  that  had  served 
to hold many consumer-friendly new advances in stasis. Venture capital can now in-
vest in legitimate businesses, knowing with certainty that they will be able to com-
pete  fairly  and  on  the  quality  of  their  offerings.  We  look  forward  to  continuing  to 
provide  a  safe  place  for  intellectual  property  so  that  the  creation  of  original  works 
can be inspired and retain its valued place in our society. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Our next witness is Mark Heesen, President of the National Ven-
ture Capital Association, representing 450 venture capital and pri-
vate equity firms, accounting for more than 85 percent of U.S. ven-
ture funding. 

Mr. Heesen? 

STATEMENT OF MARK G. HEESEN, PRESIDENT, 

NATIONAL VENTURE CAPITAL ASSOCIATION 

Mr. HEESEN. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
The  venture-capital  sector  has  grown,  since  its  inception  just  50 
years ago, to become a major force in the U.S. economy. In fact, in 
2003,  venture-capital-funded  companies  were  directly  responsible 
for 9.4 percent of all U.S. private-sector employment, as well as 9.6 
percent of all companies’ sales in the United States. 

To  be  able  to  make  this  type  of  impact  on  the  U.S.  economy,  as 
well as on the lives of every American, VCs invest with a particular 
emphasis  on  emerging  companies  in  the  information  technology, 
communications,  and  life-science  industries.  These  areas,  in  par-
ticular,  have  been  where  we  have  found  that  destructive  tech-
nologies,  those  which  upset  the  status  quo,  but  in  the  long  run 
produce exponential societal, financial, and technological advances, 
reside. 

Disruptive technologies, by their very nature, often put on notice 
entrenched  older  interests  that  their  primacy  in  a  particular  area 
is at risk. If they wish to continue to succeed, they have a decision 
to  make,  whether  they  move  forward  in  helping  to  usher  in  the 
new model or to stay wedded to a business model no longer accept-
ed in the marketplace. 

Such a dynamic makes the venture-capital community the finan-
cial lynchpin to technology and medical advances, and, thus, a hero 
to  many,  while  simultaneously  making  us  a  black  hat  as  the  de-
structors of the status quo on the other. The MGM v. Grokster deci-
sion is emblematic of this. 

Prior  to  the  Supreme  Court’s  decision  in  Grokster,  the  venture 
community  was  deeply  concerned  that  any  erosion  of  the  bright- 
line  protection  provided  in  Sony  v.  Universal  for  disruptive  prod-
ucts that are capable of substantial non-infringing uses would have 
a  chilling  effect  on  innovation  and  product  design  by  developers  of 
multi-use  technologies  and  services.  We  believe  that  the  Supreme 
Court’s  decision  in  Grokster  is  favorable  to  the  venture-capital  in-
dustry,  insofar  as  the  court  rejected  the  studio’s  strong  efforts  to 
cut  back  on  the  protections  for  innovative  technologies  that  have 
the potential for substantial non-infringing uses. 

With  the  Sony  bright-line  rule  intact,  hopefully  only  those  play-
ers who willfully promote copyright infringement will be subject to, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

and  should  be  subject  to,  potential  liability  for  secondary  infringe-
ment of copyrights. 

Unfortunately,  the  entertainment  industry  has  never  been  satis-
fied with attacking direct instances of infringement. For more than 
a  century,  the  industry  has  attacked,  in  turn,  each  new  develop-
ment,  each  destructive  technology  that  facilitates  copying  and  dis-
tribution, from phonographs to mimeographs, from audiotape play-
ers to VCRs, from compact discs to mp3 players. As each new tech-
nology has developed the industry has sought to destroy or control 
it, sometimes extending their attacks to the inventors who created, 
and the investors who funded, that product or service. 

The Grokster decision reaffirmed the principle that new products 
and  services  will  be  protected,  provided  they  are  capable  of  sub-
stantial  non-infringing  uses.  Entrepreneurs  and  their  investors 
should  be  able  to  move  forward  in  developing  novel  products  with-
out constant concern that some unforeseen future use could impose 
ruinous liability. 

Venture capitalists believe in the power of the market. The mar-
ket,  rather  than  the  Federal  courts,  should  drive  investment  deci-
sions. Unfortunately for everyone involved, the Supreme Court left 
many  liability  questions  outside  of  the  Sony  bright-line  protection 
unanswered  in  Grokster.  For  venture  capital  firms,  this  additional 
legal  uncertainty  will  continue  to  make  us  less  inclined  to  invest 
in  this  critical  information  technology  at  a  time  when  the  rest  of 
the world is quickly catching up to our expertise in this area. 

As  lower  Federal  courts  begin  to  study  and  apply  the  Grokster 
decision,  NVCA  believes  that  we  all  have  an  opportunity  here  for 
some  breathing  space,  one  in  which  technologies  can  continue  to 
emerge.  There  should  be  no  rush  to  judgment  from  any  sector,  be 
it  from  the  entertainment  or  technology  communities  or  investors 
or Congress. However, if the entertainment industry decides to ini-
tiate even greater volumes of litigation against inventors, investors, 
and their destructive technologies, Congress may need to return its 
focus to this issue. 

Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Heesen follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARK G. HEESEN, PRESIDENT, 

NATIONAL VENTURE CAPITAL ASSOCIATION 

Thank you for the opportunity to share the views of the National Venture Capital 
Association  (NVCA).  NVCA  represents  the  interests  of  more  than  470  venture  cap-
ital  firms  in  the  United  States,  which  together  account  for  more  than  85  percent 
of venture funding. As the only national trade group for the venture community, the 
NVCA’s  mission  is  to  foster  public  awareness  of  the  vital  role  that  venture  funding 
plays  in  driving  the  United  States  economy  and  to  advocate  public  policies  that 
stimulate entrepreneurship and innovation. 

While the importance of venture capital firms and the companies they fund to the 
United States economy is difficult to quantify, recent studies estimate that, in 2003, 
venture-backed  businesses  were  responsible  for  more  than  10.1  million  American 
jobs  and  accounted  for  more  than  $1.8  trillion  of  the  United  States  Gross  Domestic 
Product  (GDP).1 Such  economic  mainstays  as  Intel,  Federal  Express,  Home  Depot, 
Genentech, Google, and Starbucks were incubated with venture funding. Each year, 
venture firms invest more than $18 billion in start-up companies across the country, 
which  accounts  for  an  estimated  72  percent  of  all  venture  investment  worldwide.  A 

1 See  Global  Insight,  Venture  Impact  2004:  Venture  Capital  Benefits  to  the  U.S.  Economy  1 

(2004). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

decidedly  American  phenomenon,  venture  capital  funds  and  the  companies  they 
back provide a key differentiator animating American economic growth. 

The  NVCA’s  members  invest  with  a  particular  emphasis  on  emerging  companies 
in the information technology, communications, and life sciences industries. In addi-
tion  to  providing  early  funding  to  young  businesses  unable  to  secure  capital  from 
more traditional sources, NVCA’s member firms take an active role in guiding nas-
cent  businesses  through  their  start-up  and  middle  phases.  They  work  with  the  en-
trepreneurs  and  management,  lending  their  experience  and  expertise  while  devel-
oping long-term partnerships. 

NVCA’s member firms accordingly have a unique perspective on the hurdles that 
emerging  businesses  confront  and  the  background  conditions  that  promote  or  stifle 
growth  and  innovation.  Prior  to  the  Supreme  Court’s  decision  in  MGM  v.  Grokster, 
NVCA’s  member  firms  were  deeply  concerned  that  any  erosion  of  the  bright-line 
protection  provided  in  Sony  Corporation  of  America  v.  Universal  City  Studios,  Inc. 
for  products  that  are  ‘‘capable  of  substantial  noninfringing  uses’’  would  have  a 
chilling  effect  on  innovation  and  product  design  by  developers  of  multiple-use  tech-
nologies and services. 

We  believe  that  the  Supreme  Court’s  decision  is  favorable  to  the  venture  capital 
industry  in  so  far  as  the  Supreme  Court  rejected  the  studios’  strong  efforts  to  cut 
back  on  the  protections  for  innovative  technologies  that  have  the  potential  for  sub-
stantial  non-infringing  uses.  With  this  bright-line  rule  intact,  hopefully  only  those 
players who willfully promote copyright infringement will be subject to—and should 
be  subject  to—potential  liability  for  secondary  infringement  of  copyrights.  A  com-
pany or a venture capital firm that brings to market technologies that have the po-
tential  for  legitimate,  non-infringing  uses,  and  that  markets  the  technologies  based 
on those non-infringing uses, should remain protected from secondary liability, even 
though other third parties might discover ways with the technologies to infringe on 
copyrights. 

NVCA’s  members  are  pleased  that  a  new  standard  for  contributory  infringement 
as  proposed  by  the  petitioners  in  Grokster  was  not  created.  Such  a  standard  would 
have  been  virtually  impossible  for  venture  capital  firms  to  accommodate  in  making 
their  initial  investment  decisions,  when  the  potential  commercial  applications  of  a 
promising  concept  are  still  far  in  the  future.  Having  said  this,  NVCA  is  concerned 
that  Grokster’s  long-term  impact  could  still  be  very  problematic  for  technology  ad-
vancement  in  general  and  the  VC  community  specifically.  Such  malleable  stand-
ards—vague  in  their  formulation  and  unpredictable  in  their  application—could  in-
vite courts to second-guess design decisions and expose venture firms to potentially 
ruinous litigation. 
Attacking Innovation 

Any technology or service that makes it possible to copy or distribute information 
can  be  used  for  copyright  infringement.  The  list  of  such  technologies—which  today 
includes  computers,  the  Internet,  and  e-mail,  as  well  as  CD  burners,  iPods,  and 
peer-to-peer file sharing—is extensive, as is the range of their legitimate uses. Mod-
ern  life  would  be  impossible  to  envision  without  such  ‘‘dual  use’’  technologies.  In-
deed,  these  ‘‘technologies  of  freedom’’—which  allow  the  rapid  spread  of  information 
free of decentralized control—are critical to our modern democracy, as well as to our 
productivity and economic well-being. 

Freedom,  however,  is  sometimes  abused.  There  are,  and  always  have  been,  those 
who  would  abuse  the  power  afforded  them  by  new  technologies  to  copy  and  dis-
tribute works that belong to others. Existing copyright laws provide severe penalties 
for such direct infringement, recognizing that the few who are caught must provide 
an example and deterrent for others. 

But the entertainment industry has never been satisfied with attacking direct in-
stances  of  infringement.  For  more  than  a  century,  when  it  first  claimed  that  the 
player piano spelled the death of American music, the industry has attacked in turn 
each  new  development  that  facilitates  copying  and  distribution,  from  phonographs 
to  mimeographs,  from  audiotape  players  to  VCRs,  from  compact  disks  to  mp3  play-
ers.  As  each  new  technology  has  developed,  the  industry  has  sought  to  destroy  or 
control it, often extending their attacks to the inventors who created and the inves-
tors who funded the product or service. 

Fortunately, these attacks have been largely unsuccessful. (And their failure, iron-
ically,  has  been  good  for  the  entertainment  industry  itself,  which  has  in  the  long 
run  benefited  hugely  from  the  new  methods  of  distribution.)  Under  the  bright-line 
rule  established  by  the  Court  in  Sony,  technologies  and  services  that  are  ‘‘capable 
of  substantial  noninfringing  uses’’  are  protected  from  secondary  copyright  liability, 
regardless  of  whether  (or  how  many)  others  use  those  technologies  and  services  for 
direct  infringement  of  copyrights.  Responsibility  for  copyright  infringement  rests 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

where  it  belongs:  on  the  shoulders  of  those  who  abuse  products  to  infringe  copy-
rights,  not  on  those  who  create  or  invest  in  products  capable  of  substantial  non-in-
fringing uses. 

This  bright-line  protection  has  been  critical  to  technological  progress.  Entre-
preneurs  have  been  able  to  develop  novel  products  without  worrying  that  illegit-
imate  uses  could  impose  ruinous  liability.  Because  markets  take  time  to  develop, 
and because the future uses to which a product may one day be put (both legitimate 
and  illegitimate)  are  not  necessarily  evident  in  its  early  phases,  Sony  allows  an  in-
novation  to  incubate  without  fear  that  third-party  infringement  (present  or  future) 
will invite litigation. 
Sony Bright-Line Rule Critical To Capital Investment 

‘‘[E]very  invention  is  born  into  an  uncongenial  society,  has  few  friends  and  many 
enemies.’’ 2 In  Sony,  the  Supreme  Court  fashioned  a  margin  of  protection  for  such 
nascent technologies. The Court articulated a bright-line rule for determining liabil-
ity  under  the  doctrine  of  contributory  infringement  that  armed  inventors  and  prod-
uct  developers—and  those  who  fund  them—with  the  knowledge  that  a  technology 
or service with legitimate uses would not be driven out of the market because some 
or even most customers may use the product to infringe copyrights. 

The  Court’s  bright-line  rule  in  Sony  has  been  the  midwife  for  the  technological 
revolution  of  the  past  two  decades.  It  is  not  by  chance  that  the  Sony  decision  coin-
cided  with  a  period  of  unprecedented  innovation  and  technological  progress.  By  es-
tablishing a bright-line rule that protects new products and services—and the inves-
tors—provided  they  are  ‘‘capable  of  substantial  noninfringing  uses,’’  Sony  has  pro-
vided  critical  assurance  to  entrepreneurs  that  they  could  develop  novel  ideas  and 
products  without  worrying  that  some  unforeseen  future  use  could  impose  ruinous 
liability. 

Entrepreneurs  frequently  invent  new  products  without  any  clear  picture  of  their 
potential  uses,  secure  in  the  belief  that  a  good  idea  will  eventually  find  a  market. 
That  others  could  use  the  invention  for  copyright  infringement  is  and  should  be  ir-
relevant  to  the  question  whether  the  product  or  process  can  be  placed  in  service  of 
alternative,  legitimate  ends.  One  cannot  even  begin  to  count  the  staples  of  modern 
life—radios,  typewriters,  tape  recorders,  cameras,  photocopiers,  computers,  fax  ma-
chines,  cassette  players,  cell  phones,  CD  burners,  DVD  players,  e-mail,  cable 
modems  and  DSL  for  high-speed  Internet  access,  Internet  search  engines  such  as 
Google  and  Yahoo,  TiVos,  and  mp3  players  such  as  the  iPod—that  can  be  used  to 
infringe copyrights and yet have perfectly legitimate uses that we increasingly could 
not  do  without.  Peer-to-peer  networks  are  another  such  innovation,  whether  used 
to  share  photos  among  family  and  friends,  to  promote  the  music  of  a  new  band,  or 
to share research among scholars. 

The  Sony  case  itself  provides  the  best  illustration  of  the  fact  that  products  often 
arrive before their primary markets emerge. At the time that case was decided, the 
Betamax  was  used  primarily  for  copying  shows  from  over-the-air  broadcasts,  either 
to  build  a  library  of  such  shows  or  simply  to  engage  in  time-shifting.3 The  primary 
dispute  between  the  majority  and  the  dissent  concerned  whether  time-shifting  was 
itself  a  fair  use  of  the  copyrighted  material.4 But  the  Betamax  and  its  ultimately 
more successful competitor, the VHS VCR, quickly evolved into something quite dif-
ferent: a means of viewing lawfully rented movies. A whole industry grew up to pro-
vide  legitimate  materials  for  a  product  that  the  entertainment  industry  sought  to 
crush  in  its  infancy.  That  was  possible  only  because  the  Court  in  Sony  provided  a 
protected space in which these legitimate uses could grow. In that case, as in many 
others, the product created its own legitimate market. 

The entertainment industry in its Supreme Court brief on Grokster suggested that 
the Sony test encourages bad behavior by inventors and product designers who hide 
behind  its  protections  in  order  to  make  money  off  infringement.5 That  is  certainly 
possible  but,  as  we  argued  in  our  Amicus  Curiae  brief,  that  it  is  not  a  reason  to 
change  the  Sony  bright-line  test  established  by  the  Supreme  Court.  The  Justices 
agreed with our line of thinking in Grokster. As long as a product is capable of sub-
stantial,  non-infringing  uses,  it  is  a  socially  useful  product,  whose  development 
should be encouraged. Abuse of the product should be attacked, not the product itself, 
nor  the  inventor  behind  it,  nor  the  venture  capitalist  who  funded  the  venture.  If  a 

2 Joel Mokyr, The Lever of Riches: Technological Creativity and Economic Progress 183 (1990) 

(internal quotation marks omitted). 

3 See  464  U.S.  at  423  (surveys  by  both  respondents  and  Sony  ‘‘showed  that  the  primary  use 
of the machine for most owners was ‘time-shifting,’ ’’ although surveys also showed ‘‘that a sub-
stantial number of interviewees had accumulated libraries of tapes’’). 

4 Id. At 442, 447–56; id. At 477–86 (Blackmun, J., dissenting). 
5 See Motion Picture Studio Pet. Br. 9–11, 27–29; U.S. Br. 17; Am. Tax Reform Br. 13–15. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

company  materially  assists  or  encourages  specific  acts  of  infringement—whether 
through customer support mechanisms or other communications—secondary liability 
might well be appropriate.6 But the mere acts of developing, advertising, marketing, 
upgrading,  and  supporting  a  multi-use  product  that  is  capable  of  substantial  non- 
infringing uses should be protected, without necessitating a fact-specific, inherently 
amorphous inquiry into the motivations and incentives of the inventor.7 

It  is  critical  to  understand  that  the  threat  of  secondary  liability  from  copyright 
suits  is  qualitatively  different  from  most  other  sorts  of  business  risk  that  investors 
can  insure  against  or  build  into  their  risk  calculations.  The  mandatory  mechanism 
of statutory damages—designed to discourage direct infringement—has crushing im-
plications  for  vendors  of  multi-purpose  technologies,  where  damages  from  unfore-
seen  users  can  quickly  mount  in  the  millions  and  even  billions  of  dollars.  And  the 
indeterminate reach of such secondary liability means that not merely start-up cap-
ital is at risk, but also the personal wealth of start-up’s officers, directors, and inves-
tors.8 The  litigation  risk  in  such  circumstances  is  wholly  one-sided:  minimal  attor-
neys’ fees for the plaintiffs versus financial annihilation for the defendants. It would 
be impossible to create a more chilling environment for creativity and product devel-
opment.9 
Standards  Proposed  By  Entertainment  Industry  Would  Deter  Investment 

And Innovation 

In  their  Grokster  briefs  before  the  Supreme  Court,  both  the  petitioners  and  the 
United  States  asked  the  Court  to  replace  Sony’s  clear  rule  of  law  with  malleable 
legal  standards  that  would  trade  certainty  for  legal  risk.  Moving  from  the  bright- 
line  Sony  rule  to  any  sort  of  malleable  standard—with  its  attendant  loss  of  cer-
tainty—would undermine investment in innovative technology. 

The  evolution  of  the  business  model  for  the  VCR  at  issue  in  Sony  demonstrates 
the danger of predicting a future pattern of use. While the studios predicted on the 
basis of early experience that the VCR would destroy the movie business, video and 
DVD  rentals  and  sales  currently  generate  substantially  more  revenue  than  movie 
theaters.10 When  industry  executives  cannot  accurately  predict  the  direction  of  the 
market, a legal standard that asks the Federal courts to engage in such predictions 
has little to recommend itself. 

The  iPod,  which  has  been  responsible  for  the  resurgence  of  Apple,  has  a  similar 
story line. Apple first invited customers to ‘‘rip, mix, and burn’’ their favorite music 
when  releasing  its  iTunes  software  in  January  2001  and  then  embedding  it  on  the 
latest  version  of  the  iMac  personal  computer.11 The  iPod  followed  later  that  year, 

6 See,  e.g.,  Cable/Home  Communication,  902  F.2d  at  837–39  (active  promotion  of  television 
signal  de-scrambling  chips);  Sega  Enters.  Ltd.  v.  MAPHIA,  948  F.  Supp.  923,  933  (N.D.  Cal. 
1996) (Internet bulletin board operator actively encouraged users to upload copyrighted games). 
7 NVCA takes no position on whether, on the record here, the defendants in Grokster materi-

ally assisted or encouraged specific acts of infringement. 

8 The prospect of such litigation is far from theoretical. In addition to suing Napster, for exam-
ple,  the  recording  industry  has  brought  suit  against  venture  capital  firms  and  other  investors 
that  provided  early  funding.  See  In  re  Napster,  Inc.  Copyright  Litig.,  Nos.  C–MDL–00–1369– 
MHP  &  C–04–1166–MHP,  2005  WL  273178,  at  *1  (N.D.  Cal.  Feb.  03,  2005)  (discussing  suit 
versus  venture  capital  firm  Hummer  Winblad  Venture  Partners);  UMG  Recordings,  Inc.  v. 
Bertelsmann  AG,  222  F.R.D.  408,  413–14  (N.D.  Cal.  2004)  (discussing  suit  against  investor 
Bertelsmann).  Indeed,  after  driving  mp3.com  into  bankruptcy  and  acquiring  its  assets,  the  stu-
dios have even brought suit against the lawyers that performed corporate work for mp3.com in 
its  start-up  phase.  Jon  Healey,  MP3.com  Sues  Former  Copyright  Counsel,  L.A.  Times,  Jan.  19, 
2002, at C2. These scorched-earth litigation tactics are expressly designed to discourage the de-
velopment  of  any  product  that  is  capable  of  infringing  uses—a  complete  inversion  of  the  Sony 
rule. 

9 See Mark A. Lemley & R. Anthony Reese, Reducing Digital Copyright Infringement Without 
Restricting Innovation, 56 Stan. L. Rev. 1345, 1388 (2004) (discussing how the threat of liability 
has deterred innovation among computer programmers); Joseph P. Liu, The DMCA and the Reg-
ulation  of  Scientific  Research,  18  Berkeley  Tech.  L.J.  501  (2003)  (discussing  ways  in  which 
threat  of  liability  under  the  Digital  Millennium  Copyright  Act  deters  innovation  in  field  of 
encryption);  Assaf  Hamdani,  Who’s  Liable  for  Cyber-wrongs?,  87  Cornell  L.  Rev.  901  (2002) 
(demonstrating  that  threat  of  secondary  liability  has  led  to  over-deterrence);  Matthew  Fagin, 
Frank  Pasquale  &  Kim  Weatherall,  Beyond  Napster:  Using  Antitrust  Law  to  Advance  and  En-
hance  Online  Music  Distribution,  8  B.U.  J.  Sci.  &  Tech.  L.  451,  500  (2002)  (‘‘Innovation  in  the 
technologies  of  distribution  will  decline  markedly  if  potential  new  innovators  are  chilled  by  a 
threat of legal action’’). 
10 See note 8, supra. 
11 See  Dennis  Sellers,  Jobs:  iTunes  Is  New,  Free  Jukebox  Software  (Jan.  9,  2001),  available 
at  http://www.macworld.com/news/2001/01/09/itunes/index.php.  The  first  mp3  commercial 
players  were  developed  several  years  earlier,  and  the  music  industry  immediately  filed  suit  to 
enjoin their sale. See Recording Indus. Ass’n of Am. v. Diamond Multimedia Sys., Inc., 180 F.3d 
1072 (9th Cir. 1999) (suit against Rio portable mp3 music player). It is only because of the legal 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

with an initial 5 gigabit version that could hold up to 1,000 songs. Apple was imme-
diately attacked by the major studios and accused of inciting theft.12 But it was not 
until  April  2003  that  Apple  launched  its  iTunes  online  music  store,  after  reaching 
agreements  with  all  of  the  major  studios  to  sell  the  ability  to  download  individual 
songs  or  entire  CDs.  In  the  first  quarter  of  2005  alone,  Apple  reported  licensed  on-
line  music  sales  of  roughly  $275  million,  and  it  is  now  selling  1.25  million  songs 
per  day.  Just  as  licensed  video  sales  and  rentals  have  eclipsed  movie  theaters  in 
revenues, it appears clear that licensed online downloads will eclipse CDs. But nei-
ther could do so without the protection afforded by Sony for mixed-use technologies. 
Peer-to-peer  sharing  is  likely  to  provide  yet  another  example  if  permitted  to  de-
velop.  Thanks  to  a  file-sharing  technology  called  BitTorrent,  millions  of  users  were 
able to quickly download and view ‘‘lengthy amateur videos documenting the devas-
tation of the December tsunami in the Indian Ocean, helping to spur an outpouring 
of charitable aid.’’ 13 BitTorrent’s main use, however, appears to be among those who 
want  to  trade  Hollywood  movies  and  TV  shows,  thus  ‘‘putting  it  in  the  cross  hairs 
of the entertainment industry.’’ 14 The technology obviously is capable of substantial 
non-infringing  uses;  subjecting  the  inventor  to  ruinous  liability  would  deprive  the 
marketplace  and  consumers  of  the  opportunity  to  develop  a  legitimate  market  for 
those uses.15 
Conclusion 

The  clear  rule  of  law  that  the  Supreme  Court  articulated  in  Sony  has  provided 
the  backdrop  for  an  unprecedented  period  of  technological  growth  and  innovation. 
That  revolution  in  informational  technology,  in  turn,  has  been  responsible  for  the 
creation of millions of jobs in the United States, directly and indirectly contributing 
billions of dollars to the GDP. Replacing the Sony rule with a more amorphous, fact- 
specific standard, as advocated by many in the entertainment industry in Grokster, 
would  have  placed  these  industries,  and  the  nascent  businesses  that  are  their  life 
blood, at risk. The Supreme Court refused to go down this path. Supreme Court Jus-
tice  Stephen  Breyer  along  with  Justices  Sandra  Day  O’Conner  and  John  Paul  Ste-
vens  argued  that  ‘‘Sony’s  rule  is  strongly  technology  protecting.  . . .  Sony  thereby 
recognizes  that  the  emergence  of  new  technologies,  including  (perhaps  especially) 
those that help disseminate information and ideas more broadly or more efficiently.’’ 
The  market,  rather  than  the  Federal  courts,  should  drive  investment  decisions. 
Unfortunately,  the  Supreme  Court  left  many  liability  questions  unanswered  in 
Grokster, and those issues will now have to again be addressed by the lower courts 
in  continuing  litigation.  For  venture  capital  firms,  the  additional  layer  of  legal  un-
certainty—a  risk  that  can  be  neither  measured  nor  managed—will  discourage  in-
vestment  in  critical  information  technologies  in  the  near  term  post  Grokster.  We 
have  now  an  opportunity  for  a  breathing  space,  one  in  which  technologies  can  con-
tinue to emerge and further answers emerge from the courts without a rush to judg-
ment  from  any  sector,  whether  it  is  the  entertainment  industry,  Congress  or  inves-
tors.  However,  if  the  entertainment  industry  decides  to  initiate  even  greater  vol-
umes of litigation against inventors and investors, Congress may need to return its 
focus to this issue. 

Thank you again for the opportunity to testify here today on these critical issues. 

I look forward to answering any questions. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Our next witness is Dave Baker, Vice President, Law and Public 
Policy,  of  EarthLink.  EarthLink  is  an  Internet  service  provider 
with over five million subscribers. 

protection  afforded  by  this  Court’s  Sony  decision  that  the  iPod  could  be  developed,  marketed, 
and released. 

12 See Brooks Boliek, Mouse Grouse: Dis Boss Lays Into Computer Biz, The Reporter.com, Mar. 

1, 2002, available at http://www.larta.org/ pl/NewsArticles/02Marc01lHRlEisner.htm. 

13 Jonathan  Krim,  High-Tech  Tension  Over  Illegal  Uses,  Wash.  Post,  Feb.  22,  2005,  at  E1, 
available at http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/articles/A42401-2005Feb21.html?sub=AR. 

14 Id. 
15 While  the  United  States  and  petitioners  contend  that  it  would  be  more  efficient  for  users 
seeking publicly available material to go directly to the website that houses it than to use peer- 
to-peer  file-sharing  software,  neither  has  offered  any  evidence  to  support  this  factual  assertion. 
The Ninth Circuit, by contrast, found that peer-to-peer arrangements ‘‘significantly reduc[ed] the 
distribution  costs  of  public  domain  and  permissively  shared  art  and  speech.’’  Pet.  App.  16a. 
While  legitimate  arguments  may  support  these  competing  conclusions,  the  prior  question  that 
the United States fails to address is whether the Federal courts have the institutional capabili-
ties  to  weigh  the  competing  evidence  in  such  complex  areas  as  computer  software  and  the  life 
sciences. The marketplace performs this same function automatically. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Mr. Baker? 

24 

STATEMENT OF DAVID N. BAKER, VICE PRESIDENT, 

LAW AND PUBLIC POLICY, EARTHLINK, INC. 

Mr. BAKER. Thank you. 
Chairman  Stevens,  Co-Chairman  Inouye,  and  members  of  the 

Committee, thank you for inviting me to testify today. 

I’m  Dave  Baker.  I’m  Vice  President  for  Law  and  Public  Policy 
with  EarthLink.  EarthLink  is  one  of  the  Nation’s  largest  Internet 
service  providers,  serving  5.4  million  customers  with  broadband, 
dial-up, web-hosting, wireless Internet, and voice services. 

We  appreciate  this  committee’s  interest  in  peer-to-peer  file  shar-
ing  and  the  issues  related  to  the  Supreme  Court’s  recent  decision 
in  MGM  v.  Grokster.  You  will  hear  from  other  witnesses  today 
about  the  importance  of  protecting  copyrights.  EarthLink  agrees 
and  supports  the  rights  of  copyright  owners  to  protect  their  intel-
lectual  property  and  to  do  so  in  a  manner  that  does  not  com-
promise  the  ability  of  Internet  providers  to  deliver  broadband  and 
other Internet services to as many Americans as possible. 

Indeed,  if  we  are  to  realize  the  promise  of  the  emerging 
broadband  future,  we  should  all  want  to  develop  means  to  make 
online  music,  movies,  and  video  more  widely  available  to  con-
sumers  while  protecting  the  copyrights  of  those  who  create  such 
content. 

In  studying  the  issues  of  peer-to-peer  file  sharing,  I  would  like 
to offer the Committee some insights from our experience with the 
Digital Millennium Copyright Act. The goal of the DMCA is to give 
copyright owners a mechanism to protect their intellectual property 
from  online  infringement  while  creating  counter-notification  safe-
guards  for  website  owners  and  a  safe-harbor  provision  for  ISPs. 
The  DMCA  affirms  the  longstanding  principle  that  ISPs  are  but 
conduits  for  information.  As  such,  they  are  not  liable  for  the  con-
tent that travels over their networks. 

Having said that, EarthLink, as other ISPs, does not tolerate ac-
tivities  which  violate  copyrights.  Where  ISPs  host  websites  which 
contain infringing content, we can, and do, play a part in protecting 
copyrights. 

Under  the  DMCA’s  notice  and  takedown  provisions,  an  ISP  will 
disable or block access to a website it hosts if it receives a notifica-
tion  of  a  good-faith  belief  that  such  website  infringes  a  party’s 
copyrights.  The  website  owner  has  a  similar  opportunity  to  file  a 
counter-notification to get his website restored. The DMCA’s notice 
and  takedown  procedure  has  worked  well  for  over  6  years.  ISPs 
like  EarthLink  handle  DMCA  notices  almost  every  day.  Copyright 
owners  are  given  reasonable  opportunity  to  protect  their  intellec-
tual  property.  website  owners  are  given  reasonable  opportunity  to 
protect their content. And ISPs are given reasonable opportunity to 
aid  copyright  owners  without  themselves  becoming  liable  for  con-
tent they host. 

However,  ISPs  faced  challenges  a  few  years  ago  when  copyright 
owners tried to stretch the use of the DMCA to include peer-to-peer 
file  sharing.  The  RIAA  tried  to  use  the  subpoena  power  of  Section 
512(h) to require ISPs to divulge the identity of Internet users who 
were  alleged  to  have  transmitted  copyrighted  materials  across  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

ISP’s  network.  Using  the  DMCA  in  this  fashion  allowed  adminis-
trative subpoenas to be issued in blank, with no judicial oversight. 
Compounding  this  problem  were  the  use  of  bots,  automated  pro-
grams  which  scour  the  web  looking  for  files  which  contain  names 
of copyrighted materials. But bots are indiscriminate. For instance, 
a  notice  sent  in  2001  to  UUNet  sought  to  cutoff  Internet  access  to 
all users who had downloaded files containing ‘‘Harry Potter.’’ One 
of these files was titled harrylpotterlbooklreport.rft and was, in 
fact,  just  what  it  purported  to  be,  a  child’s  book  report  on  Harry 
Potter, yet the notice, if enforced, would have cutoff all Internet ac-
cess, not just for this child, but for his or her entire family. 

Unlike  websites,  which  ISPs  host  and  can,  therefore,  control  ac-
cess  to,  peer-to-peer  files  reside  on  the  computers  of  individual 
Internet users. Short of canceling the accounts of all of these users, 
which  would  work  in  undue  hardship,  ISPs  cannot  control  this. 
What’s more, attempts to force ISPs to disclose the identity of indi-
viduals  upon  a  mere  allegation  of  copyright  infringement  unneces-
sarily compromises the privacy of all Internet users. 

As  EarthLink  has  stated  many  times  before,  we  support  the 
rights  of  the  RIAA  and  other  copyright  owners  to  protect  their  in-
tellectual  property.  We  just  must  do  so  in  a  way  that  protects  the 
privacy  of  legitimate  users  and  which  does  not  shoot  the  mes-
senger,  the  ISP,  which  makes  online  communications  possible  in 
the first place. 

In  the  Grokster  case  at  hand,  the  Supreme  Court  unanimously 
held  that  Grokster  and  StreamCast  are  potentially  liable  for  copy-
right infringement by their users. The court focused on the element 
of intent to induce infringement. 

Further,  the  court  held  that  Grokster  and  StreamCast  did  not 
meet  the  Sony  standard  of  commercially  significant  non-infringing 
use, and the overwhelming evidence of an intent to induce infringe-
ment could not be disregarded. The Supreme Court went on to say 
that  the  Sony  standard  remains,  but  it  also  said  that  you  cannot 
use  the  Sony  safe  harbor  if  you  are  clearly  inducing  others  to  in-
fringe copyrights. 

As the Supreme Court noted, peer-to-peer is an immensely useful 
technology.  The  lesson  from  the  Grokster  case  is  not  to  limit  the 
technology,  but  to  use  it  in  a  way  that  does  not  intentionally  in-
fringe on copyrights. 

As  I  noted  in  the  foreword  I  wrote  to  the  Giga  Law  Guide  to 
Internet  Law  regarding  Grokster’s  predecessor,  Napster,  Napster 
provides a great example of a killer app, killed by its failure to ad-
dress legal realities. A brilliantly simple application, it took full ad-
vantage  of  the  Internet’s  very  nature  as  an  information  service  to 
create  a  means  of  distributing  music  far  more  efficiently  than  the 
conventional process of pressing and shipping CDs. But as good as 
its  technology  was,  Napster  failed  to  address  vital  legal  issues. 
Rock  stars,  songwriters,  and  music  publishers  are  entitled  to  be 
paid  for  their  work,  as  Federal  courts  in  the  Napster  lawsuit  re-
peatedly  ruled.  Napster,  and  now  Grokster,  will  always  serve  as  a 
reminder  that  just  because  you  can  do  something  online  doesn’t 
mean you can ignore existing laws. 

I  thank  the  Committee,  again,  for  inviting  me  here  today,  and  I 

look forward to any questions you may have. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Baker follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVID N. BAKER, VICE PRESIDENT, 

LAW AND PUBLIC POLICY, EARTHLINK, INC. 

Chairman  Stevens,  Co-Chairman  Inouye  and  members  of  the  Committee,  thank 
you  for  inviting  me  to  testify  today.  My  name  is  Dave  Baker  and  I  am  Vice  Presi-
dent  for  Law  and  Public  Policy  with  EarthLink.  Headquartered  in  Atlanta, 
EarthLink  is  one  of  the  Nation’s  largest  Internet  Service  Providers  (ISPs),  serving 
approximately 5.5 million customers with broadband, dial-up, web hosting, wireless 
Internet and voice services. 

We appreciate this committee’s interest in peer-to-peer file sharing and the issues 
related  to  the  Supreme  Court’s  recent  decision  in  MGM  v.  Grokster.  You  will  hear 
from  other  witnesses  today  about  the  importance  of  protecting  copyrights. 
EarthLink supports the rights of copyright owners to protect their intellectual prop-
erty and to do so in a manner that does not compromise the ability of Internet pro-
viders  to  deliver  broadband  and  other  Internet  services  to  as  many  Americans  as 
possible. Indeed, if we are to realize the promise of the emerging broadband future, 
we should all want to develop means to make online music, movies and video more 
widely  available  to  consumers  while  reasonably  protecting  the  copyrights  of  those 
who create such content. 

In  studying  the  issue  of  peer-to-peer  file  sharing,  I  would  like  to  offer  the  Com-
mittee  some  insights  from  our  experience  with  Federal  copyright  legislation.  In 
1998,  Congress  passed  the  Digital  Millennium  Copyright  Act  (DMCA).  The  goal  of 
the  DMCA  is  to  give  copyright  owners  a  mechanism  to  protect  their  intellectual 
property  from  online  infringement  while  creating  safeguards  such  as  counter-notifi-
cation procedures for website owners and a safe harbor provision for ISPs. 

The  DMCA  affirms  the  long-standing  principle  that  ISPs  are  but  conduits  for  in-
formation.  As  such,  they  are  not  liable  for  the  content  that  travels  over  their  net-
works. Having said that, EarthLink, as other ISPs, does not tolerate activities which 
violate copyrights. Where ISPs host websites which contain infringing content, they 
can and do play a part in protecting copyrights. 

Under  the  DMCA’s  notice  and  takedown  provisions,  an  ISP  will  disable  or  block 
access to a website it hosts if it receives a notification of a good-faith belief that such 
website  infringes  a  party’s  copyright(s).  The  website  owner  has  a  similar  oppor-
tunity to file a counter-notification to get his website restored. 

The  DMCA’s  notice  and  takedown  procedure  has  worked  well  for  over  6  years 
now. ISPs like EarthLink handle DMCA notices almost every day. Copyright owners 
are given reasonable opportunity to protect their intellectual property, website own-
ers  are  given  reasonable  opportunity  to  protect  their  content,  and  ISPs  are  given 
reasonable  opportunity  to  aid  copyright  owners  without  themselves  becoming  liable 
for content they host. 

However,  ISPs  faced  challenges  a  few  years  ago  when  copyright  owners  tried  to 
stretch  the  use  of  the  DMCA  beyond  notice  and  takedown  of  hosted  websites  to  in-
clude peer-to-peer file sharing. The RIAA tried to extend the subpoena power of Sec. 
512(h)  of  the  DMCA  to  require  ISPs  to  divulge  the  identity  of  Internet  users  (not 
necessarily  even  customers)  whom  the  RIAA  alleged  to  have  transmitted  copy-
righted materials across the ISP’s network. 

Using  the  DMCA  in  this  fashion  allowed  administrative  subpoenas  to  be  issued 
in blank with no judicial oversight. Compounding this problem was the use of ‘‘bots’’, 
automated  programs,  which  scour  the  web  looking  for  files  which  contain  names  of 
copyrighted  materials.  But  these  bots  are  indiscriminate  in  both  the  breadth  and 
specificity  of  the  information  they  seek.  For  instance,  a  subpoena  sent  by  copy-
right.net to UUNet on January 2, 2001 sought personally identifying information for 
2,635 individual subscribers. And in another example, notices sent by Mediaforce to 
UUNet  on  December  3,  2001  sought  to  cutoff  Internet  access  to  all  users  who  had 
downloaded  files  containing 
‘‘Harry  Potter.’’  One  of  these  files  was  titled 
harrylpotterlbooklreport.rtf  and  was  1k  in  size.  Not  only  was  this  magnitudes 
smaller than even the legal clips of the movie, much less the megabytes needed for 
bootleg  copies  of  the  whole  film,  but  closer  inspection  showed  it  to  be  just  what  it 
purported  to  be,  a  child’s  book  report  on  Harry  Potter.  Yet  the  notice,  if  enforced, 
would have cutoff all Internet access not just for this child, but for his or her entire 
family. 

Unlike websites which ISPs host, and can therefore control access to, peer-to-peer 
files reside on the computers of individual Internet users. Short of canceling the ac-
counts of all these users, which would work an undue hardship, ISPs can not control 
this. What’s more, attempts to use the ministerial subpoena power of the DMCA to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

force ISPs to disclose the identity of individuals upon a mere allegation of copyright 
infringement unnecessarily compromises the privacy of all Internet users. 

As  EarthLink  has  stated  many  times  before,  we  support  the  rights  of  RIAA,  the 
MPAA  and  other  copyright  owners  to  protect  their  intellectual  property.  But  the 
DMCA  must  not  be  used  in  ways  that  compromise  the  privacy  of  Internet  users 
more than it would protect copyrights. 

In sum, we have to balance protecting the intellectual property of copyright own-
ers  while  protecting  the  privacy  of  Internet  users,  all  while  not  shooting  the  mes-
senger  (ISPs)  that  provide  the  very  access  that  makes  online  communications  pos-
sible. 

In the Grokster case at hand, the Supreme Court unanimously held that Grokster 
and StreamCast are potentially liable for copyright infringement by their users. The 
Court  focused  on  the  element  of  intent,  holding  that  ‘‘one  who  distributes  a  device 
with the object of promoting its use to infringe copyright, as shown by clear expres-
sion  or  other  affirmative  steps  taken  to  foster  infringement,  is  liable  for  the  result-
ing acts of infringement by third parties.’’ 

Further, the Supreme Court held that Grokster and StreamCast did not meet the 
Sony  standard  of  ‘‘commercially  significant  non-infringing  use’’  and  the  over-
whelming  evidence  of  intent  to  induce  infringement  could  not  be  disregarded.  Said 
the  Court,  ‘‘Here,  evidence  of  the  distributors’  words  and  deeds  going  beyond  dis-
tribution as such shows a purpose to cause and profit from third-party acts of copy-
right  infringement.’’  The  Supreme  Court  went  on  to  state  that  the  Sony  standard 
of  ‘‘substantial  non-infringing  use’’  remains.  But  it  also  stated  that  one  cannot  use 
the Sony safe harbor if they are clearly inducing others to infringe copyrights. 

Peer-to  peer  is  an  immensely  useful  technology.  As  the  Supreme  Court  noted  in 
Grokster, there are several advantages to peer-to-peer networks. Because they need 
no  central  computer  server  for  users  to  exchange  information,  they  don’t  need  the 
high  bandwidth  communications  capacity  a  central  server  would  require.  Similarly, 
the need for costly server storage space is eliminated. Since copies of a file (particu-
larly  a  popular  one)  are  available  on  many  users’  computers,  file  retrievals  may  be 
faster  than  on  other  types  of  networks.  And  since  file  exchanges  do  not  travel 
through  a  server,  communications  can  take  place  between  any  computers  that  re-
main  connected  to  the  network  without  risk  that  a  glitch  in  the  server  will  disable 
the whole network. Given these benefits in security, cost, and efficiency, peer-to-peer 
networks are used by universities, government agencies, corporations, and libraries, 
as well as by millions of individual users.1 The lesson from the Grokster case is not 
to  limit  the  technology,  but  to  use  it  in  a  way  that  does  not  intentionally  infringe 
on copyrights. 

As  I  noted  in  my  foreword  to  the  Giga  Law  Guide  to  Internet  Law  regarding 

Grokster and StreamCast’s predecessor, Napster: 

Napster  provides  a  great  example  of  a  ‘‘killer  app’’  killed  by  its  failure  to  ad-
dress  legal  realities.  A  brilliantly  simple  application,  it  took  full  advantage  of 
the  Internet’s  very  nature  as  an  information  service  to  create  a  means  of  dis-
tributing  music  far  more  efficiently  than  the  conventional  process  of  pressing 
a  CD,  wrapping  it,  boxing  it,  shipping  it,  unloading  it,  and  displaying  it  in  a 
store  just  so  a  customer  could  drive  to  that  store,  buy  the  CD,  take  it  home, 
and put it in a player to decode the CD’s digital information in order to finally 
hear music. But as good as its peer-to-peer file-sharing technology was, Napster 
failed to address vital legal issues such as copyrights, licenses, and royalty pay-
ments. Rock stars, songwriters, and music publishers are entitled to be paid for 
their  work,  as  the  Federal  courts  in  the  Napster  lawsuits  repeatedly  ruled. 
Napster will always serve as a reminder that just because you can do something 
online doesn’t mean you can ignore existing laws. 2 

I again thank the Committee for inviting me here today and I look forward to any 

questions you may have. 

The CHAIRMAN. Well, thank you very much. 
The next witness, Mitch Bainwol, Chairman and CEO of the Re-
cording Industry Association of America. This is a trade group rep-
resenting the U.S. recording industry and its members. They’re re-

1 MGM v. Grokster, 545 U.S. lllll (2005) at 1–2. 
2 The  Giga  Law  Guide  to  Internet  Law  by  Doug  Isenberg.  Random  House  Trade  Paperbacks 

2002 at xi. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

sponsible  for  approximately  90  percent  of  all  legitimate  sound  re-
cording produced and sold in the United States. 

Mr. Bainwol? 

STATEMENT OF MITCH BAINWOL, CHAIRMAN AND CEO, 

RECORDING INDUSTRY ASSOCIATION OF AMERICA 

Mr. BAINWOL. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, Mr. Co-Chairman, Sen-
ator Smith, Senator Kerry, and Senator Pryor. I appreciate the op-
portunity to testify here today. 

I  am  the  CEO  of  the  RIAA.  Sometimes  I  think  we  should  be 
called  the  MVCA,  instead,  the  Music  Venture  Capital  Association, 
because  that’s  what  record  companies  do.  We  invest  in  music.  We 
put  the  proceeds  from  the  sale  of  recorded  music  back  in  to  new 
art.  It’s  a  risky  business,  and  it  doesn’t  pay  off  all  the  time,  but, 
when  it  does,  it’s  a  great  experience,  and  we’re  able  to  generate 
this wonderful music for fans across the globe. 

Two  things  make  all  of  this  work.  First,  there  is  no  substitute 
for  quality  music.  The  product  has  to  sell.  Second,  you  have  to  be 
able to do just that: sell. An investment-based business that cannot 
reap  the  value  of  its  investment  is  a  business  that  cannot  sustain 
itself.  It’s  that  simple.  That’s  why  these  past  few  years  have  been 
tough  and  why  we’re  hopeful  about  the  coming  years.  In  1999,  the 
domestic sale of music reached nearly $15 billion. By 2003, that fig-
ure  had  plummeted  to  under  $12  billion.  2004  was  pretty  much 
flat, and 2005 is down again, another 7 percent. Much, but not all, 
of  the  problem  is  due  to  Internet  piracy.  Piracy  sounds  romantic, 
but  if  you  work  in  the  music  business,  it’s  anything  but.  Piracy  is 
a  job  killer,  it’s  a  culture  killer,  it’s  a  lesson  learned  by  a  genera-
tion that stealing is OK. 

Our beef, though, is not with the Internet, and it sure isn’t with 
technology. Our beef is with the conduct—the conduct of bad actors 
who built a business by giving away our property for free and then 
making money from spyware and from advertising. That’s precisely 
what Grokster is all about. The case centered on whether these bad 
actors  could  pull  what  I  call  the  Sergeant  Schultz  defense,  ‘‘see 
nothing,  do  nothing,’’  but  profit  all  along  from  the  infringement 
that they encourage. It’s a business model predicated on theft. 

We  felt  good  about  the  oral  arguments  in  March.  We  had  40— 
40  state  attorneys  general  with  us.  We  had  the  Solicitor  General 
speaking  for  the  U.S.  Government  on  our  side.  We  had  property- 
rights  groups,  technology  groups,  family  groups,  artists,  and  broad 
editorial  support.  Our  mainstream  position  won  out,  as  the  Vice 
President  once  said,  big  time.  With  a  nine-zero  ruling  by  a  court 
that  can’t  agree  on  what  to  have  for  lunch,  a  clear  message  was 
sent,  ‘‘Thou  shalt  not  steal,  and  businesses  that  profit  by  encour-
aging others can’t evade liability.’’ It was stunning. From Ginsburg 
to  Scalia,  from  Stevens  to  Rehnquist,  from  Thomas  to  the  most 
tech-savvy guy on the bench, Breyer, everyone—everyone agreed. 

The  majority  opinion,  written  by  Souter,  said  it  all,  ‘‘The  unlaw-
ful  objective  is  unmistakable.  This  case  is  significantly  different 
from Sony. Sony dealt with a claim of liability based solely on dis-
tributing  a  product  with  an  alternative  lawful  and  unlawful  uses. 
Here,  evidence  of  the  distributor’s  words  and  deeds  going  beyond 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

distribution shows a purpose to cause and to profit from third-party 
acts.’’ 

When  confronted  with  a  tension  between  two  important  values, 
creativity  and  innovation,  the  court  struck  a  perfect  balance.  Tech 
voices  like  Apple,  HP,  and  even  Mark  Cuban,  who  funded  the 
Grokster  defense,  applauded  the  decision.  So  did  we.  Editorials 
echo  that  praise.  Imagine,  The  New  York  Times  and  The  Wall 
Street  Journal  singing  together.  The  Washington  Times  and  The 
Washington  Post  hitting  the  same  note,  more  rare  than  even  a 
nine-zero decision. As my fellow panelist Mark Heesen properly ob-
served, only those players who willfully promote copyright infringe-
ment will be subject to potential liability. 

So,  what  does  the  decision  mean?  It  means  that  similarly  situ-
ated businesses that encourage infringement need to do some seri-
ous reflection, and they need to do that fast, and reach the obvious 
conclusion  that  it’s  time  to  go  straight  or  face  the  consequences.  It 
means  venture  capital  will  flow  to  technology  companies,  like  Mr. 
Kerber’s,  that  respect  property  and  reward  the  future  of  music.  It 
means  nascent  technologies  that  operate  within  the  law  will  have 
a  chance  to  get  traction,  attract  investors,  and  appeal  to  fans.  It 
means  that  we  increasingly  will  be  able  to  sell  and  invest  in  new 
artists  and  more  music.  And  that’s  why  we’re  optimistic  about  the 
future. 

Two  years  ago,  there  was  no  legitimate  digital  marketplace. 
We’re watching the rapid emergence of a quintessentially American 
dynamic  competition  in  this  space—iTunes,  Real,  Napster,  Wal- 
Mart,  and  others  competing  for  the  download  segment  of  the  mar-
ket;  Yahoo!,  Rhapsody,  Napster,  and  others  competing  for  the  sub-
scription  segment  of  the  market;  Wurld,  iMesh,  Mashboxx,  P2P 
Revolution,  and  others  competing  for  the  important  legitimate 
peer-to-peer market. 

And  the  wireless  market,  already  advanced  around  the  world,  is 
poised  to  take  off  here,  as  well.  Grokster  plays  into  this  dynamic 
in  a  very  big  way,  legally  and  culturally.  Legally,  those  who  don’t 
play by the rules know that the Sergeant Schultz defense won’t fly 
any more. If it walks like a duck and quacks like a duck, you know 
you’ve  got  a  turkey.  And,  culturally,  we’ve  pierced  the  nonsensical 
notion  that  somehow  the  taking  of  property  is  OK  when  it  comes 
to music. 

All we want is a chance to compete. No one thinks that our road 
to  recovery  is  easy  or  automatic.  But  a  chance  for  our  investment 
to earn a return is a pretty darn good first step. 

Thank you for listening. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Bainwol follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MITCH BAINWOL, CHAIRMAN AND CEO, 

RECORDING INDUSTRY ASSOCIATION OF AMERICA 

Mr. Chairman, Co-Chairman Inouye, I appreciate the opportunity to testify today 

on the Supreme Court’s Grokster decision. 

One  month  ago,  the  Court  took  a  major  step  toward  safeguarding  and  advancing 
one  of  this  country’s  greatest  resources—intellectual  property.  In  a  rare  9–0  deci-
sion, the Justices held unanimously in Grokster that those who encourage others to 
steal  may  be  held  liable  themselves.  The  resulting  message  is  straightforward  and 
simple: theft, in any medium, is unacceptable. 

Grokster is a peer-to-peer (P2P) file-sharing network that allows members to copy 
songs,  movies,  software,  and  other  creative  works  over  the  Internet  without  paying 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

for  them.  The  result  has  been,  in  the  words  of  the  Supreme  Court,  ‘‘infringement 
on  a  gigantic  scale.’’  These  illicit  networks  have  enabled  the  illegal  copying  of  mil-
lions  upon  millions  of  exact  duplicates  of  valuable  works  with  the  click  of  a  mouse. 
Every day. 

This  massive  theft  has  been  particularly  devastating  for  the  music  industry.  In 
1999,  the  domestic  sale  of  music  reached  $14.5  billion.  By  2003,  that  figure  had 
plummeted to $11.8 billion. 2004 was virtually flat, and 2005 is down again, another 
7  percent.  Record  companies  are  essentially  venture  capitalists,  investing  proceeds 
from  the  sale  of  recorded  music  back  into  new  artists.  It’s  a  risky  business,  with 
only  about  a  10  percent  success  rate.  Yet,  releases  from  the  most  popular  artists 
(which make up most of that successful 10 percent) are often the ones most heavily 
pirated on illegal file-sharing networks. According to Soundscan, the top 10 albums 
sold 54.7 million units in 1999, compared to 37.4 million units in 2004. The top 100 
albums  sold  194.9  million  units  in  1999,  compared  to  153.3  million  units  in  2004. 
The result is less money to invest in new artists and new music. 

A handful of studies have shown the direct correlation between illegal file-sharing 
and  this  decline  in  sales.  David  Blackburn  of  Harvard  University  found  that  ‘‘file 
sharing  has  had  large,  negative  impacts  on  industry  sales.’’ 1 Stanley  Liebowitz  of 
the University of Texas at Dallas concluded that, ‘‘there is strong evidence that the 
impact  of  file-sharing  has  been  to  bring  significant  harm  to  the  recording  indus-
try.’’ 2 Other researchers have echoed similar findings. 

Piracy sounds romantic, but not if you work in the music business. It’s a job kill-
er.  In  addition  to  the  decline  in  artist  rosters,  there  have  been  thousands  of  layoffs 
of  industry  employees,  and  hundreds  of  shuttered  music  store  doors.  The  effect  of 
illegal file-sharing has been felt by songwriters, technicians, artists, and musicians, 
not  to  mention  filmmakers,  programmers,  and  scores  of  others  who  make  their  liv-
ing  from  the  creation  and  lawful  sale  of  their  products.  The  U.S.  economy  and  the 
industries that employ over 5 million Americans have taken a massive hit from the 
billions of dollars lost annually through illegal file-sharing. Further, piracy on these 
networks is teaching an entire generation that stealing is acceptable. 

It’s  not.  Unfortunately,  standing  against  theft  in  the  digital  world  has  provoked 
some  to  label  us  anti-technology  or  against  innovation.  Such  claims  may  make  for 
good  soundbites,  but  they  are  far  from  the  truth.  Technology  is  making  the  music 
experience  better  and  better.  From  iTunes  to  ringtones,  the  music  industry  is  con-
tinuously  looking  for  new  ways  to  get  music  to  fans  and  is  embracing  new  tech-
nology that allows for the widest lawful distribution of creative works. 

The  problem  is  with  the  behavior  of  bad  actors  who  have  used  this  amazing  P2P 
technology to build businesses predicated on theft. They have reaped millions—and, 
indeed,  stayed  in  business—by  giving  away  our  property  and  the  property  of  thou-
sands of others for free, receiving revenue from third party spyware and advertising 
aimed  at  those  looking  to  steal.  It  has  been  estimated  that  over  90  percent  of  the 
file-sharing  on  Grokster  and  similar  services  is  illegal  copyright  infringement.  This 
is  no  accident.  The  more  songs,  movies,  computer  games,  and  other  creative  works 
that are stolen through their network, the more money these services make. As the 
Court  noted, 
‘‘the  unlawful  objective  is  unmistakable.’’  Without  this  illegal 
downloading, these services go broke. This is an unacceptable business model. 

And  that’s  precisely  what  the  Grokster  case  was  all  about.  The  Court  recognized 
that  companies,  like  Grokster,  that  provide  the  tools  and  promote  massive  online 
infringement  must  be  held  responsible.  As  Senator  Patrick  Leahy  observed,  ‘‘This 
decision means that companies can no longer, with a wink and a nod, absolve them-
selves  from  any  responsibility  for  what  their  products  do.  Just  as  consumers  bear 
a  responsibility  for  using  these  products  to  illegally  download  files,  the  companies 
that fashion and promote these tools must share in that obligation.’’ 

The  Court  also  noted  the  need  for  legitimate  technological  innovation  and  cre-
ativity,  saying  that  their  ruling  ‘‘does  nothing  to  compromise  legitimate  commerce 
or discourage innovation having a lawful purpose.’’ This is not about technology. The 
decision of the Court was technology-neutral, focusing instead on behavior and sepa-
rating  the  good  actors  from  the  bad  actors.  It  put  the  emphasis  exactly  where  it 
should  be—on  those  who  ‘‘encourage  infringement’’  while  looking  the  other  way  as 
they reap the rewards. 

The Court did not alter the standard established in its 1984 Sony case. In its own 
words, ‘‘nothing in Sony requires courts to ignore evidence of intent if there is such 
evidence, and the case was never meant to foreclose rules of fault-based liability de-
rived from the common law.’’ Grokster and other bad actors can be held liable with-

1 ‘‘On-line Piracy and Recorded Music Sales,’’ David Blackburn (2004). 
2 ‘‘File Sharing: Creative Destruction or Just Plain Destruction?’’ Stanley Liebowitz (2005). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

out  threatening  legitimate  technological  innovation  or  the  Sony  standard  that  has 
served creators and consumers so well. 

Our  position  in  this  case  was  bolstered  by  incredibly  wide-ranging  support.  The 
coalition  against  Grokster’s  enabling  of  intellectual  property  theft  includes  the  cre-
ative  community,  the  law  enforcement  community,  the  family  values  community, 
and  the  technology  community.  During  the  Sony  case  in  the  1980s,  20  Attorneys 
General from around the country were with the other side; this time, 40 were with 
us.  The  U.S.  Government  filed  on  our  side  with  a  compelling  brief  by  the  Solicitor 
General.  Key  Members  of  Congress,  property  rights  groups,  family  groups,  artists, 
technology companies, and others also filed in support of protecting property rights. 
There  was  enormous  editorial  support,  from  The  New  York  Times  and  The  Wall 
Street Journal to the Washington Times and The Washington Post. Broad consensus, 
capped off with a unanimous Court decision. 

Those  who  still  claim  that  the  law  is  not  clear  are  few  and  far  outside  the  main-
stream. This is now a settled question. File-sharing copyrighted works without per-
mission  is  illegal;  encouraging  it  is  also  illegal.  Sony  is  not  a  ‘‘get  out  of  jail  free’’ 
card.  It  will  not  protect  you  if  you  encourage  theft.  Grokster  and  similarly  situated 
businesses  that  enable  infringement  need  to  realize  that  it’s  time  to  go  straight  or 
face the consequences. 

The  turn  of  the  new  millennium,  and  the  emergence  of  file-sharing,  marked  the 
first  stage  of  P2P—an  era  of  lawlessness  where  the  excitement  of  a  new  medium 
and a lack of viable legal online alternatives paved the way for massive online theft. 
The  second  stage  brought  ambiguity,  as  education  and  enforcement  of  copyright  by 
content  owners  was  continuously  thwarted  by  the  misinformation  and  lure  of  free 
goods  from  Grokster  and  others.  Now,  with  the  decision  of  the  Supreme  Court,  we 
have  entered  the  third  stage—and  the  bright  future—of  legal,  responsible  P2P  file- 
sharing. 

The legal and moral clarity provided by the Grokster decision is a shot of adrena-
line  for  the  legitimate  marketplace.  Capital  will  now  naturally  flow  to  technology 
companies  that  respect  property  and  reward  the  future  of  music—companies  such 
as  iMesh,  Snocap,  Mashboxx,  and  Passalong,  as  well  as  Wurld  Media,  who  is  rep-
resented  at  this  hearing  today.  In  other  words,  the  purpose  of  intellectual  property 
protection  as  an  investment  lure  is  being  met.  Nascent  technologies  that  operate 
within  the  law  will  have  a  chance  to  gain  traction,  attract  investors,  and  appeal  to 
fans.  And  we  can  increasingly  sell,  and  thus  invest,  in  new  art,  benefiting  creators 
and consumers alike. 

We are optimistic about the future. Two years ago, there was no legitimate digital 
marketplace  to  speak  of.  Today,  we  are  watching  the  rapid  emergence  of 
quintessentially American competition for this new marketplace. iTunes, BuyMusic, 
Wal-Mart,  Sony  Connect  and  others  are  battling  it  out  for  the  download  segment 
of the market. The result: in March 2005, 26 million songs were purchased from dig-
ital music stores in the United States.3 Yahoo!, Rhapsody, Napster, MSNMusic and 
others  are  battling  it  out  for  the  subscription  segment  of  the  market.  Many  of  the 
above and others offer both. Forty-three percent of music downloaders in 2005 have 
tried legitimate online music services 4 and 34 percent of current music downloaders 
say  they  now  use  paid  services.5 On  college  and  university  campuses  across  the 
country—hotbeds  of  illegal  activity  on  exceedingly  fast  networks—administrations 
and students are embracing the legitimate offerings of these services and others. 

More  than  50  schools  have  entered  into  deals  with  companies  like  Ruckus  Net-
works.  Just  last  week,  the  University  of  California  and  California  State  networks 
signed  with  Cdigix,  potentially  providing  hundreds  of  thousands  of  new  students 
with the opportunity to legally obtain music and movies on campus. And, of course, 
the wireless market, already advanced elsewhere around the world, is poised to take 
off here as well. 

But  these  legitimate  businesses  are  able  to  thrive  only  by  controlling  the  illicit 
services  that  directly  compete  with  them.  Grokster  plays  into  this  dynamic—legally 
and  culturally.  Legally,  those  who  don’t  play  by  the  rules  know  that  it  is  no  longer 
acceptable  to  reap  ill-gotten  gains  while  burying  their  head  in  the  sand.  And,  cul-
turally,  we’ve  pierced  the  nonsensical  notion  that  somehow  the  taking  of  property 
is acceptable when it’s music. All we want is a chance to compete, a chance for our 
investment to earn a return, and a chance to make great music for fans everywhere. 

Thank you. 

3 NPD MusicWatch Digital Service. 
4 Pew Internet and American Life study, March 2005. 
5 Pew, March 2005. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Last  witness,  Fritz  Attaway,  Executive  Vice  President,  Motion 
Picture  Association  of  America,  serving  as  the  voice  and  advocate 
of  the  American  motion  picture,  home  video,  and  television  indus-
tries. 

Thank you. Mr. Attaway? 

STATEMENT OF FRITZ E. ATTAWAY, EXECUTIVE VICE 
PRESIDENT AND WASHINGTON GENERAL COUNSEL, 

MOTION PICTURE ASSOCIATION OF AMERICA 

Mr.  ATTAWAY.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Co-Chairman  Inouye, 
Senator  Snowe,  Senator  Smith,  Senator  Kerry,  Senator  Pryor.  I’m 
very  pleased  to  be  here  today  to  represent  myself,  Dan  Glickman, 
the  members  of  the  Motion  Picture  Association  and  present  our 
views on this landmark decision. 

I wish I would have brought my kiddie seat, but I’m very pleased 

to be here today. 

It should be of particular interest to this committee that the best 
way  I  know  of  to  characterize  this  Supreme  Court  decision  is  that 
it  is  good  for  commerce  and  it  is  good  for  consumers.  The  Court’s 
unanimous  decision,  like  the  adoption  of  the  Digital  Millennium 
Copyright  Act,  establishes  a  rational  and  balanced  basis  for  the 
evolving  digital  environment  which  will  remove  uncertainty  and 
spur investment in creative content and the technology with which 
it  is  created,  delivered,  and  displayed.  As  a  result,  consumers  will 
have more and better viewing choices. It is a win-win-win decision. 
And,  contrary  to  what  Mr.  Eisgrau  suggested,  there  is  no  need 
to  bring  the  parties  together  in  the  wake  of  this  decision.  The  le-
gitimate  content  distributors  and  the  content  creators  are  talking, 
as  Mr.  Kerber  will  attest  to.  What  was  needed  is  to  get  the  free- 
riders  out  of  the  way,  which  this  Supreme  Court  decision  will  go 
a  long  ways  in  doing,  and  allow  the  legitimate  business  interests 
to proceed with new viewing choices for consumers. 

In  its  Grokster  decision,  the  Court  declined  to  revisit  the  Sony 
case  decided  almost  a  decade  earlier,  but  did  provide  very  impor-
tant clarification. It said, as it did in Sony, that the mere manufac-
ture  and  distribution  of  a  device  with  knowledge  that  it  may  be 
used to infringe does not create liability; however, it went on to say 
that  where  there  is  evidence  of  purposeful,  culpable  conduct  di-
rected at promoting infringement, liability does attach. In the case 
at hand, the Court found that defendants had marketed their serv-
ices  to  an  audience  likely  to  commit  infringing  acts,  had  taken  no 
steps to prevent infringement, and had profited from the infringing 
acts of their customers. The court struck a careful balance between 
the need to foster creative content and the need to encourage tech-
nological  innovation.  Its  rational  balance  has  been  recognized  both 
by  the  content  and  the  technology  communities,  receiving  praise 
not  just  from  MPAA  and  RIAA,  but  also  from  the  Information 
Technology  Industry  Council  and  the  Business  Software  Alliance, 
organizations  that  represent  many  of  the  major  high-tech  compa-
nies in the United States. 

In  clarifying  its  Sony  decision,  the  Grokster  court  stressed  the 
importance  of  secondary  liability  to  meaningful  application  of  the 
copyright  law.  The  Court  said  that,  in  the  digital  environment, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

rights  against  direct  infringers  may  be  impossible  to  enforce,  and 
that  remedies  for  secondary  liability  may  be  the  only  practical 
means to protect copyrights against massive infringement. 

The  Court,  in  Grokster,  sent  a  resounding  message  to  users  of 
the  Internet,  as  Senator  Inouye  pointed  out  earlier:  theft  of  intel-
lectual  property  is  wrong,  whether  it  takes  place  by  stealing  a 
physical  copy  of  a  movie  or  by  stealing  a  movie  in  cyberspace,  and 
those who encourage such theft will be held liable. 

The  Internet  provides  great  opportunities,  but  the  Internet  is 
not,  and  should  not  be,  an  environment  immune  to  the  rules  of  a 
civil  society.  The  distribution  of  child  pornography  is  no  less  vile 
on  the  Internet  than  it  is  anywhere  else.  The  invasion  of  personal 
privacy is no less objectionable on the Internet than elsewhere. And 
the  theft  of  property  is  no  more  acceptable  on  the  Internet  than  it 
is offline. 

Content  owners  look  to  the  Grokster  decision  to  usher  in  a  new 
age  of  cooperation  among  content  providers,  technology  providers, 
and  ISPs  aimed  at  providing  consumers  with  safe,  legal,  flexible, 
and convenient choices for entertainment and information. 

Again,  I  thank  you  for  affording  me  this  opportunity  to  appear 

before you, and I look forward to answering your questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Attaway follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF FRITZ E. ATTAWAY, EXECUTIVE VICE PRESIDENT AND 
WASHINGTON GENERAL COUNSEL, MOTION PICTURE ASSOCIATION OF AMERICA 

Chairman  Stevens,  Co-Chairman  Inouye,  members  of  the  Committee,  thank  you 
for giving me this opportunity to appear before you today on behalf of Dan Glickman 
and the Motion Picture Association of America. 

The  decision  of  the  Supreme  Court  in  MGM  v.  Grokster,  125  S.  Ct.  2764  (2005)., 
like  Congressional  enactment  of  the  Digital  Millennium  Copyright  Act,  establishes 
rational  and  balanced  rules  for  the  evolving  digital  environment  which  will  encour-
age  creativity  and  technological  innovation,  and  result  in  more  and  better  choices 
for consumers. 

The  DMCA  provided  content  owners  tools  to  maintain  the  integrity  of  techno-
logical  measures  essential  for  the  secure  delivery  of  high  value  content  to  con-
sumers.  It  contributed  mightily  to  the  market  launch  of  the  DVD,  which  has  been 
the  most  successful  consumer  electronics  device  in  history,  providing  a  vast  new 
market for content creators and for consumer electronics device and computer man-
ufacturers, and providing consumers with a new, technologically superior, more con-
venient option for viewing movies. 

The  Supreme  Court’s  landmark  decision  in  MGM  v.  Grokster  will  have  a  similar 
effect by providing incentives for constructive innovation and a more secure environ-
ment  in  which  to  deliver  movies,  music  and  other  content  to  consumers  over  the 
Internet. It will spur investment in new, legitimate delivery services, which in turn 
will  provide  a  new  source  of  revenue  to  content  creators  and  encourage  the  sale  of 
consumer  electronics  devices  and  broadband  access.  And  most  importantly,  it  will 
stimulate new, easy-to-use consumer options for accessing entertainment and infor-
mation in a variety of formats through a host of new delivery platforms. 

In  its  Grokster  decision,  a  unanimous  Supreme  Court  declined  invitations  to  re-
visit  its  narrowly  decided,  five-to-four  decision  in  the  Sony  case  a  decade  earlier.  It 
made  clear,  however,  that  the  Sony  decision  does  not  preclude  liability  where  the 
conduct  at  issue  goes  beyond  the  mere  manufacture  and  distribution  of  a  device 
with  knowledge  that  it  may  be  used  to  infringe.  The  Grokster  Court  said  liability 
DOES attach when there is evidence of purposeful, culpable conduct directed at pro-
moting  infringement.  In  the  Court’s  words,  ‘‘one  who  distributes  a  device  with  the 
object  of  promoting  its  use  to  infringe  copyright,  as  shown  by  clear  expression  or 
other  affirmative  steps  taken  to  foster  infringement,  is  liable  for  the  resulting  acts 
of  infringement  by  third  parties.’’  125  S.  Ct.  2764  at  2780  (2005).  Such  a  ruling  is 
neither extraordinary, nor at odds with long-established rules of fault-based liability 
derived  from  the  common  law.  And  as  the  Court  made  explicit,  such  a  rule  ‘‘does 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

nothing to compromise legitimate commerce or discourage innovation having a law-
ful promise.’’ Id. at 2780. 

In  other  words,  the  Court  stated,  as  it  had  in  its  Sony  decision,  that  technology 
capable of substantial non-infringing uses is not inherently bad, but those who traf-
fic in such a technology with the intent of inducing others to infringe are bad actors 
and  subject  to  remedies  for  contributory  infringement.  It  found  in  the  case  before 
it  that  the  defendants  had  intentionally  marketed  their  software  to  former  users  of 
the  Napster  ‘‘file  sharing’’  service  which  had  been  found  to  be  in  violation  of  the 
copyright  laws;  had  made  no  effort  to  limit  the  infringing  activities  of  their  cus-
tomers; 1 and  had  established  a  business  model  whose  success  was  directly  tied  to 
the  infringements  of  their  customers.  Under  these  circumstances,  the  Court  said 
there was a clear basis for a finding of contributory infringement. 

In crafting its decision, the Court was sensitive to any possible impact on techno-
logical innovation and carefully distinguished between simply knowing that a device 
could  be  used  to  infringe  and  culpable  conduct.2 The  Court’s  careful  articulation  of 
what  is,  and  what  is  not,  permissible  will  remove  uncertainty  in  the  marketplace 
and stimulate capital investment in the technology sector as well as the distribution 
marketplace.  Its  success  in  reaching  an  appropriate  balance  that  protects  both  cre-
ative and technological innovation is evidenced by the fact that its decision has been 
overwhelmingly praised by the technology community.3 

The standard set by the Court is very similar to the standard set by the Congress 
in  the  DMCA,  where  Congress  prohibited  trafficking  in  devices  with  the  purpose  of 
enabling  the  circumvention  of  technical  measures  used  to  prevent  copyright  in-
fringements.  In  drafting  the  DMCA  Congress  was  careful  not  to  discourage  techno-
logical innovation or the exercise of ‘‘fair use’’ by consumers, while enabling content 
owners to use technology to protect their rights. And in the period since enactment 
of  the  DMCA  there  has  been  no  evidence  that  technological  innovation  has  been 
suppressed,  or  that  consumers  have  not  been  able  to  engage  in  fair  uses  of  copy-
righted  works.  Indeed,  the  Copyright  Office  has  undertaken  two  exhaustive  inquir-
ies into the impact of the DMCA on the exercise of fair use, and has twice concluded 
that the ability of consumers to exercise fair use has not been impinged. 

In  clarifying  its  decision  in  Sony,  the  Court  stressed  the  importance  of  theories 
of  secondary  liability  to  ensuring  meaningful  application  of  the  copyright  law.  In-
deed,  the  Court  recognized  that  in  the  environment  of  cyberspace  effective  enforce-
ment  of  rights  against  direct  infringers  may  be  impossible,  and  the  application  of 
remedies  for  secondary  liability  may  be  the  only  practical  means  to  protect  copy-
rights against massive infringement.4 

The  Court  in  Grokster  not  only  clarified  its  Sony  decision,  it  voiced  a  very  clear 
message  to  users  of  the  Internet:  theft  of  intellectual  property  is  wrong,  whether  it 
takes place by stealing a physical copy of a movie from a video store or by stealing 
a movie in cyberspace. As Justice Breyer said in his concurring opinion, ‘‘deliberate 
unlawful  copying  is  no  less  an  unlawful  taking  of  property  than  garden-variety 
theft.’’ 125 S. Ct. 2764 at 2793 (2005). 

The  Internet  has  opened  up  heretofore  unimagined  opportunities  for  consumers 
to  communicate  and  access  information.  It  has  dramatically  changed  our  lives.  But 
the  Internet  is  not,  and  should  not  be,  an  environment  immune  to  the  rules  of  a 
civil  society.  The  distribution  of  child  pornography  is  no  less  vile  on  the  Internet 
than anywhere else. The invasion of personal privacy is no less objectionable on the 

1 ‘‘[T]here  is  no  evidence  that  either  company  made  an  effort  to  filter  copyrighted  material 

from users’ downloads or otherwise impede the sharing of copyrighted files.’’ Id. at 2774. 

2 ‘‘We  are,  of  course,  mindful  of  the  need  to  keep  from  trenching  on  regular  commerce  or  dis-
couraging the development of technologies with lawful and unlawful potential. Accordingly, . . . 
mere  knowledge  of  infringing  potential  or  of  actual  infringing  uses  would  not  be  enough  here 
to  subject  a  distributor  to  liability.  Nor  would  ordinary  acts  incident  to  product  distribution, 
such as offering customers technical support or product updates, support liability in themselves. 
The inducement rule, instead, premises liability on purposeful, culpable expression and conduct, 
and  thus  does  nothing  to  compromise  legitimate  commerce  or  discourage  innovation  having  a 
lawful promise.’’ Id. at 2780. 

3 ‘‘This  decision  strikes  a  balance  between  encouraging  innovation  and  discouraging  piracy.’’ 
Statement of Rhett Dawson, President of the Information Technology Industry Council, June 27, 
2005. ‘‘The application of this new standard should make a real and positive difference in com-
bating online piracy.’’ Statement of Robert Holleyman, President and CEO of The Business Soft-
ware Alliance, June 27, 2005. 

4 ‘‘The argument for imposing indirect liability in this case is, however, a powerful one, given 
the  number  of  infringing  downloads  that  occur  every  day  using  StreamCast’s  and  Grokster’s 
software.  When  a  widely  shared  service  or  product  is  used  to  commit  infringement,  it  may  be 
impossible  to  enforce  rights  in  the  protected  work  effectively  against  all  direct  infringers,  the 
only practical alternative being to go against the distributor of the copying device for secondary 
liability  on  a  theory  of  contributory  or  vicarious  infringement.’’  125  S.  Ct.  2764  at  2776  (2005). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

Internet  than  elsewhere.  And  the  theft  of  property  is  no  more  acceptable  on  the 
Internet than it is off-line. 

In Grokster the Court made a clear and forceful statement that theft on the Inter-
net is wrong and the law provides remedies against both those who engage in Inter-
net  theft  and  those  who  entice  others  to  steal  copyrighted  works.  Content  owners 
hope that Grokster will usher in a new age of cooperation among content providers, 
consumer electronics manufacturers, information technology providers and ISP’s, all 
aimed  at  providing  consumers  with  legal,  flexible  and  convenient  choices  for  enter-
tainment and information. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Yes,  we  have  a  vote  on,  gentlemen,  unfortu-
nately. We’ll stand in recess for about 10–15 minutes, until we get 
back, please. Thank you. 

[Recess.] 
The CHAIRMAN. I’m sorry for the delay. 
Mr. Kerber, you mentioned there could be appropriate initiatives 
to  follow  up  on  the  Supreme  Court  decision  that  would  solve  some 
of the problems. What do you mean? 

Mr. KERBER. I think what gets mixed up in the whole concept of 
this—and,  as  I  said,  I’m  a  business  person,  the  problem  has  never 
been  technology,  in  our  experience  with  the  entertainment  indus-
try.  When  we  went  to  the—I’m  going  to  just  use  this  as  an  exam-
ple—when  we  went  to  the  entertainment  industry,  we  are  as— 
about—far out on the outside of the—I wouldn’t know a record ex-
ecutive if I fell over the top of him at that point when we had gone 
to  the  entertainment  industry,  and  the  labels.  And  what  we  did 
was,  we  went  in  with  a  demonstrated  business  model  that  we 
thought  would  make  money  within  the  industry.  We  thought  that 
if  you  do  certain  things,  this  model  will  work  on  the  consumer 
basis it’s compelling to give the consumer. 

Now—then  what  we  did  was,  we  went  and  said,  ‘‘This  is  the 
technology  we’re  going  to  put  underneath  this  business  model  in 
order  to  enable  it.’’  And  it  was  received  with  every  major  label  in 
most  of  the  indies  and  moving  on  to  all  of  the  other  digital  media 
opportunities we have. 

I think a lot of times what is mistaken here, and I say the appro-
priate—I  think  you  have  to  go  in—these  people  are  business  peo-
ple,  they  run  publicly  traded  companies,  they  have  responsibilities 
to  their  shareholders.  They  have  to  be  sure  that  the  folks  that 
they’re  doing  business  with  will  succeed.  If  you’re  in  business,  you 
want  your  partners  to  succeed.  And  I  think  that  there’s  just  a  lot 
of  misconception  out  there.  So  when  I  say  the  appropriate—being 
appropriate about it is following the right protocol in order to gath-
er up these folks and become partners in the distribution of digital 
media. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I’m  really  looking  for  the  question  of  whether 
any of you at the table will seek to have Congress address this de-
cision  and  alter  the  course  of  events  in  any  way.  Any  of  you  seek 
to have a change, following this court decision, of the way Congress 
addresses the issue of privacy on the Internet? 

Mr. Bainwol? 
Mr. BAINWOL. No. We believe the Court struck the right balance, 
and  Congress  should  leave  well  enough  alone.  As  Mr.  Baker  sug-
gested, if we live life a little bit and see that there are issues down 
the  road—but  right  now  it’s  very  clear  that  you  have  a  very  broad 
consensus. Tech companies are happy. Content’s happy. The Court 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

did  the  right  thing,  and  they  found  the  right  balance,  so  let’s  let 
it go and see how it works. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  But  if  you  own  some  of  those  rights,  copyrights, 

Mr. BAINWOL. We are happy with this outcome. Yes, sir. I mean, 

The CHAIRMAN. I said if you owned the copyrights, would you be 

would you be happy? 

that’s the point. 

happy? 

Mr.  BAINWOL.  Yes,  sir.  No,  as  we—we  are  companies  that  have 
copyrights,  and  we  believe  that  the  right  balance  was  struck  here. 
Our  view  is  that  we  want  to  be  able  to  engage  in  business  in  the 
digital  space  with  responsible  partners,  and  those  are  folks  like 
Greg  Kerber,  from  Wurld  Media,  who  believe  that  we  ought  to  be 
compensated  for  our  property.  So,  there  is  a  way  to  have  a  bright 
future  for  peer-to-peer  that  provides  music  for  fans  and  also  pro-
vides compensation for creators. 
Mr. EISGRAU. Mr. Chairman? 
The CHAIRMAN. Yes, sir, Mr. Eisgrau? 
Mr. EISGRAU. Thank you, sir. 
I  would  simply  note,  for  the  Committee’s  consideration,  that  the 
collective—the  voluntary  collective  licensing  model  that  we’re  sug-
gesting—which would not require legislation, to answer your ques-
tion, but probably would require some committee encouragement in 
order  to  explore  more  fully—has  the  potential  to  provide  revenue 
to  copyright  holders,  by  the  millions,  who  are  not  presently  within 
the  large  record-label  system.  There  are  many—I  can’t  quantify  it 
for  you  exactly,  Mr.  Chairman,  but  I  have  to  believe  there  are 
many  songwriters,  there  are  many  performers  who  are  out  there 
waiting  on  tables  and  working  other  jobs,  perhaps  hoping  for  a 
record contract, and who are using peer-to-peer to a good degree to 
get their music out there, but presently, without a voluntary collec-
tive licensing setup, there is no way for them to receive compensa-
tion.  So,  to  the  extent  that  there  is  a  role  for  the  Committee  to 
play,  I  suppose  the  good  news  for  the  moment  is,  it  is  not  legisla-
tive with respect to copyrights, but exploration, we believe, of a col-
lective—voluntary  collective  license  of  this  kind  has  the  potential 
to  maximize  peer-to-peer  technology  not  just  for  the  major  record 
labels and companies, of which there are four, soon to be three, but 
literally  for  thousands  and  thousands  of  individuals.  And  we  hope 
that’s  of  interest  to  all  of  the  appropriate  committees  of  jurisdic-
tion,  perhaps  even  small  business,  that  I  note  a  number  of  mem-
bers of this committee also sit on, sir. 

The CHAIRMAN. Mr.—Heesen? 
Mr. HEESEN. Correct, thank you. 
As  I  said  in  my  statement.  We  are  not  coming  to  Congress  to 
look  for  any  legislative  changes  here,  but  we  would  urge  Congress 
to continue to look at the suits that are filed as a result of this de-
cision,  and  the  numbers  that  are  filed,  and,  at  the  appropriate 
time, if it becomes to the point of another area where the entertain-
ment  industry  continues  to  sue  and  sue  and  sue,  then  I  think  we 
may  have  to  come  back  and  look  at  that.  But,  at  this  point,  we 
think, as we stated, that there should be some breathing room here 
and  everyone,  kind  of,  look  at  the  decision  and  let  the  courts  and 
the marketplace work things out. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  do  you  believe—do  you  all  believe  that  we 
should  just,  sort  of,  accept  the  fact  that  there’s  going  to  be  illegal 
file-sharing, and it will increase over the years? 

Mr. Bainwol? 
Mr.  BAINWOL.  Yes—no,  sir.  We—illegal  file-sharing  is  wrong.  It 

needs to be contained. And we need to—— 

The CHAIRMAN. How do you—— 
Mr. BAINWOL.—help foster—— 
The  CHAIRMAN.—propose  to  do  that?  How  do  you  propose  to  do 

that? 

Mr.  BAINWOL.  Well,  with  Grokster—the  Grokster  decision  was  a 
good  first  step,  because  it  provided  moral  clarity,  and  it  tells  the 
world and it tells parents and teachers that there’s a right way and 
a  wrong  way.  What  we’ve  got  to  do  is  de-mythologize  this  whole 
question. And you’ve got companies, like those that my fellow pan-
elist  represents,  who  basically  are  the  equivalent  of  Jesse  James 
robbing  the  bank  and  then  coming  back  to  the  bank  and  saying, 
‘‘we  want  the  franchise  to  provide  security  for  that  bank.’’  They 
take our property, and then say they want to be licensed. If—there 
are  legitimate  players  out  in  the  marketplace.  They  are  doing  fine 
with licenses. 

Now, what we can do to protect and to move toward a world that 
is  more  legitimate  is  simply  to  use—we’ve  got  to  enforce  the  laws 
that  are  on  the  books.  We  do  that—self-help—we  engage  in  our 
own  litigation  to  make  sure  that  there’s  a  deterrent.  The  Govern-
ment is stepping up in a huge way. The Department of Justice has 
done  a  great  job  in  going  after  these  networks.  And  that’s  really 
the  secret.  We’ve  got  to  create  a  society,  foster  society,  where  the 
value of IP is recognized and appreciated and kids are taught that 
there’s a right way to do this, and you ought to pay for it. 

Mr.  EISGRAU.  Mr.  Chairman,  may  I  respond?  The  people  I  rep-

resent were just impugned to a pretty serious degree. 

The CHAIRMAN. I’m out of time, but go ahead. 
Mr. EISGRAU. Thank you, I appreciate that. 
Very  briefly,  these  are  very  complicated  issues,  and  I  have  to 

make a respectful plea for precision in language. 

The  companies  that  were  at  issue  in  the  Supreme  Court’s  deci-
sions,  the  other  companies  who  are  members  of  Peer-to–Peer 
United,  do  not  take  anybody’s  property.  They  are  software  devel-
opers,  sir.  They  have  developed  pipes,  pipes  in  the  way  that  the 
Internet is a pipe and broadband connectivity is a pipe. They have 
created  a  product  that  people  do,  in  fact,  misuse—and  do,  in  fact, 
significantly  misuse—to  infringe  the  copyrights  of  the  companies 
Mr.  Bainwol  represents.  But  there  are  no  thieves  in  P2P  United, 
sir.  There  are  companies  who  have  attempted,  over  years,  to  work 
with the labels, going back to 2003. This committee heard evidence 
a  year  ago,  in  the  Competition  Subcommittee,  of  potential  black-
listing  by  the  labels  in  the  form  of  a  deal  between  RealNetworks 
and  StreamCast,  one  of  the  cases—one  of  the  parties  to  the  Su-
preme Court’s case. 

So,  my  point  is  simply,  Mr.  Chairman,  that  we  need  to  be  very 
focused  on  exactly  what  this  technology  is,  what  kind  of  actions 
parties  in  this  space  are  pursuing.  And  if  we’re  going  to  maximize 
the  potential  of  this  technology,  then  I  would  respectfully  suggest 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

to  Mr.  Bainwol  that  his  hope—and  Mr.  Goldring,  the  Hollywood 
music lawyer, backs me on up on this—I would hope that we would 
look  at  the  realities  of  the  marketplace,  not  just  as  we  hope  they 
might be, but as they are, and maximize the potential for all copy-
right  holders,  not  just  the  institutional  ones  Mr.  Bainwol  rep-
resents. 

The CHAIRMAN. I’m out of time, but I’m really concerned that the 
Internet  service  providers  seem  to  be  telling  us,  ‘‘Look,  we  provide 
this  service,  but  we  can’t  control  what  goes  on,  on  it.’’  It  reminds 
me of the old story about the piano player in the gambling hall, or 
the house of you-know-what, not knowing what was going on. Now, 
you  know,  somewhere  there’s  a  responsibility  here  to  look  at  the 
Supreme Court opinion and say that there’s a way to move forward 
and  say,  ‘‘We’re  not  going  to  condone  the  illegal  use  of  intellectual 
property.’’  Now,  I  don’t  know  where  it  is,  but  I  hope  we  can  find 
some response to that. 

Senator—— 
Mr.  EISGRAU.  You  will  find  that,  exactly,  on  our  website,  for 

starters, Mr. Chairman. 

The CHAIRMAN. Senator Inouye? 
Senator INOUYE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr. Bainwol, Mr. Attaway, Mr. Eisgrau suggested that this deci-
sion  will  have  no  practical  effect  or  impact  on  our  marketplace. 
What are your thoughts? 

Mr.  ATTAWAY.  Senator,  I  think  he  is  wrong.  I  think  it  will  have 
a  huge  impact  on  the  way  that  the  parties  behave  and  on—ulti-
mately, on the amount of piracy on the Internet. I think this case, 
even  though  it  was  a  compromise  between  the  various  interests, 
creates  strong  incentives  for  all  of  the  parties,  including  the  ISPs, 
to work together to address the problem of piracy. 

And, to respond to the Chairman’s earlier question, I think right 
now that’s good enough. If, ultimately, this decision does not create 
the  appropriate  atmosphere  to  deal  with  the  piracy  problem,  then 
I  think  maybe  the  Congress  does  need  to  act.  But,  for  right  now, 
this decision, I think, provides what we need to deal with—with pi-
racy on the Internet today. 

Mr. BAINWOL. Let me just simply add, there are a lot of numbers 
flying around about usage, and it gets very confusing, because you 
have  files  that  are  spoofed,  you’ve  got  users  that  are  not  real.  The 
best set of numbers that I’ve seen come from an outfit called MPD, 
because it’s not attitudinal, it’s actually a monitor of 10,000 house-
holds,  so  the  data’s  fairly  reliable.  And  what  that  tells  us  is,  over 
the past 2 years, the P2P illegal use has gone up just a touch, but 
has  basically  been  flat,  as  broadband  has  gone  up  by—Mr.  Baker, 
what,  by  about  50–55  percent  in  the  last  couple  of  years?  So, 
broadband  has  been  soaring,  but  P2P  use  has  been  relatively  con-
stant in the very best measure that we can identify. 

Two  years  ago,  if  you  looked  at  the  percent  of  households  that 
engaged  in  the  legal  acquisition  of  music  over  the  Internet,  it  was 
zero,  basically  zero.  That’s  about  4  percent  today.  Those  lines  are 
going  to  cross.  The  illegal  household  numbers,  9  or  10  percent, 
that’s going to hold flat. With the Grokster decision, that will prob-
ably even come down. The legal marketplace is going to go up, and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

shoot up toward 25–30 percent over time. And the question is how 
fast those lines intersect. 

But  Grokster  provides  the  societal  message  that  there’s  a  right 
way and there’s a wrong way. Those lines are going to cross sooner 
as  a  consequence,  and  that  means  we’ll  be  able  to  invest  more  in 
new art. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Then  your  predecessor  was  wrong,  in  your 

mind, as to her comments? 

Mr.  BAINWOL.  I 

think  my  predecessor  may  have  been 
mischaracterized.  She  has  told  me  that.  We  believe  that,  in  the 
end,  this  is  about  the  marketplace.  There’s  no  question.  But  the 
question here is whether it’s a legitimate marketplace or an illegit-
imate  marketplace.  And  this  decision  will  help  create  a  day  where 
the  legitimate  marketplace  can  take  off.  That’s  why  it  was  so  im-
portant that Mr. Kerber said that, after this decision, venture cap-
italists  started  calling  him  with  a  greater  level  of  interest.  Capital 
will flow. Once we respect property, then the basis of our great sys-
tem has a chance to take off. 

Senator INOUYE. Thank you. 
Mr.  Kerber,  in  your  testimony,  you  suggested  that  your  tech-
nology  will  enable  you  to  download—customers  to  download  and 
share  every  kind  of  digital  media  without  viruses,  without  child 
pornography,  unauthorized  content,  et  cetera,  et  cetera.  You  really 
believe that you can have a pristine environment like that? 

Mr.  KERBER.  Absolutely.  We—it’s  built,  and  it  has  been  in  beta 
for  7  months,  and  it’s  about  to  go  out  to  the  public  on  Friday  of 
next week. 

The  bottom  line  with  this,  in  our  minds,  from  a  business  stand-
point,  technology  is  not  the  equivalent  of  anarchy.  The  thing  that 
is  so  dynamic  and  great  about  technology  is—I  mean,  if  you  could 
imagine eBay, and if you could imagine Wal-Mart for that instance, 
where  they  lose  control  of  their  supply  chain  and  how  they  would 
service  their  customer,  the  scalability  of  a  peer-to-peer  is—there’s 
nothing  equivalent  to  it  in  the  distribution  of  content.  In  a  cen-
trally  controlled  peer-to-peer,  with  what  we  call  traffic  cop  that 
knows what’s out on the network, and that allows consumers a cen-
tralized  search  with  decentralized  distribution,  meaning  that  the 
consumer participates in the distribution, is absolutely doable, and 
we have succeeded in building that system. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Mr.  Heesen,  you  commented  that  this  decision 
will  have  an  impact  upon  your  investors.  It  makes  no  difference 
what the technology is? 

Mr. HEESEN. Venture capitalists invest in those technologies that 
they believe, at the end of the day, will give them a significant re-
turn  on  investment  for  pension  funds  and  colleges’  endowments, 
while,  at  the  same  time,  making  sure  that  the  technologies  that 
they are investing in have as few roadblocks to success as possible. 
You  lower  the  roadblocks,  the  more  likely  the  venture  capitalist  is 
going to invest in that particular technology. 

So,  right  now  we  have  invested  heavily  in  the  life-science  area. 
If suddenly Congress decides to change healthcare policy, you could 
very  easily  see  that  money  leave  the  life-science  area  and  go  into 
another area that has fewer roadblocks. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

So, when you have certainty and fewer roadblocks, you are going 
to  have  a  venture  capitalist  looking  much  more  seriously  at  that 
particular  technology,  particularly  in  an  area  where  they  think,  at 
the  end  of  the  day,  there  is,  once  again,  a  destructive  technology 
out there that can change the way we live, while, at the same time, 
making a very handsome return for its investors. 

Senator INOUYE. Would your investors believe that technology to 

prevent illegal downloading will make money or lose money? 

Mr.  HEESEN.  You  know,  frankly,  I  couldn’t  tell  you  what  a  ven-
ture  capitalist  would  be  thinking  in  that  mind.  I  would  think  that 
they would be looking at it from the point of view as there is prob-
ably  thousands  of  companies  trying  to  do  that  today,  and  the  ven-
ture capitalist would look at it and say, of those thousands of com-
panies,  which  two  or  three  have  the  potential  to  take  control  of 
that market and then try to work specifically with those companies 
to make those companies successful. 

Senator  INOUYE.  What  are  the  benefits,  Mr.  Eisgrau,  of  this— 
convening  this  convention  of  relevant  stakeholders?  What  would 
you—what would be the outcome of that now—— 

Mr. EISGRAU. I appreciate that question. 
Senator INOUYE.—that people like Mr. Bainwol and Mr. Attaway 

say it won’t work? 

Mr.  EISGRAU.  I  think  the  outcome,  first  and  foremost,  Senator, 
will  be  knowledge.  It  will  be  a  group  of  people  convened  by  the 
Committee  with  substantive  technical  knowledge,  with  experience 
in the marketplace, who, with no disrespect to my fellow advocate, 
Mr.  Bainwol,  are  not  simply  advocates,  but  folks  who  actually  un-
derstand, in great detail, how the systems might work. 

If I might share with you, Senator, in the event that that process 
somehow  did  manage  to  produce  a  voluntary  collective  licensing 
system  to  serve  alongside  with  every  new  technology,  such  as  that 
of  Wurld  Media,  that  might  come  along,  no  contradiction  between 
that,  sir.  Let  me  share  just  a  couple  of  quick  bullet  points  of  what 
might come about with that sort of a system: 

Artists and rights-holders will get paid for what are now literally 

billions of noncompensable music downloads. 

Government  intervention  in  the  market  will  be  limited,  because 

it’s a voluntary system. 

Broadband  technology  will  get  a  very  significant  boost,  because 
the  so-called  ‘‘killer  application’’  of  broadband—namely,  Internet 
file-sharing—will be lawful and enabled. 

Investment dollars, one might presume, will pour into the newly 

legitimized system. 

Music  fans  will  finally  have  completely  legal  access  to  an  essen-
tially  unlimited  selection  of  music,  whether  it’s  offered  from  a 
major label or not. 

The distribution bottleneck, as I alluded to earlier, that has lim-

ited opportunities for independent artists, will be removed. 

And  payment  will  come  only  from  those  persons  who  choose  to 

participate in the system. 

I  can’t  promise  you,  Senator,  that  all  of  those  things  will  come 
to pass. I think the potential that they might warrant at least seri-
ous  discussion,  and,  conversely,  should  not  entitle  any  individual 
stakeholder to say, ‘‘We’re simply not coming.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

Senator INOUYE. Thank you. My time is up. 
Mr. EISGRAU. Thank you, sir. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Pryor? 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr.  Eisgrau,  if  I  may  start  with  you,  just—and  I  may  have 
missed this, because I had to step out for the vote, and I may have 
missed  what  you  said  in  your  opening  statement,  but  just  give  us, 
if  you  can,  the  bottom-line  impact  that  the  Grokster  decision  has 
on your industry. 

Mr. EISGRAU. Litigation. The—— 
Senator PRYOR. Does it create uncertainty for you? 
Mr. EISGRAU. It certainly does, sir. The one certain thing is that 
there will be additional litigation regarding the parties to that spe-
cific  case.  There  is  much  that  remains  uncertain  about  the  law  of 
secondary liability and how this new inducement test the court ar-
ticulated will play out. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Do  you  see  that  the  growth  in  the  industry  that 
you’ve  had  in  the  last  several  years,  which  has  been  fairly  phe-
nomenal—— 

Mr. EISGRAU. Yes, sir. 
Senator  PRYOR.—has  it  not?  Do  you  think  that  growth  will  be 

sustained, or do you see steady growth, or what do you see? 

Mr.  EISGRAU.  We  certainly  do  see  steady  growth.  The  Rolling 
Stone  article  I  alluded  to  in  my  testimony  also  reported  that  the 
current level of peer-to-peer usage would be about nine million uses 
per month, Senator. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Are  you—if  you  can  speak  for  the  industry,  is 

your industry happy with the decision, or not? 

Mr. EISGRAU. I’d have to say that, based on the statements of the 
parties  to  the  case,  the  public  statements  that  were  made,  that 
they  were  certainly  disappointed  in  the  Court’s  focus  on  what  the 
court  believed  to  have  been  established  facts  in  the  record.  They 
are  hopeful  and  confident  that  when  this  goes  back  to  the  District 
Court,  that  some  of  those  misunderstandings  may  be  clarified.  I 
think  they  were  also  disturbed,  as  many  technologists,  the  Con-
sumer  Electronics  Association  among  them,  noted,  with  the  uncer-
tainties  in  the  secondary  liability  standards  that  we’re  now  living 
with that will have to be played out in the courts. 

Senator PRYOR. All right. Let me ask about Grokster in terms of 
domestic  versus  international  considerations  there,  particularly 
with  offshore  peer-to-peer  companies.  What  does  Grokster  do  with 
domestic versus offshore? 

Mr.  EISGRAU.  If  I  understand  your  question,  Senator—please  in-
terrupt  me  if  I  don’t—Grokster,  itself,  is  incorporated  in  Nevis, 
West  Indies.  That  did  not  stop  them  from  voluntarily  fully  partici-
pating, quite clearly, all the way to the Supreme Court in this liti-
gation. One other member of Peer-to-Peer United is based in Spain, 
and  the  others  are  absolutely  born-and-bred  U.S.  companies  from 
the  State  of  Oregon,  the  State  of  Florida,  and  the  State  of  New 
York. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

Senator  PRYOR.  So,  you  don’t  see  any  differentiation  depending 

on what nation they’re—— 

Mr.  EISGRAU.  Doesn’t  appear  to  be,  sir.  What  I  can  tell  you  is, 
there  is  a  big  difference  between  the  companies  that  founded  P2P 
United  two  years  ago  and  the  companies  that  said,  ‘‘You  know 
what? We can hide in the shadows. We don’t have to deal with any-
body. We don’t have to try to negotiate licenses with the recording 
industry,  only  to  have  the  plug  pulled  on  the  deal  as  a  result  of 
a  black  list.’’  What  we  do  find  is  that  this  problem  that  scholars 
have  referred  to  as  the  imminent  ‘‘Darknet’’  is  a  very  significant 
danger. And the continuing attitudes that the members of my asso-
ciation  have  are,  that  they  not  to  be  dealt  with  because  they’re  pi-
rates,  or  worse,  we  believe,  with  respect,  is  highly  counter-
productive. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Well,  just  for  the  whole  panel,  I’d  like  to,  after 
the hearing or whenever it’s convenient, if you all ever want to talk 
about the Darknet and some of the issues that he’s referred to, I’d 
enjoy doing that. 

Let me ask, if I can, Mr. Kerber, what impact does Grokster have 

on your business, in your industry? 

Mr. KERBER. I think what it has done, coming from the financial 
world, in my background, certainty is a good thing for the financial 
world.  So,  what  it  has  done  for  investment  is,  it’s  made  a  clear 
path  for  those  venture  capitalists,  any  type  of  investor—equity  in-
vestors,  hedge  funds—that  would  come  in  and  invest  in  the  poten-
tial  of  a  small  company  that  can  flourish  in  the  potential  growth 
that  digital  media  offers.  It  allows  that  to  occur  now.  I  think  that 
from  what  we  can  see  in  the  marketplace,  just  based  on  our  own 
experience,  that  what  it’s  enabled  and  what  it  has  done  is,  it’s 
made  the  equity  investor,  who  has  a  fiduciary  responsibility  to 
their investors, to—comfortable with investing in what was a rogue 
technology for a very long time. 

Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  Mr.  Heesen,  we’ve  been  talking  about  the 
changes  that  Grokster  has  brought  to  all  of  you.  Let  me  ask  you 
this  question.  I  assume,  with  the  changes  that  we’ve  all  talked 
about, there could be new business opportunities. Do you see some 
new  business  opportunities,  or  do  you  see  a—what  do  you  see  for 
the future, in light of Grokster? 

Mr.  HEESEN.  Well,  I  agree  that  I  think  there  is  a  bit  more  cer-
tainty. There are some issues regarding secondary liability that we 
continue to be concerned about. Frankly, if I were going to tell you 
what  technologies  are  going  to  come  out  as  a  result  of  Grokster,  I 
would  not  be  representing  my  membership  well,  because  they’re 
the  ones  who  want  to  be  finding  those  technologies  and  creating 
those jobs and finding those good companies out there to invest in. 
So, all of that is being worked on, frankly, in garages all across the 
country  by  entrepreneurs  right  now,  and  they’re  not  going  to  tell 
me  that  answer,  and  they  certainly  aren’t  going  to  tell  you,  Sen-
ator. 

Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  If  I  may,  Mr.  Bainwol,  flip  over  to  you  very 
quickly,  because  I  know  we’re—the  clock  is  running  here.  But,  as 
we  all  know,  throughout  the  course  of  the  music  industry,  there 
have  been  technologies  out  there,  things  like  cassette  tapes  and 
even  people  pressing  unauthorized  vinyl  copies,  et  cetera.  I  know 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

that,  like  back  in  the  1960s  and  1970s,  you  had  the  basement 
tapes,  you  know,  from  various  groups,  including  Bob  Dylan  and  a 
bunch  of  others.  But  how—as  a—in  comparison  with  that  type  of 
piracy,  you  know,  where  people  were  copying  albums  and  distrib-
uting to friends or sold them, kind of, black market—compare that 
sort of regime to what we’re looking at with the peer-to-peer. Com-
pare that. 

Mr. BAINWOL. Yes, there are two huge differences. One is quality. 
When  you  taped  off  the  radio,  you  had  a  degradation  of  quality. 
Now  you  can  get  perfect  digital  copies.  And,  two,  your  ability  to 
share exponentially with millions of people around the world is im-
mediate  and  automatic.  So,  that’s  the  challenge.  The  nature  of  the 
piracy is far more virulent, and the velocity of the piracy is far fast-
er. 

I’d  like  to  take  a  second,  if  I  could,  on  a  point  that  Mr.  Eisgrau 
raised.  We  have  licensed,  happily,  lots  of  legitimate  players 
throughout  the  digital  space,  including  the  peer-to-peer  world. 
Licensing’s  not  a  problem.  There  are  songwriters  who  have  lost 
their livelihoods—and artists and musicians—not because of that— 
some  of  these  illegitimate  folks  in  the  P2P  space  have  not  been  li-
censed.  They  have  lost  it  precisely  because  they  have  set  up  sys-
tems that are predicated on theft. The Supreme Court said the ob-
jective is unmistakable. 

The  fix  here  is  for  these  companies  to  say,  ‘‘We’re  going  to  em-
brace legitimate commerce. We’re going to go straight. We’re going 
to  convert.  And  we’re  going  to  shut  down  our  systems  and  go 
straight.’’ That’s the answer. 

Senator PRYOR. Mr. Attaway, last question, and that is, pirating 
movies  is  a  growing  phenomenon.  We  know  that.  We  see  that  all 
over the world. Are there any differences in—from your standpoint, 
in  the  illegal  sharing  of  music  files  versus  video  files?  And  I  guess 
what  I’m  asking  is,  if  there  is,  tell  us  what  they  are  and  tell  us 
whether you think Congress should be involved in that in any way. 

Mr. ATTAWAY. Well—— 
Senator PRYOR. That’s it. 
Mr. ATTAWAY. There are no legal differences. Fortunately for the 
motion  picture  industry,  there  are  technical  differences,  in  that  it 
takes  a  much  bigger  pipe  to  download  a  full-length  motion  picture 
than it does a musical work. But, either way, it is theft, it is piracy, 
and it needs to be dealt with. As I said earlier, I think the Supreme 
Court  decision,  in  Grokster,  has  given  us  tools  to  deal  with  that 
issue,  and  I  don’t  think  that  there  are  major  things  that  Congress 
needs  to  do  right  now  to  help  us.  If  the  tools  we  have  turn  out  to 
be  inadequate,  we  very  well  may  be  back  up  here  asking  you  to 
help us deal with this problem. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator Ensign? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN ENSIGN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEVADA 

Senator  ENSIGN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  And  thank  you  for 
holding  what  I  consider  to  be  a  very  important  hearing  on  a  dif-
ficult issue, as we’re seeing here at the table. Intellectual property 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

is one of our biggest exports from America. Intellectual property is 
very  valuable,  and  I  agree  with  those  who  think  that  intellectual 
property  rights  need  to  be  protected.  Whether  you  are  a  recording 
artist  or  a  motion  picture  producer  or  software  developer  or  what-
ever  it  is,  somebody  who  has  created  something—just  like  some-
body  who  has  a  patent—must  have  adequate  protection  for  his  or 
her intellectual property. 

Having said that, if we could explore this idea of disruptive tech-
nologies—not just with the idea of peer-to-peer, but disruptive tech-
nologies from an investing standpoint. From venture capitalist per-
spective,  Mr.  Heesen,  can  you  address  how  tertiary  liability  could 
potentially affect investing in disruptive technologies in the future. 
Such  disruptive  technologies  have  the  potential  to  foster  huge 
breakthroughs  in  healthcare  that  could  save  lives.  Similarly,  dis-
ruptive  technologies  can  impact  the  economy  in  ways  that  extend 
beyond what we’re just talking about today. 

Mr.  HEESEN.  It’s  an  absolute  major  issue.  If  the  venture-capital 
firm, itself, and the individuals of that venture-capital firm, can be 
sued  because  they  invested  in  a  technology  that  is  perfectly  legal, 
but  that  somebody  other  than—and  that  technology  move  forward, 
and  they  invested  in  that  company,  and  that  company  was  doing 
perfectly  legal  things,  and  somebody  else  comes  along  and  starts 
doing illegal things as a result of that new technology, and we are 
sued  because  of  that,  that  would  shut  down  our  interest  in  that 
area. I mean, it’s just—it would very quickly dissipate. And venture 
capitalists  are  very  agile  in  shutting  down  companies  and  moving 
on  to  something  else.  I  mean,  it’s  something  that  we  don’t  like  to 
do, but it’s done very quickly. And so—— 

Senator ENSIGN. Can you—— 
Mr.  HEESEN.—we  would  move  into  another  area  of  technology, 

absolutely. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  Along  those  lines,  can  you  give  me  your 
thoughts  on  the  distinctions  between  being  a  passive  investor  as  a 
venture  capitalist,  versus  an  active  investor  with  management  re-
sponsibilities or the appearance of management responsibilities. 

Mr.  HEESEN.  Well,  venture  capitalists  will  take  an  active  role  in 
the  overall  operation  of  a  company,  in  the  respect  that  they  are 
putting  money  in,  and  it’s  very  often  substantial  amounts  of 
money,  and  they’re  saying,  you  know,  ‘‘We  want  to  see  this  com-
pany  go  in  this  direction  over  the  next  10  years.’’  It’s—we  don’t 
care  about  what’s  happening  in  a—frankly,  in  a  day-to-day  oper-
ation,  but  from  a  5-  to  10-year  perspective,  we  want  to  see  that 
company  grow  to  the  point  where  it  can  be  acquired  by  a  larger 
company  or  it  can  go  public.  And  so,  anything  that  comes  along 
that is going to change that outcome, we want to know about, and 
we’re  going  to  take  an  active  role  in  making  sure  that  the  long- 
range goals of that company remain the way we’d like to see them. 
We  don’t  always  have  a  majority  stake  in  companies.  Most  of  the 
time we might have 10 to 15 percent, and there might be a couple 
of venture-capital firms that, together, may have a majority owner-
ship of a company. But it depends on the technology, actually, very 
often. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  Mr.  Bainwol,  I  want  to  be  fair  to  your  industry 
in this regard, and I know you have a different opinion about this. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

If you could address the concern that I just raised about disruptive 
technologies,  the  idea  of  things  that  could  tremendously  change 
people’s lives for the better, and the fear of venture capitalists that 
if  there  is  tertiary  liability  it  could  shut  down  the  investment  nec-
essary to develop disruptive technologies. 

Mr. BAINWOL. Right. 
Senator  ENSIGN.  Please  discuss  this  issue  from  your  industry’s 

perspective. 

Mr.  BAINWOL.  Sure.  I  think  the  key  thing  is—I  guess  there  are 
two points. One is to distinguish technology from conduct. Grokster 
is  not  about  technology.  Grokster,  the  decision,  itself,  is  tech  neu-
tral. The decision is about conduct. They said the objective of these 
entrepreneurs was unmistakable, which was basically to perpetrate 
a  fraud,  it  was  to  induce  second—to  induce  illegal  behavior;  and, 
therefore, they said, they’re responsible for it. So, the question here 
is conduct, not technology. 

I’m  not  an  attorney,  so  I  can’t  speak  to  questions  of  tertiary  li-
ability. But if you engage in that conduct, then that’s probably not 
tertiary.  And  that’s  really  the  relevant  question.  When  you  get  in-
volved,  and  you  actively  manage  and  you  make  choices,  and  you 
are  responsible  for  that  conduct,  then  it’s  not  tertiary.  And  then 
you’re, I think, well within the grasp of this decision. 

Senator ENSIGN. Mr. Eisgrau, you wanted to comment? 
Mr.  EISGRAU.  Just  a  brief  word,  sir.  I  don’t  disagree  with  Mr. 
Bainwol’s characterization about what the court said about the po-
tential  culpability  of  conduct  after  further  judicial  proceedings.  I 
would  take  respectful  issue,  however,  to  say  that  the  uncertainty 
that  is  left  in  the  wake  of  the  Supreme  Court’s  recent  ruling  with 
respect  to  exactly  what  the  parameters  of  secondary  and,  as  you 
point  out,  tertiary  liability  for  investors  might  be,  ought  to  be  of 
some  concern.  And  certainly  P2P  United  and  the  Electronic  Fron-
tier  Foundation,  with  which  we  co-prepared  our  testimony,  would 
concur  with  that  of  the  National  Venture  Capital  Association  in 
flagging  this  for  the  Committee  and  urging  it  to,  kind  of,  keep  a 
weather  eye  out  for  potential  disincentives  to  invest  based  on  the 
uncertainty of those legal standards. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  To  finish  out  on  this,  is  this  something  that 

needs to be clarified in law? 

Mr.  HEESEN.  At  this  point,  we  would  say  that  it’s  best  for—as  I 
said, to have some breathing room here. We would not be run—we 
do not believe that we should be running to Congress at this point 
to have any changes made. I think that the courts have a responsi-
bility right now, and we were—take a wait and see attitude at this 
point. 

Mr.  EISGRAU.  Senator,  if  I  may,  again,  very  briefly,  we  would 
agree with that, insofar as the standards of liability are concerned. 
But  both  the  Venture  Capitalist  Association  and  our  testimony 
points out that potentially crushing an astronomical statutory-dam-
age liability may no longer have a place in this now-uncertain envi-
ronment,  and  that  is  something  that  could  be  statutorily  reformed 
and,  we  think,  merits  discussion  both  in  this  committee  and  other 
committees of jurisdiction. 

Senator ENSIGN. I want to ask Mr. Kerber a question. 
Mr. KERBER. Yes, I—if I could respond—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

Senator ENSIGN. Hold on. Maybe in your response—— 
Mr. KERBER. OK. 
Senator  ENSIGN.  Let  me  get  my  question  in  first,  because  my 

time is about to run out. 

Mr. KERBER. OK. Go ahead. 
Senator  ENSIGN.  In  your  testimony,  you  state  that  the  Grokster 
decision  clearly  illustrates  that  our  system  of  government  is  work-
ing  to  achieve  the  correct  balance  between  protecting  the  creators 
of  intellectual  property  and  advancing  technology.  Do  you  believe 
that  the  inducement  standard  provided  in  the  Grokster  decision  is 
clear  enough  to  guide  your  future  activities  as  a  peer-to-peer  com-
pany? 

Mr.  KERBER.  Yes,  I  do.  And  I  also  would  add,  the  protection  of 
the  consumer  in  that  statement,  also.  It’s  very  clear  how  you  get 
investment.  The  rules  are  there.  We’re  a  P2P.  We’re  a  real  peer- 
to-peer.  It’s  centrally  controlled.  We  can  control  that  and  put  out 
on it. We can respect the copyright holder’s wants during—through 
a  contractual  process.  And  the  way  that  investors  realize  that  is 
when  they—when  we  go  out  and  get  deals  with  the  record  labels, 
movie studios, and they do their due diligence, the venture capitals 
do  their  due  diligence,  they  call,  and  they  find  out  that,  yes,  these 
guys—in  our  minds,  the  content  owners  of  these  assets,  yes,  we 
will  allow  this  to  be  transferred  and  distributed  and  sold  on  the 
network. 

So,  you  know,  going  back  to  the  clarity  issue,  there  is  one.  It’s 
very,  very  clear.  If  you  have  a  contract  from  a  major  label,  indie 
label,  movie  studio,  publisher,  what  they  have  said  is,  ‘‘We  will 
allow  the  content  to  be  sold  in  this  manner  across  our  network.’’ 
So,  I’m  a  little  confused  by—there’s  an  absolute  clear  path  for  an 
investor to understand what’s right and wrong in the process. 

Senator ENSIGN. Well, Mr. Chairman, this hearing is very impor-
tant, because it also illustrates—and this is something Mr. Bainwol 
talked  about—that  we  have  a  generation  of  kids  who  grew  up 
thinking  it’s  OK  to  steal  music,  it’s  OK  to  steal  movies,  it’s  OK  to 
steal  video  games,  whatever  the  intellectual  property  is.  And  I 
think  that  the  Grokster  decision  could  be  a  turning  point,  as  far 
as morality is concerned in this country. The Grokster decision may 
help  to  teach  the  next  generation  to  respect  private  property—the 
same  as  it’s  wrong  to  break  into  somebody’s  home,  it’s  wrong  to 
break  into  an  artist’s  library  and  steal  their  content.  I  think  that 
is  an  important  lesson  to  teach  the  next  generation  as  it  matures. 
I  don’t  know  how  much  we  can  do  about  the  generation  that  just 
grew  up  and  is  in  its  20s  now.  But  certainly—you  know,  I’ve  got 
a  13-year-old  at  home,  and  younger,  and  they  are  actually  talking 
about  it  now  differently  than  kids  were  talking  about  it  even  5 
years ago. They’re understanding that they need to purchase music 
and the like if they’re going to download it legally. And I think that 
that’s  a  dramatic  change  that  we  need  to  continue  to  enforce  and 
look  for  ways  that  we  can  encourage  that  type  of  behavior  in  this 
country. 

And I thank you, again, for holding this hearing. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  the  Senator’s—you’re  right,  but  the  real 
problem  that  I  have—we  were  informed  that—there  was  a  discus-
sion here this last week about the European Commission and what 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

they’re  trying  to  do  and  bring  about  a  gradual  response  to—from 
the providers, themselves, to illegal file-sharing. It doesn’t sound to 
me like there’s any motivation here for a mechanism to bring about 
some  standards  for  the  future,  as  far  as  these  organizations  are 
concerned, some type of body that would come into being by mutual 
desire  to  sort  of  set  standards  that  will  look  toward  copyright  pro-
tection.  Am  I  wrong?  Is  there  any  motivation  here  in  the  industry 
to  do  something,  because  of  Grokster,  that  will  give  us  a  concept 
of pushing back a little bit and saying, ‘‘Look, this is not right, and 
we’re  not  going  to  condone  it,  we’re  not  going  to  deal  with  people 
who do encourage this type of activity’’? 

Mr.  BAKER.  If  I  may,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  don’t  think  that  a  Euro-
pean Commission-style impetus is necessary here. I think we’re all 
in  agreement  that  we  don’t  condone  it,  and  I  think  that  the  Court 
was  abundantly  clear  that  one  may  not  induce  others  to  infringe 
on copyrights. And so, I think that this is being dealt with—— 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  I’m  informed  that  the  commission  has 
taken the position that they want to bring about a situation where 
the ISPs notify their clients that they’re going to be watching to see 
whether they, in fact, condone illegal activity. Am I wrong? 

Mr.  BAKER.  That—I’ll  agree  with  your  characterization  of  what 
the  European  Commission  said.  But,  again,  here,  we’ve  all  made 
abundantly clear to all of our members—and not just our company, 
but  Internet  providers,  across  the  board,  whether  they’re  inde-
pendent  Internet  providers,  phone  companies,  cable  companies, 
whoever—that  we  don’t  condone  this.  But  the  problem  is  that  you 
can’t take the provider of the pipe and make them a policeman. We 
transmit  literally  terabytes  of  information  every  hour.  It  would  be 
absolutely—I  mean,  it’s  physically  impossible  to  monitor  all  of  the 
traffic that crosses our network. I mean, we do monitor—we’re able 
to filter out viruses, we’re able to filter out spam, we’re able to fil-
ter  out  spyware,  things  like  this,  but  there’s  no  way,  when  there’s 
just  a  music  file  or  something  that’s  just  coming  across  the  net-
work,  number  one,  to  readily  identify  what  those  bits  of  informa-
tion are, number two, to know whether a—whether there is a copy-
right  on  that,  whether  somebody’s  downloading  it  legally,  illegally, 
et cetera. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Wait  a  minute.  Do  you  mean  to  tell  me  the  pro-
vider  won’t  know  that—if  there’s  constant  illegal  activity  going  on 
in its system? 

Mr.  BAKER.  That’s  what  I’m  saying,  Mr.  Chairman.  Trillions  of 
bits  of  information  every  hour  transmit  across  our  network, 
and—— 

The  CHAIRMAN.  But—you’re  telling  me  they  don’t  know?  Is  that 

what you’re saying? 

Mr.  BAKER.  I’m  saying  that,  as  an  Internet  provider,  we  don’t 
know  when  just  these  bits  of  information  flow  across  our  servers 
and  routers  and  off  to  other  carriers  and  across  backbones  that— 
to  know  what  that  content  is,  much  less  if  it  is  a—if  it  is,  say,  a 
music file, whether that’s been paid for by a legal service, or illegal. 
Now, some products, such as Apple iTunes, for instance, have a dif-
ferent  format;  and  so,  are  readily  identifiable.  And  so,  there’s  a 
pretty  high  level  of  confidence  that  those  have  been  paid  for.  But 
if  it’s  just  something  like  an  mp3  file,  it’s  just  a  generic  format. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

There  are,  again,  just  by  looking  at  those  bits  of  information, 
though,  you  can’t  tell  whether  a  fee  has  been  paid  on  that  or 
whether that was pirated. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  I’ve  got  to  yield  to  the  Senator  from  Cali-
fornia,  but  one  of  the  reasons  that  this  hearing  is  being  conducted 
is, we want to, sort of, send a notice, we are going to be watching. 
We  want  to  know,  What  are  you  going  to  do  to  follow  up  on  this 
to  take  the  path  the  Court  seems  to  think  could  be  taken  to  give 
greater  protection  to  this  copyrighted  material?  And  I  don’t  hear 
much,  myself,  that  indicates  that  there’s  going  to  be  any  attempt 
to  find  some  ways  to  set  some  standards  and  to  do  what  the  Sen-
ator  from  Nevada  suggests,  to  bring  into  the  new  generations  a 
concept that we do not condone stealing property. Now, I hope that 
we’re  being  heard.  I  do  hope  we’re  being  heard,  because  there  are 
people  in  the  Senate  who  want  us  to  move  now,  and  we’re  holding 
a  hearing  to  try  to  see  what  is  going  on  in  these  industries  to  see 
what might be done to terminate this illegal activity. 

The Senator from California? 

STATEMENT OF HON. BARBARA BOXER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM CALIFORNIA 

Senator BOXER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I want to associate myself with the remarks that you just made. 
And  I  just  want  to  take  a  minute  to  talk  about  the  way  I  see  the 
Grokster  decision.  And  if  I  get  something  wrong,  I’d  appreciate  if 
any  of  the  members  of  the  panel,  our  distinguished  panel,  will  let 
me  know  if  I’m  not  interpreting  it  right.  And  then  I  have  a  ques-
tion of Mr. Eisgrau. 

Grokster  was  a  unanimous  decision,  and  that’s  very  rare,  that 
the  court’s  justices,  who  represent  a  range  of  judicial  philosophies 
and personal perspectives come together in agreement. And, to me, 
it’s easy to see why, notwithstanding Mr. Eisgrau’s comments—but 
I have disagreements with Mr. Eisgrau on a number of issues. 

Fundamentally, the Court was simply saying that theft is wrong, 
no matter how you dress it up. And I would agree with Senator En-
sign  that  we  do  have  a  generation  out  there  that  says,  ‘‘The  best 
things in life are free, and it’s mine.’’ But I think they are learning. 
Even  that  generation  is  beginning  to  see  the  light,  because  of  the 
work  of  companies  like  Apple,  for  example,  who’s  now  making 
money  doing  something  right.  They  help  us  understand  that  prop-
erty  is  property.  If  somebody  steals  a  bike  in  front  of  your  house, 
they’re  a  thief,  and  if  they  steal  your  music,  they’re  a  thief.  And 
that’s  just  as  simple  as  it  gets.  And  especially  theft  of  intellectual 
property,  which  is  the  strongest  commodity  that  we  have.  Mr. 
Chairman, at this point what makes America so great is our intel-
lectual property. 

Companies  that  create  a  business  based  on  promoting  the  theft 
of intellectual property, and advertise their technology for such ille-
gal  uses,  should  be  held  accountable.  And  I  don’t  think  venture 
capital  should  go  to  them.  It’s  ridiculous.  And  I  appreciate  Mr. 
Heesen’s  comments,  that  he  doesn’t  think  we  should  have,  legisla-
tion  at  this  particular  point.  That  he  is  not  that  worried,  because 
venture  capitalists  don’t  want  to  put  their  money  in  something 
that’s  involved  in  thievery  or  that  will,  in  fact,  result  in  pornog-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

raphy  getting  to  our  children,  which  is  the  most  despicable  thing 
I’ve ever seen in my life. 

You  know  what  I’m  talking  about,  Mr.  Eisgrau.  You’ve  seen  the 
problem  there.  You  have  kids  thinking  that  they’re  going  to  get 
somebody’s  music,  and  they  click  on  a  link,  and  what  do  they  get? 
They get something horrific that could damage them forever. It’s a 
disgrace. And it has to be stopped. 

I  sent  you  a  letter,  along  with  a  bipartisan  group—it  was  Sen-
ators Durbin, Gordon Smith, Feinstein, Lindsey Graham, and John 
Cornyn.  That’s  the  range  of  Senators  around  here.  And  what  we 
basically  asked  is,  ‘‘what  are  you  doing  to  prevent  or  reduce  copy-
right  infringement  and  illegal  access  to  pornography? ’’  We’ve  writ-
ten  you  on  more  than  one  occasion.  When  I  say  ‘‘you,’’  let  me  say 
exactly  who  it  was—the  letter  was  to  the  owner  of  Grokster,  the 
president of BearShare, the president of eDonkey 2000—I don’t like 
that  name,  as  a  Democrat—president,  Lime  Wire,  president 
StreamCast Network’s Peer-to-Peer United. And it was delivered to 
Ms.  Nicki  Hemming,  CEO,  Sharman  Networks.  We  don’t  have  an 
answer from you. We’re very concerned about this. 

Now,  the  court  distinguished  between  situations  where  a  com-
pany  produces  a  technology  that  can  be  used  to  violate  copyright 
laws  but  has  other  legitimate  uses  and  a  situation  like  Grokster’s, 
where  a  company  actively  encourages  infringement  of  copyright 
through the use of its technology. It’s kind of like the intended use 
and  the  side-label  use.  What  is  the  intended  use?  That’s  what  the 
Court was getting at. 

And  it’s  important  to  remember  that  the  Court  merely  clarified 
the  legal  situation.  The  Court  didn’t  find  Grokster  or  anyone  else 
liable. The case was remanded for further consideration by a lower 
court. 

A  true  understanding  of  the  issue  will  not  be  known  until  the 
lower  courts  have  had  time  to  interpret  and  apply  the  decision  in 
different  cases.  In  a  year  or  so,  the  content  industry  will  have  a 
better idea of whether the ruling has decreased illegal file-sharing, 
and the technology industry will be able to assess whether innova-
tion and funding has been impacted. 

So,  it  seems  to  me  this  next  year  is  key,  but,  I  agree  with  the 
Chairman.  In  a  year’s  time,  if  you  don’t  move  to  protect  copyright, 
if  you  don’t  move  to  protect  our  children,  it’s  not  going  to  sit  well, 
regardless of what the court has said. 

I think the whole world is watching now, after the Grokster deci-
sion, and, in that post-Grokster world, I hope both industries flour-
ish.  Look,  for  me,  it’s  like  choosing  between  children.  In  my  state, 
I’ve  got  Hollywood,  I’ve  got  Silicon  Valley.  This  is  a  nightmare  for 
me. I’ve got the venture capitalists. I’ve got everybody. 

So, what do I want? I want everybody to come out of this in good 
shape. But there is a right and wrong here. That would be the end 
of my comments. 

But  I  do  have  a  question,  to  Mr.  Eisgrau.  Can  you  tell  me  what 
steps  you’re  taking  to  respond  to  my  letter,  the  letter  of  the  six  of 
us? In light of the case, how can companies such as BearShare and 
LimeWire  continue  to  promote  infringement?  Shouldn’t  they  take 
active steps now to stop infringement, even though the Court, kind 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

of,  said,  ‘‘Well,  figure  it  out.’’  Shouldn’t  they  be  moving  now?  And, 
if they are, what are they doing? 

Mr.  EISGRAU.  Thank  you,  Senator.  There  are  a  number  of  parts 

to that question. Let me see if I may respond to them in turn. 

First, with regard to your invitation to make a minor point with 
respect  to  the  characterization  of  the  Grokster  opinion,  itself,  the 
Court  did  not  find—it’s  my  understanding—that  if  a  technology 
does  not  have—that  it  must  demonstrate  legitimate  use  to  a 
broadscale  degree.  In  other  words,  it  left  the  initial  Sony  funda-
mental  premise  intact.  What  I  can  tell  you,  Senator,  with  respect 
to  the  technologies  of  P2P  United—which  do  not  include,  regret-
tably,  LimeWare  and  Sharman,  so  I  can’t  speak  for  them—on  a 
number of the issues you’ve raised, starting with pornography, first 
of  all,  the  individuals,  many  of  whom  are  parents  and  grand-
parents,  that  run  the  companies  that  are  members  of  P2P  United, 
believe  that  the  people  who  prey  on  our  children  and  who  per-
petrate  child  pornography  belong  in  prison,  or  worse.  And  that’s 
why  we’ve  been  cooperating  with  law  enforcement,  to  an  extensive 
degree,  to  try  to  deal  with  that  problem.  We  mounted  a  parent-to- 
parent resource center on our own website, which is linked to from 
every  website  of  the  members,  which  provides  resources,  including 
how  to  report  suspected  child  pornography,  including  links  to  out-
side  resources  so  that  parents  and  others  may  find  out  what  it  is, 
a  number  of  additional  resources,  as  well.  We  don’t  support  that. 
We do not run computers that house child pornography. We do not 
run  computer  networks  that  have  servers  that,  for  that  matter, 
house copyrighted information, Senator. 

So, the question, if I understood it correctly, that you were posing 
is—in the sense of, What are we doing?—is, How might we modify 
the  technology—which,  as  I  said  earlier,  perhaps  before  you  ar-
rived,  is  a  neutral  pipe,  in  the  same  way  the  Internet  and  the 
phone  system  is  a  neutral  pipe—how  might  we  modify  that  tech-
nology  to  affect  what  individuals  do  to  use  it  is,  frankly—we  can-
not,  and  we  are  not.  We  believe  that  the  solution  here  lies—par-
ticularly  with  respect  to  copyrighted  information—in,  perhaps,  the 
kind  of  system  of  collective  voluntary  licensing  that  we  were  dis-
cussing earlier. 

And, if I may take just a half-minute, literally, to flesh out what 
that  means,  in  practical  terms,  it’s  a  little,  perhaps,  unbelievable, 
at  first  blush,  to  realize  that  what  we  are  proposing  is  a  system 
that  artists  and  copyright  owners  would  elect  to  participate  in. 
That would mean that it would—they were saying it’s OK for their 
material  to  be  accessed  by  individuals  without  their  advance  per-
mission,  as  long  as  those  individuals  pay  into  a  collective.  That 
would mean that what is now unlawful downloading activity on the 
part of these individuals would, under such a system, be lawful. In 
the same way that it was illegal to take a drink during Prohibition, 
it  would  now  become  legal  for  that  download  to  occur,  because  a 
royalty system of compensation would be in place, administered by 
something  like  ASCAP,  and  measured  by  companies  that  the  re-
cording  industry,  itself,  now  uses,  similar  to  Nielsen  and  Arbitron, 
to determine what is being downloaded. 

Senator BOXER. Sorry—— 
Mr. EISGRAU. Yes, ma’am. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

Senator BOXER.—you lost me somewhere. I’m sorry. You lost me. 
[Laughter.] 
Mr. EISGRAU. I apologize. 
Senator BOXER. I want to follow what you—— 
Mr.  EISGRAU.  My  point,  Senator,  is,  first,  with  respect  to  copy-
right  infringement,  there  are  ways  to  rationalize  this  that  do  not 
involve  modifying  the  technology  so  that  the  neutral  pipe  is  some-
how  outfitted  with  a  system  that  allows  oversight  of  content.  We 
would share many of the same difficulties in looking—in fact, more 
so than content than the gentleman from EarthLink described ear-
lier. 

Senator BOXER. OK. 
Mr. EISGRAU. With respect to pornography—— 
Senator BOXER. Would you—— 
Mr. EISGRAU.—we’re part of the solution, not part of the problem. 
And we agree with you that it is a giant problem. But as the Gen-
eral  Accounting  Office  pointed  out,  it’s  an  Internet  problem,  not 
just a peer-to-peer problem, as well. 

Senator BOXER. Well, everybody’s got to fix it. This is damaging, 
number  one.  So,  let’s  not  say,  ‘‘It’s  not  mine.’’  Yes,  it’s  part  mine, 
it’s part theirs, it’s part—you know what? It’s over, here, with this. 
This  has  got  to  end.  I  don’t  care  that  you  don’t  like  pornography. 
I  don’t  like—I  believe  that.  You’re  a  dad.  I’m  a  grandmother.  This 
is  good.  But,  you  know  what?  We’re  here  talking  about  the  public. 
There’s a lot of people who make cars who are wonderful, and, you 
know, they don’t want to be in a dangerous car, but maybe they’re 
not  doing  their  best.  And  that’s  why  we  have  standards.  So,  let’s 
just—this  isn’t  about  us,  personally.  When  I  talk  to  you,  I  don’t 
mean it personally. 

Mr. EISGRAU. Not taken that way, Senator. Thank you. 
Senator  BOXER.  But  just  answer  this  question.  Would  you  agree 
with  this,  that  several  developments  have  taken  place  which  high-
light the technological capacity to filter? Would you agree that that 
has happened? 

The CHAIRMAN. We have to wind this up, Senator. 
Senator BOXER. I’ll wind it up. 
Well, do you agree with that? 
Mr. EISGRAU. No. And if I may drop a very—— 
Senator BOXER. OK. Well, then if—— 
Mr. EISGRAU.—brief footnote, Senator—— 
Senator BOXER.—you don’t agree with it—— 
Mr. EISGRAU.—it’s important. 
Senator  BOXER.  I  have  asked  you  to  look  at—Wurld  Media, 
Mashboxx,  and  P2P  Revolution  which  have  announced  licensed  le-
gitimate  direct-to-consumer  P2P  distribution  services  that  will  fil-
ter for unauthorized works. My time is up. My Chairman has been 
patient.  I  think  we’re  moving  along,  and  I  sense  a  resistance  here. 
Maybe I’m missing it, but that’s what I sense. 

The CHAIRMAN. Senator Inouye? 
Senator INOUYE. Mr. Chairman, I’ll try to follow up with you and 

Senator Boxer. 

In the decision, I believe the Supreme Court made it rather clear 
that  the  P2P  activity  occurring  online  is  illegal  and  amounts  to 
theft, much of it. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

Mr. EISGRAU. Yes, sir. 
Senator INOUYE. Now, you have responded to Senator Boxer that 
you were suggesting a summit meeting to resolve this question. My 
question  is,  what  have  you  done  with  your  clients  to  discourage 
them or to prevent your clients from engaging further in illegal ac-
tivity? 

Mr. EISGRAU. Thank you, Senator. 
The  illegal  activity  that  might  be  applicable  in  this  case,  accord-
ing to the Supreme Court, would be activity by the software devel-
oper  to  encourage  users  of  that  software  to  use  it  in  order  to  in-
fringe  copyright.  That’s  the  inducement  language  in  the  Supreme 
Court’s  opinion,  sir.  The  members  of  P2P  United  do  not  now—and 
since I have been involved with them, I would respectfully submit, 
do not induce anybody to commit copyright infringement. 

With  respect  to  StreamCast,  the  makers  of  Morpheus  and 
Grokster,  the  two  pieces  of  software  at  issue  with  the  Supreme 
Court’s  case,  the  Senator  from  California  is  correct,  that  will  be 
going  back  to  the  trial  level  to  see  whether,  years  ago,  an  earlier 
version  of  their  software  was  marketed  under  past  practices  that 
might  subject  them  to  liability  under  the  Supreme  Court’s  new 
test. But the bottom line, Senator, despite what you may hear from 
elsewhere, we do not induce, we do not encourage or condone, copy-
right infringement. Indeed, if you go to our website, there is an un-
mistakable,  very  large  ‘‘C’’  in  a  circle,  with  a  very  stern  copyright 
warning, smack in the middle of the page, sir. 

With  respect  to  whether  we  can  or—modify,  technologically,  the 
software  in  order  to  somehow  filter  copyrighted  material,  the  sys-
tems  that  Senator  Boxer  just  alluded  to,  and  the  gentleman  from 
Wurld  Media  produces,  are  essentially  closed  systems,  as  just  de-
scribed  here  before  you.  They  are  not  traditional  open  peer-to-peer 
architecture.  That’s  a  significant  distinction.  There  would  be  very 
serious  social,  scientific,  educational,  all  kinds  of  ramifications  if, 
in  fact,  Congress  were  to  require  or  suggest  that  only  so-called 
‘‘closed’’ peer-to-peer operating systems were now lawful. 

Mr. ATTAWAY. Senator Inouye, we agree with Senator Boxer, and 
are  just  as  frustrated,  that  it’s  not  enough  simply  to  say  that  in-
fringement or pornography is bad. There has to be something done 
about  it.  And  that’s  one  of  the  good  things  about  the  Supreme 
Court  decision.  The  Supreme  Court  looked  at  a  number  of  factors. 
One  of  them  was  the  fact  that  the  defendants  in  this  case  took  no 
action  to  prevent  the  massive  infringing  activity  that  was  taking 
place.  We  hope  that,  as  a  result  of  the  Supreme  Court  decision, 
there  will  be  incentives  for  all  players  on  the  Internet  to  not  just 
condemn pornography and infringement, but to do something about 
it. And we look forward to that happening. 

Mr.  EISGRAU.  Senator,  may  I  call  your  attention  to  footnote—— 
Mr.  BAINWOL.  I  think  it’s  my  turn,  Adam,  if  I  may.  And  let  me 
just  add  a  precision  to  your  comments.  Adam’s  laid  out  a  very 
elaborate,  kind  of,  scheme  to  dodge  the  fundamental  reality  that 
his  companies  have  not  accepted  what’s  gone  on  here.  These  com-
panies  have  the  ability  to  shut  this  illegal-taking  down  right  now. 
They’re  choosing  not  to.  Let’s  be  clear.  He  then  goes  to  this  notion 
of this, kind of, fancy collective, which sounds good, but it’s less fill-
ing.  It  doesn’t  work.  I  mean,  what  he’s  really  saying,  at  the  end, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

to make it work, he’s talking about a compulsory license. He’s say-
ing,  ‘‘Congress,  pass  a  compulsory  license,  and  let’s  go  ahead  and 
take  revenue  from  a  mandatory  tax  on  ISPs,  and  let’s  take  it  and 
give  it  to  music  rights-holders.’’  But—oh,  but  there’s  a  problem. 
What  do  you  do  about  movies  and  software  and  games?  You’ve 
talked  about  the  size  of  the  intellectual  property  segment  of  this 
economy.  There  is  no  real  practical  way  to  follow  that  suggestion. 
That’s a dodge. It is a failure to accept responsibility for the funda-
mental  fact  that  his  companies  have  a  business  model  predicated 
on theft. They need to deal with that fundamental question. 

Mr. EISGRAU. If I may, Senator Inouye, you’ve been affirmatively 

misled in two respects that are important to clarify. 

First,  as  emphasized  in  my  testimony,  a  voluntary  collective  li-
censing  system—there  is  substantial  scholarship  on  this—a  vol-
untary  collective  licensing  system  is  inherently  different  than  a 
compulsory license. The principal difference being, one requires leg-
islation,  one  requires  simply  having  a  series  of  good-faith  discus-
sions  to  see  if  we  can  get  there.  We  are  not,  absolutely,  for  the 
record, calling for legislation or a compulsory license of the kind to 
which Mr. Bainwol responded. 

Second,  the  claim  that  there  is  a  technological  magic  bullet  that 
a  peer-to-peer  software  developer  that  makes  its  product  available 
to the public can engage in that creates a watertight copyright pro-
tection system is simply false, and I would urge you and this com-
mittee  not  to  take  the  word  of  any  advocate  for  that,  but,  rather, 
convene technical experts who can tell you the truth. 

Third  and  finally,  very  quickly,  footnote  12  of  the  Supreme 
Court’s  opinion  is  important  to  emphasize.  What  it  says—and  it’s 
brief—is  as  follows:  In  the  absence  of  other  evidence  of  intent,  a 
court  would  be  unable  to  find  contributory  infringement  liability 
merely  based  on  a  failure  to  take  affirmative  steps  to  prevent  in-
fringement  if  the  device  was  otherwise  capable  of  substantial  non- 
infringing  use.  Such  a  holding  would  tread  too  close  to  the  Sony 
safe harbor. 

The standard for liability in this instance, although it’s been sug-
gested  otherwise  at  this  panel,  is  not  that  Company  X  fails  to  in-
stall a filter that meets the approval of an entertainment company. 
If  that  were  the  standard,  we  would  seriously  threaten  innovation 
and  capital  investment.  And  that  ought  to  be  of  enormous  concern 
to this committee, sir. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Obviously,  I  know  very  little  about  technology, 
but Mr. Bainwol said that you could stop it right now. Is that real-
istic? 

Mr. EISGRAU. No, sir. That is not. That is not. And Mr. Goldring, 
the  entertainment  lawyer  in  the  editorial  in  the  record,  says  as 
much. 

Senator INOUYE. Mr. Bainwol? 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Wait,  wait,  wait.  Now,  let’s  take  our  time  here, 

Are you finished, sir? 
Well, we’ve got to wind this up sometime, because we’ve been in 
session here now 5 hours, almost 6 hours, in this Committee today 
alone. 

please. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

I do want to say this. Senator Boxer and I rarely agree, but when 

we do I think people ought to listen a little bit. 

[Laughter.] 
The CHAIRMAN. We’re going to have a hearing this fall about the 
pornography aspect of this. We’re talking right now about the busi-
ness  models  of  trying  to  contain  illegal  activity.  But  we’ve  got— 
we’re  going  to  get  specific  about  this  pornography  over  the  Inter-
net.  People  tell  me  we  can’t  do  anything  about  it.  I  don’t  believe 
that. So, we’ll see that this fall. 

But we are also told that, on peer-to-peer, for promotional activi-
ties, the provider puts out a display and tells people what they can 
see  if  they  watch  it.  And  there  are  ways  of  demonstrating  to  the 
public  why  they  should  watch—what  they  should  use,  a  portion  of 
the  Internet,  as  opposed  to  another  one.  I  do  think  that—if  that’s 
the  case,  that  your  Supreme  Court  footnote  has  been  met,  because 
there’s  affirmative  action  on  the  part  of  the  provider  to  tell  people 
to  look  at  something,  and,  if  they  provide  a  list,  and  on  that  list 
are some items that they know are not protected—that ought to be 
protected, and they’re not, they’re participating in this activity. 

Now,  I  hope—again,  I’m  back  to  the  point  where  I  said,  I  hope 
you’re  listening.  Senator  Boxer  has  just  provided  me  a  good  exam-
ple of the comments I’ve gotten in the room about, ‘‘Why don’t you 
do something, Mr. Chairman? Why don’t you follow up on this Su-
preme Court case?’’ Well, all we held this hearing for was to say— 
to  listen  to  you  to  see  if  there  is  any  indication  that  the  industry 
is going to do that. And I, again, say to you, the difference between 
this—I  hope  that  you  do  it,  because,  if  you  don’t  do  it,  I’m  going 
to  move  over  and  be  with  Senator  Boxer  on  this.  And  I  think  the 
whole committee will. We’ve got to find some way to meet this con-
cept  of  protecting  our  intellectual  property.  We  can  hardly  accuse 
the  people  abroad  of  stealing  our  intellectual  property  if  we  can’t 
protect it at home. 

Now,  that’s  the  message  we’ve  got  to  give  you.  And,  unfortu-
nately,  I  have  to  adjourn  this  hearing  right  now.  Thank  you  very 
much. 

[Whereupon, at 4:40 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARTY LAFFERTY, CEO, 

DISTRIBUTED COMPUTING INDUSTRY ASSOCIATION (DCIA) 

Dear Chairman Stevens and Ranking Member Inouye: 
Thank  you  for  holding  this  important  and  timely  hearing  on  issues  related  to 
MGM  v.  Grokster  and  the  appropriate  balance  between  copyright  protection  and 
technology innovation. We greatly appreciate your leadership and that of your Com-
merce  Committee  colleagues.  We  are  grateful  for  this  opportunity  to  share  the  Dis-
tributed Computing Industry Association’s (www.DCIA.info) perspective on this crit-
ical industry and consumer issue. 
Long-Term Benefits of the Supreme Court Ruling 

The DCIA welcomed the Supreme Court’s refusal to rework the Betamax decision, 
and remains optimistic that the grounds for secondary liability it defined will prove 
in the fullness of time to be fair and workable. 

As  the  case  works  its  way  back  through  the  lower  courts,  we  anticipate  clarifica-
tion of the rules of engagement between content providers and technology suppliers 
in  the  digital  realm  generally,  and  with  respect  to  peer-to-peer  (P2P)  file  sharing 
in particular. 

We are confident that the Court’s decision in the MGM v. Grokster case will ulti-

mately lead to the continued expansion of our industry. 

We  should  clarify  that  our  vision  for  that  expansion  does  not  center  on  filtering 
copyrighted works out of the P2P environment, but rather on deploying commercial 
and  technical  solutions,  which  the  vast  majority  of  rights  holders  will  find  attrac-
tive, for secure licensed and profitable redistribution of such works via file sharing. 
Given  the  pace  of  broadband  deployment  and  Internet-based  software  develop-
ment,  it  is  far  preferable  to  focus  on  achieving  the  full  potential  of  highly  efficient 
P2P technologies for revenue generation—rather than on shortchanging that poten-
tial. 

In  the  file-sharing  environment  that  we  are  working  to  establish,  rights  holders 
will  have  the  digital  rights  management  (DRM)  tools  and  support  services  to  man-
age key aspects of every transaction—and to monetize them through such means as 
advertising  support,  sponsorships,  cross  promotion,  packaging,  subscriptions,  and  a 
la carte sales—whether their works are initially entered into redistribution by them-
selves or by others—including consumers. 

We  have  already  urged  all  affected  parties  to  focus  on  deploying  new  business 
models for content distribution that are non-infringing and expand the marketplace 
for  digital  content,  and  not  to  pursue  legislative  intervention  at  this  time,  which 
would  only  be  counter-productive.  The  private  sector,  with  added  clarity  that  will 
result  from  pending  lower  court  outcomes,  should  manage  the  process  from  here, 
until we reach a later stage as described below. 

The  MGM  v.  Grokster  ruling  provides  impetus  for  the  P2P  distribution  channel 
to grow and flourish. P2P DRM technologies and micro-payment services have been 
proven with computer games, software, and independent music and films. Major la-
bels  and  studios  can  avail  themselves  of  these  tools  to  develop  marketplace  solu-
tions—starting today. 

To quote Justice Breyer: 

‘‘The  record  reveals  a  significant  future  market  for  non-infringing  uses  of 
Grokster-type peer-to-peer software. Such software permits the exchange of any 
sort  of  digital  file—whether  that  file  does,  or  does  not,  contain  copyrighted 
material . . .
Such  legitimate  non-infringing  uses  are  coming  to  include  the  swapping  of:  re-
search  information  (the  initial  purpose  of  many  peer-to-peer  networks);  public 
domain films (e.g., those owned by the Prelinger Archives); historical recordings 
and  digital  educational  materials  (e.g.,  those  stored  on  the  Internet  Archive); 
digital photos (OurPictures, for example, is starting a P2P photo-swapping serv-

(55) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

ice);  ‘shareware’  and  ‘freeware’  (e.g.,  Linux  and  certain  Windows  software);  se-
cure  licensed  music  and  movie  files  (INTENT  MediaWorks,  for  example,  pro-
tects  licensed  content  sent  across  P2P  networks);  news  broadcasts  past  and 
present  (the  BBC  Creative  Archive  lets  users  ‘‘rip,  mix  and  share  the  BBC’’); 
user-created audio and video files (including ‘‘podcasts’’ that may be distributed 
through  P2P  software);  and  all  manner  of  free  ‘‘open  content’’  works  collected 
by  Creative  Commons  (one  can  search  for  Creative  Commons  material  on 
StreamCast) . . .
I  can  find  nothing  in  the  record  that  suggests  that  this  course  of  events  will 
not continue to flow naturally as a consequence of the character of the software 
taken together with the foreseeable development of the Internet and of informa-
tion  technology.  There  may  be  other  now-unforeseen  non-infringing  uses  that 
develop  for  peer-to-peer  software,  just  as  the  home-video  rental  industry 
(unmentioned in Sony) developed for the VCR.’’ 

We  hope  the  Court’s  decision  will  lead  to  a  shift  away  from  conflict  and  toward 
commerce,  and  we  encourage  everyone  to  come  to  the  table  and  develop  new  busi-
ness partnerships. The MPAA and RIAA and their powerful members control ninety 
percent (90%) of popular entertainment content distribution and can now move for-
ward to license responsible P2P companies using this highly efficient and extremely 
popular  channel  for  the  distribution  of  their  copyrighted  works  to  create  new  mar-
kets and revenue opportunities. 

P2P  file-sharing  technologies  are  part  of  the  larger  movement  to  an  increasingly 
distributed  computing  environment.  As  the  Court  affirmed,  this  kind  of  techno-
logical  progress  is  inevitable—embracing  it  to  harness  its  capabilities  will  prove  to 
be much more gainful than resisting or trying to stop it. 

While  it  is  regrettable  that  the  earliest  outcome  of  the  Supreme  Court’s  ruling 
likely will be additional backward-looking litigation—and even more unfortunate be-
cause  parties  on  both  sides  over  time  have  implemented  changes  in  business  prac-
tices  paving  the  way  for  them  to  work  together—we  can  now  also  engage  in  more 
constructive  activities  without  the  uncertainty  as  to  what  the  Court’s  decision  will 
be. 

Specifically,  the  DCIA  has  embarked  on  three  areas  of  activity  comprising  devel-
opment  of:  (1)  a  comprehensive  best  practices  regime  based  on  analysis  of  the  Su-
preme  Court  opinion  and  concurrences;  (2)  a  promotional  program  highlighting  li-
censed content P2P distribution, appropriate software usage, and protection of chil-
dren  online;  and  (3)  a  technology  solution  initiative  that  emphasizes  a  combination 
of  ‘‘offensive’’  tactics  (e.g.,  placement  of  DRM-protected  and  other  licensed  files  at 
top  of  search  results)  with  ‘‘defensive’’  tactics  (e.g.,  conversion  of  unauthorized  files 
into licensed quality-controlled versions) that have long-term viability. 

While  some  either  cynically  or  naively  propose  forcing  a  migration  to  provisional 
closed  P2P  systems  and/or  continuing  to  use  lawsuits  and  smear  campaigns  to  ex-
press  their  opposition  to  real  industry  progress,  it  is  right  at  this  moment  that  we 
demonstrate our commitment to more positive alternatives. 

Trying to drive global Internet users to abandon an ever-increasing abundance of 
open  and  inter-operable  software  applications,  which  facilitate  the  instantaneous 
transfer  of  files  with  greater  and  greater  efficiency,  ignores  marketplace  realities, 
and particularly the effects of an ongoing evolution to low-cost open-source program 
development. 

It  makes  much  more  sense  to  put  resources  into  projects  concentrating  on  the 
third  area  of  activity  outlined  above,  which  are  distinguished  by  an  emphasis  on 
equipping  individual  files  to  carry  the  means  of  their  protection  and  monetization 
with them as they are transported over public networks. 

DCIA  Members  have  relevant  experience  that  can  be  applied  in  this  initiative 
along  with  their  expertise  and  capabilities  to  benefit  not  only  legitimate  business 
interests, but also consumers. 

It  is  clear  that  certain  of  our  industry’s  opponents  are  trying  to  leverage  the 
courts  and  Congress  to  perpetuate  entrenched  but  no  longer  optimal  business  mod-
els,  temporarily  curtail  or  slow  down  technological  advances,  and  maintain  hegem-
ony of now outdated processes for content exploitation. 

Our opponents blame others for their own failures to exercise responsible steward-
ship in protecting copyrights during a more than two-decades-long conversion to dig-
ital  content  origination  and  distribution.  They  seek  to  compel  third  parties  to  pay 
for  solutions  to  problems  arising  from  their  own  neglect,  and  buttress  their  cam-
paign  with  intimidation.  Instead,  we  need  to  come  together  to  complete  the  tasks 
that must be done for all affected parties to move ahead. 

It is important that those who oppose the growth of the distributed computing in-
dustry  realize  that  our  determination  to  continue  developing  P2P  technologies  for 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

legitimate purposes is greater than their determination to restrain, obstruct, or sup-
press these efforts. 
Short-Term Concerns About the Ruling 

The  divisiveness  of  what  has  become  a  protracted  conflict  between  major  enter-
tainment  conglomerates  and  current-generation  P2P  software  distributors  has  un-
fortunately  been  exacerbated  by  the  Supreme  Court’s  decision—indeed  the  imme-
diate result of the high Court’s ruling will be renewed litigation among these parties 
in  the  lower  courts.  More  disturbingly,  consumer  lawsuits  by  music  and  movie  in-
dustry interests are also continuing unabated. None of the entertainment industry’s 
prospective new sanctioned P2P applications has yet to launch, and reportedly, P2P 
copyright infringement levels continue steadily to increase. 

To  make  matters  worse,  the  business  models  and  technology  solutions  put  forth 
by the DCIA’s now more than fifty (50) Member companies and other qualified inde-
pendent  entities,  to  provide  copyright  protection  while  also  promoting  continued 
technology innovation, have not yet received the major entertainment sector support 
or the media attention that they merit. This despite the fact that they are squarely 
grounded in marketplace realities rather than wishful thinking, are focused on com-
mercial  development  that  will  benefit  all  affected  parties  rather  than  just  certain 
entrenched  interests,  and  are  gaining  traction  as  clearly  demonstrated  by  their 
promising initial consumer acceptance. 

The  DCIA  firmly  believes  that  P2P  copyright  infringement  can  not  only  be  dra-
matically  reduced,  but  that  P2P  has  the  potential  to  serve  as  a  more  robust  and 
efficient distribution channel than its predecessors for a greater diversity of content 
offered  in  a  larger  variety  of  ways.  But  to  do  so  will  require  leading  entertainment 
companies, P2P software distributors, and technology solutions providers to collabo-
rate  rather  than  litigate  or  retreat  from  participating  in  fear  of  litigation.  Service- 
and-support firms need to be allowed to demonstrate that they can provide adequate 
safeguards through such techniques as P2P DRM and micro-payment solutions, and 
entertainment  content  rights  holders  need  to  license  their  works  for  P2P  distribu-
tion.  Beyond  that,  P2P  can  also  become  an  advanced  communications  medium  and 
collaboration platform. 

Fully addressing the P2P copyright infringement problem for the long-run will re-
quire  a  coordinated,  multi-faceted  approach  that  includes  content  and  technology 
sector  collaboration,  cross-industry  self-regulation,  and  targeted  enforcement.  But 
first, appropriate activities for companies and consumers alike to use P2P in author-
ized ways for redistribution of copyrighted works need to be established. Users need 
clearly to be shown appropriate ways to utilize P2P to access and share popular en-
tertainment content. It should be deemed unacceptable, for example, that not a sin-
gle  major  label  track  is  yet  available  in  a  licensed  format  in  today’s  P2P  environ-
ment. 

Our  view  is  that  it  is  essential  for  any  proposed  solution’s  viability  that  it  be  ag-
nostic in terms of working with current and foreseeable P2P applications, including 
open  source  clients  and  swarming  transfer  protocols.  To  be  fully  effective,  it  should 
address  both  the  intentional  authorized  introduction  by  rights  holders  and  their 
agents of secured files of copyrighted works—and their continued protection as they 
are  redistributed  from  user-to-user  no  matter  what  software  program(s)  are  being 
used;  as  well  as  the  unauthorized  introduction  of  unsecured  files  of  such  works  by 
third parties including end-users—and their continued prevention from being redis-
tributed in unauthorized form. 

Not  to  oversimplify  this  matter,  but  it  seems  to  us  that  two  fundamental  tasks 
with respect to securely redistributing copyrighted works via P2P can be defined as: 
(A)  To  apply  P2P  DRM  to  a  file  (permitting  rights-holder[s]  to  set  price,  usage 
terms,  etc.),  then  create  multiple  variations  of  the  secured  licensed  version  of 
the file (supporting robust viral redistribution), and finally seed these initial au-
thorized  copies  into  the  file-sharing  environment  in  such  a  way  that  they  will 
appear at the top of search results on major P2P software programs (using algo-
rithms unique to each protocol) and other search engines; and 
(B)  To  support  a  system  that  essentially  mirrors  the  decentralized  architecture 
of  P2P  applications,  extended  to  include  torrent  technologies  which  break  files 
into smaller pieces, that blocks redistribution of unauthorized files of registered 
copyrighted works (without comprising consumer privacy or interfering with re-
distribution  of  other  files),  that  reconstitutes  usable  quality-controlled  portions 
of  copyrighted-works  files  into  licensed  versions  (to  optimize  the  efficiency  of  a 
distributed  computing  environment),  and  that  provides  detailed  specific  meas-
urement data regarding P2P traffic. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

To  date,  DCIA  Members  have  developed  and  deployed  solutions  needed  for  task 
‘‘A’’  for  major  P2P  software  programs  including  BearShare,  eDonkey,  Grokster, 
Kazaa, Morpheus, TrustyFiles, etc. as well as some search engines and websites, de-
spite being hampered by a very limited amount of test content. Examples of compa-
nies  actively  engaged  in  this—and  their  solutions,  include  Altnet—TopSearch;  IN-
TENT MediaWorks—myPeer; Shared Media Licensing—Weed; Trymedia Systems— 
ActiveMark;  and  Unity  Tunes—Unified  DRIV.  P2P  DRM,  e-commerce,  payment 
services, and related solutions providers now include an impressive roster of highly 
qualified  firms  such  as  Clickshare,  Digital  Containers,  Digital  Rivers,  Javien, 
KlikVU,  P2P  Cash,  Predixis,  Relatable,  RightsLine,  Softwrap,  SVC  Financial,  and 
Telcordia. 

Their  models  work  well  mechanically  and  these  companies  are  poised  for  enor-
mous  growth  as  the  P2P  channel  matures.  In  terms  of  sales  volume,  which  is  obvi-
ously  the  more  important  issue,  it  is  too  early  to  draw  conclusions,  however,  and 
results-to-date  are  skewed  by  not  yet  having  licenses  for  major  label  or  studio  con-
tent  and  not  yet  having  ‘‘B’’  deployed.  New  solutions  providers  are  now  proposing 
credible approaches to accomplish ‘‘B,’’ which augur especially well for P2P’s future. 
With  these  in  place,  delivery  of  licensed  digital  media  content,  such  as  through 
methodologies  developed  by  Unity  Tunes,  will  evolve  into  a  secure  user-friendly 
model  for  super-distribution  by  means  of  most  P2P  networks.  More  than  anything, 
the  private  sector  needs  time  and  encouragement  for  ‘‘B’’  to  be  adopted  and  imple-
mented, and for ‘‘A’’ to be fully developed with the participation of major entertain-
ment rights holders. 

In  terms  of  business  models  and  technology  support  to  realize  them,  DCIA  Mem-
bers  are  committed  to  providing  the  best  solutions  possible,  and  engaging  on  every 
level to find new and better commercial and technical means to secure and promote 
licensed content so that it will be possible for every P2P transaction to be monetized 
with terms and conditions established by rights holders, whether the subject content 
is initially entered into redistribution by rights holders or by consumers. 

The distributed computing industry is actively exploring innovative business mod-
els for monetizing copyrighted works in the file-sharing marketplace through adver-
tising  support,  sponsorships,  cross  promotion,  packaging,  subscriptions,  and  a  la 
carte  sales.  The  industry  is  building  better  DRM  and  payment  solutions  every  day, 
and is investing in research and development to open the door to greater innovation. 
We acknowledge the need for solutions that are more user-friendly, transparent, and 
supportive  of  fair-use  provisions  expected  by  consumers.  But  most  of  all  what  has 
been missing has been major label and studio involvement as content licensors. 

While DCIA Members and others have made significant advances in commercially 
developing  P2P,  we  also  recognize  there  is  still  much  work  to  be  done  beyond  at-
tracting  the  major  labels  and  studios.  But  these  efforts  are  not  the  only  answers. 
Effective  and  complementary  self-regulation  efforts  by  the  content  and  technology 
industries are crucial. 
Industry Self-Regulatory Efforts 

Specifically,  we  advocate  the  establishment  of  independently  coordinated  authori-
ties  around  the  globe  to  help  establish  P2P  file-sharing  best  practices,  and  then  to 
serve as an ongoing resource for industry participant certification and dispute reso-
lution.  In  short,  these  authorities  should  provide  mechanisms  for  registering  copy-
righted  works,  supporting  inter-operability  of  DRM  and  payment  service  solutions, 
plus monitoring and reporting progress to participants in reducing instances of copy-
right  infringement  as  a  percentage  of  the  universe  of  P2P  transactions.  Of  course, 
any technology approved for adoption should be based on open standards and devel-
oped with broad input from the affected industries. 

As  a  preliminary  step  toward  achieving  this  objective,  interested  parties  are  now 
invited to join the MGM v. Grokster Response Working Group (MGRWG), which the 
DCIA established within weeks of the Supreme Court ruling. 

We  are  especially  interested  in  recruiting  additional  content  rights  holders,  peer- 

to-peer (P2P) software distributors, and delivery solutions providers. 

The principal goal of MGRWG is to recommend a set of best practices for the dis-
tribution  of  P2P  software  with  the  object  of  promoting  its  use  in  ways  that  do  not 
infringe copyright through affirmative steps taken to foster non-infringement. 

Our purposes are to enhance and not diminish benefits in security, cost, and effi-
ciency of P2P software for storing and transmitting electronic files, and to encourage 
further  commercial  development  of  beneficial  distributed  computing  technologies. 
We  intend  for  end-users  to  be  able  to  prominently  employ  ad  hoc  P2P  networks  for 
sharing copyrighted music and video files—with proper authorization. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

The proposed structure for defining these best practices, subject to full discussion 
by  MGRWG,  will  have  four  parts:  (1)  Advertising  Guidelines;  (2)  Protection  Mecha-
nisms; (3) Business Models; and (4) Tracking Studies. 

Questions to be answered by MGRWG include: 
• What  kinds  of  consumer  communications  are  recommended  to  promote  non-in-

fringing usage of P2P software; 

• What  types  of  P2P  digital  rights  management  (DRM)  solutions  are  rec-
ommended  so  that  each  transaction  of  a  copyrighted  work’s  P2P  redistribution 
can take place on terms-and-conditions determined by its rights holder(s); 

• What revenue sharing opportunities are recommended for content rights holders 
to  fully  exploit  the  possibilities  of  P2P  for  licensed  content  redistribution  (e.g., 
advertising  support,  sponsorships,  cross  promotion,  packaging,  subscriptions,  a 
la carte sales, etc.) plus what kinds of disclosures, if any, are recommended for 
non-copyrighted-content  related  P2P  revenue  generation  (e.g.,  behavioral  mar-
keting,  VoIP  services,  paid  search,  travel  applications,  collaborative  research, 
blogging, etc.); and 

• What  industry-wide  measurements  using  such  methods  as  test-cell  extrapo-
lation are recommended to track growth trends of authorized copyrighted works 
transactions  as  a  percentage  of  all  P2P  transactions,  as  well  as  other  key 
metrics. 

Copyright holders should expect that a balance will be struck between their legiti-
mate  demands  for  effective—not  merely  symbolic—protection  of  their  statutory  mo-
nopoly,  and  the  rights  of  P2P  software  distributors  and  others  to  freely  engage  in 
substantially unrelated areas of commerce. 

Users  should  be  able  to  continue  to  search  for,  retrieve,  and  store  files  without 
involvement of P2P application providers, who should not be expected to monitor or 
control  use  of  their  software  with  respect  to  actual  knowledge  of  specific  content 
transactions.  Involvement  of  other  members  of  the  distribution  chain,  however, 
should  provide  the  requisite  controls  to  enable  secure  P2P  dissemination  of  reg-
istered works globally. 

Decentralized  P2P  software  applications  should  not  be  expected  to  reveal  which 
files  are  being  copied  and  when,  but  rather  related  technology  solutions  should  be 
supported  for  affiliated  third  parties  to  equip  individual  files  to  accomplish  this  as 
they  are  redistributed  across  public  networks  using  P2P  protocols.  Filtering  copy-
righted  material  out  of  P2P  users’  downloads  or  otherwise  impeding  redistribution 
by  such  methods  as  blocking  usage  should  not  be  advocated  as  impositions  on  P2P 
software  suppliers.  Advanced  alternatives  will  more  effectively  accomplish  the  un-
derlying goals that previously have led some to suggest these approaches.JLW 

Distributors of P2P programs should be able to clearly voice the objective that re-
cipients  use  their  applications  to  download  licensed  copyrighted  works,  and  take 
steps to encourage them to do so, because the file-sharing environment supports se-
cure  redistribution.  These  and  other  P2P  content-reselling  entities  should  be  able 
to competitively market their offerings to prospective users. 

P2P distributors should be able to advertise and instruct consumers on how to en-
gage  in  authorized  usage  of  their  software  to  download  and  redistribute  licensed 
copyrighted  works  and  to  recommend  and  directly  encourage  such  usage.  They 
should  be  able  to  overtly  and  aggressively  take  steps  to  respond  to  consumer  de-
mand  for  online  access  to  copyrighted  material  through  highly  efficient  and  very 
popular P2P software. 

As  with  other  DCIA-sponsored  working  groups,  participation  in  MGRWG  is  vol-
untary  and  open  to  DCIA  Members  and  qualified  non-members.  Confidentiality  of 
MGRWG  participation  will  be  maintained  unless  express  written  authorization  for 
disclosure  is  given  by  an  individual  company  in  advance.  Once  the  work  product, 
in  this  case,  an  outline  of  best  practices,  is  completed  and  publicized  by  MGRWG, 
adoption  and  compliance  with  its  recommendations,  whether  in  full  or  in  part,  will 
be  a  separate  voluntary  action  to  be  independently  decided  upon  by  MGRWG  par-
ticipants (and others) individually. 

As  the  step  beyond  MGRWG,  the  DCIA  would  be  willing  to  serve  as  coordinator 
of a multi-industry group constituted with broad relevant multi-industry representa-
tion, working in consultation with the Federal Trade Commission (FTC) to help cod-
ify best practices. 

But in order for self-regulation, business model exploration, and technology devel-
opment  efforts  to  be  successful,  ultimately  they  may  well  need  to  be  supported  by 
strong  Federal  legislation  to  prohibit  unacceptable  practices  and  empower  con-
sumers without threatening the vitality of legitimate P2P usage. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Ultimate Role for the Federal Government 

60 

It  is  our  view  that  business  and  technical  solutions  should  be  encouraged  in  the 
private sector, and that a request for any necessary enabling legislation should come 
only  as  a  last  resort  and  only  based  on  a  consensus  among  affected  parties,  in  this 
case  primarily  content  rights  holders  and  P2P  software  providers,  but  also  closely 
related telecommunications and technology firms, once traction for a particular solu-
tion(s) has clearly been established. 

Global decentralization of the Internet has reached the point that it would be vir-
tually  impossible  to  stop  the  proliferation  of  P2P  file-sharing  technology  or  prevent 
its continuing evolution to higher levels of efficiency. 

The  channel  has  already  been  proven  to  be  a  highly  efficient  medium  for  mar-
keting  copyrighted  works.  The  availability  of  licensed  copyrighted  material  is  as-
sured  by  the  software,  which  automatically  makes  copies  of  works  available  to  mil-
lions of other users, who each in turn are required to acquire a license under rights- 
holder stipulated terms, including usage and price. 

The key issue that has perpetuated copyright infringement by means of P2P soft-
ware continues to be a collusive refusal-to-deal by a handful of large, multi-national, 
very  profitable  entertainment  rights  aggregators,  who  by  their  own  admission  con-
trol more than ninety percent (90%) of pop-culture content. 

If  this  continues,  what  may  ultimately  be  called  for  is  an  injunction  against  ‘‘in-
tentional  withholding  of  licensed  content  from  a  distribution  channel  that  happens 
not to be fully controlled by major rights holders.’’ 

Copyright  infringement  is  the  natural  and  inevitable  by-product  of  the  failure  to 
take necessary steps to protect content from unauthorized duplication and distribu-
tion in the digital realm, and then to refuse to license it to willing distributors with 
proven  solutions  to  problems  certain  rights  holders  essentially  have  created  for 
themselves. 

This  argument  carries  through  to  the  fact  that  these  large  entertainment  copy-
right  aggregators  knowingly  continue  to  distribute  unprotected  CDs  and  DVDs  by 
the  millions,  with  their  only  tactics  to  respond  to  the  massive  adoption  by  con-
sumers of file-sharing technologies being to sue hundreds of users per month for al-
leged  acts  of  infringement  and  to  sue  small  P2P  software  distributors.  They  them-
selves  are  the  ones  in  fact  driving  consumers  to  become  distributors  of  infringing 
copies by not licensing a single music track or video under their control for author-
ized  distribution  by  means  of  currently  distributed  P2P  software,  as  well  as  failing 
to  take  reasonable  technical  precautions  to  prevent  the  free  and  facile  replication 
and redistribution of their works. 

It  would  seem,  in  these  circumstances,  that  responsible  behavior  by  the  major 
rights holders would be to follow the example of more progressive independents and 
license their content for the P2P distribution channel, now that the success of such 
efforts has been demonstrated. 

The  true  problem  in  the  context  of  P2P  software,  where  program  developers  and 
distributors and solutions providers have sought to negotiate with major rights hold-
ers,  is  that  they  have  been  met  with  a  refusal  to  do  business  or  to  even  engage  in 
technical tests or market trials. 

Despite  this,  these  innovative  software  companies  and  solutions  providers  have 
succeeded  in  ‘‘competing  with  free’’  by  licensing  and  successfully  facilitating  the 
marketing  of  lesser  known,  less  popular  entertainment  content  offered  by  an  in-
creasing number of small independents. 

This  condition  has  scrambled  the  venerable  structure  of  copyright-based  busi-
nesses.  There  is  a  growing  need  to  bring  the  major  rights  holders  to  the  table  with 
such willing intermediaries, rather than allowing their litigation against consumers 
and small P2P developers to continue. 

To achieve a more comprehensive solution, Congress may eventually want to con-

sider legislative approaches. 

Specifically, Federal legislation should create incentives for P2P distribution chan-
nel  participants  to  adopt  best  practices.  One  way  to  encourage  companies  to  adopt 
best  practices  is  to  provide  a  ‘‘safe  harbor’’  for  those  who  are  members  of  an  FTC- 
approved self-regulatory organization. Under this approach, safe harbor participants 
would  be  entitled  to  avoid  the  burden  of  additional  requirements,  based  upon  their 
compliance with specific guidelines. 

Thus,  Federal  legislation  should  identify  the  basic  components  that  industry 
guidelines must address, but permit the industry to take the lead in developing the 
specific guidelines within these parameters. 

Here is an outline of what can tentatively be called The Peer-to-Peer Distribution 

of Copyrighted Works Development Act of 2006: 

First Provision: Copyright owners and rights holders, who desire to monetize their 
copyrighted works by means of digital distribution over discovery and transport pro-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

tocols, shall register digital files of such works, in a manner that permits their effi-
cient identification during Internet transport, with the Copyright Office, which shall 
stipulate  the  technical  specifications  for  such  file  identification,  as  may  be  reason-
ably updated from time-to-time. 

Second Provision: Owners and operators of broadband ISP services and computer 
hardware  and  software  manufacturers  and  distributors,  shall  cause  to  be  deployed, 
within  twelve  (12)  months  of  enactment  of  this  bill  into  law,  and  to  maintain,  sys-
tems  to  accurately  track  the  delivery  of  files  identified  in  Provision  I  to  individual 
consumers, in a way that will ensure timely billing for registered copyrighted works 
by means of distribution via transport protocols designed to discover and deliver dig-
ital assets. 

Third  Provision:  Copyright  holders  in  Provision  I  and  technology  and  tele-
communications  providers  in  Provision  II  shall  be  entitled  to  establish  pricing  and 
revenue-sharing  through  private  negotiations,  to  recover  their  costs  for  registering, 
tracking,  billing,  collecting,  etc.  and  to  earn  a  profit,  provided  that  prices  charged 
to consumers for copyrighted works through distribution via transport protocols are 
competitive with alternative distribution channels for such works. 

Please  do  not  interpret  this  proposal  as  a  recommendation  for  compulsory  licens-
ing  or  a  derivative  of  that  type  of  regime.  Rights  holders  would  be  able  to  volun-
tarily  license  their  content  or  to  withhold  it,  to  set  rates  and  to  determine  usage 
parameters,  and  otherwise  to  exert  control  over  their  copyrighted  works,  just  as 
they do in other distribution channels. 

As  a  strong  proponent  of  the  still  nascent  distributed  computing  industry,  the 
DCIA is committed to using its resources to help address the P2P copyright infringe-
ment  problem  from  every  perspective:  business  models,  technology  solutions,  self- 
regulation,  legislation,  and  enforcement.  We  have  started  to  see  progress  on  all 
fronts, but much more work clearly needs to be done. 

We  pledge  our  support  to  your  ongoing  legislative  efforts,  and  look  forward  to 
sharing  our  proposals  and  working  with  others  toward  viable  solutions.  The  DCIA 
offers  whatever  assistance  this  Committee  would  need  with  respect  to  such  efforts. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  14:07 Feb 17, 2011 Jkt 064524 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\64524.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

